CHAPTER I.
The
battle was over. The wreathed smoke turned
into blue air, and the polluted wave heaved smoothly
after the uproar, as if purified by the very blood that
had been poured into it.
The French and British commanders lay side by side,
on the deck of the conquerour, sheltered from the sun by
an awning of shattered ensigns. Each was wrapped in
a sheet, which was soon stiff and stark with the ebbing
blood. The Frenchman was a being as full of chivalry
as ever trod the deck of a ship. He was literally
hacked
and hewed, limb from limb. He had headed the
boarders and carried all before himwas a conquerour,
as
he
thought, upon the deck of the Briton, when he saw
his own colours plucked down, before his eyes! The
sight drove him mad. He lost his self-possession, and
was driven back by a rank of whirling sabres, until he
fell, overpowered, not subdued, just as he laid his hand
upon the line, for the purpose of pulling down the flag of
his conquerour.
The Briton lay by hima rude, rough sailor; but
pluck and sinew to the back bonea man that fought
from a mere sense of loyalty, a feeling of constitutional
bravery. The features of both were discoloured by the
blood and smoke and powder. The Frenchman died
first, and stretched himself out, with a convulsive
shivering
,
which was involuntary, and a majestick countenance,
as if to receive the honours of sepulture on the spot.
The Englishmanhe merely folded his arms, shut his
eyesturned away his face from the spectacle of
slaughter
,
and died as he had lived, without emotion, or terrour,
or convulsion, like a strong man going to sleep at will.
Not a dry eye was about them. The strife, the mortal
strife was over: and men that had met, but a few
moments
before, with flashing looks, and arms red to the
elbow in smoking gore, were now wiping their eyes.
The prisoners were brought on board, and disposed of,
with a sort of indifferenceso much as a matter of course,
that served very sensibly to mortify them. There was no
intentional unkindness in this. It was merely the habit
of British sailors; and they went about clearing and
scouring the decks, repairing the sails, and plugging the
shot holes, with the same careless countenances. It was
only now and then, when some shipmate passed, who
perhaps had not been seen since the battle began, that
they would betray any emotionbut then! their eyes
would shine, and they would wring each others' hands,
generally in silence, but sometimes with an oath that
came from the very bottom of their heartsswearing
their gratitude to heaven!
New passengers now appeared upon decksome that
had been below, from the first hour of Harold's arrival.
He was the object of general attention. He was
delirious
,
and by the indulgence of the first officer, after the
decks were cleared, was permitted to remain above;
under the same awning with the slaughtered rival. A
beautiful boy was wailing aloud at his side, and a female,
with a sweet interesting countenance, was sitting by him
with such a hallowed, mournful, yet appalling
abstraction
of spirit, that no human being had the heart to
approach
or disturb her. If any of God's creatures were
inconsolableIf any had no hope, here or hereafter, in
their desolation and apathy,
that
woman, young and
lovely as she was, might have been taken for one of them.
Her pale thin hand was almost transparent, as she pressed
1*
it upon Harold's foreheadand at every throb of his
temples
,
her blue veins would change colour, and deepen
with the volocity of their current. The tears flowed
slowly
,
so slowly, that they were hardly tears, but rather the
humidity of a grotto, water oozing from the insensible
stone, filtering through it, and hardening while you
gazed upon it. In one word, she was a desolate and
heartbroken
creature.
A rough sailor approached,with the kindest
intention
but
her eyes streamed with sudden fire, like
those of the famished lioness, when you attempt to
bereave
her of her whelps; and he retreated in dismay.
A lady came and sat by hertook her hand. It
trembledher eyes filled faster: Your husband, dear
lady, said the strangermy husband! said the
mourner, in a faint voiceOh no!no!but the
preserver
of my child.
Night came on; and the great ships lay in the
moonlight
,
side by side, like two gigantic creatures of the
ocean, wearied and slumbering, after a mortal combat.
Thus lay Harold. It was the third day before he
recollected
aught that occurred; and the first words which
recalled him, were in that peculiar tone of authority
which had haunted him perpetually of late. His heart
swelled. All that have fought together, are acquainted.
There is no fellowship so distinct, so lasting, as that of
danger. We are glad to meet a man, who has with
ourselves
,
survived a shipwreck. In a strange place, we
greet, with cordiality, one whom we have passed, and
will pass again, a thousand times at
home
, without
speaking
to him,all this is oddbut not
so
odd, as is the
sensation, that men, whose elbows have touched and
thrilled at the same moment, at the same volley, feel
when they encounter, after the danger is passed. They
have been seen embracing, after a battle, who had
never met before in their lives, merely because they
fought in the same uniform.
Poor Harold's impatience of restraint became greater
and greater, every hour. His situation was especially
irksome; but the orders of his surgeon were peremptory,
and when they stripped him, and found him scarred and
wounded all over, they determined not to hazard one of
such experience, in any precipitate operations.
Leopold was forever in his arms. He slept with him,
watched by him, mute as the statue of a blind Cupid,
with his little finger on his lip, when Harold slept, and
full of playfulness and frolick, when he awoke. The
stranger
too, he learnt afterwards, had been seen to look at him
with feeling, until his eyes filled,undoubtedly with
delight
,
at the recollection of his own agency in his
preservation
.
It was not so.
It was a resemblance
.
Harold was anxious to find out more of the
stranger
,
and of the woman, Leopold's mother. But he
could hear nothing satisfactory. The former had never
come upon deck, except in the evening: and the latter
had been ill ever since she came on board, and was
alarmingly so now.
But the conduct of the stranger, during the battle, was
the theme of universal applause. The moment that
the first gun was fired, he took his station by the
helmsman
,
his countenance settled, and awfully pale. He
stood, and spoke as if then, and not till
then
, he was in
his own proper elementbattle and smoke. He
directed
every thing with the precision of consummate
experience
,
and the promptitude of one, whose very thoughts
are actions. With his own hand, it was said, that he
had cut down several of the foe, and that he had
evinced
such terrifick address all the while, particularly in
the use of his sword, that they who had spoken of him,
and been, as
they
thought, familiar with him before,
were unable to open their lips, while he was near, nor
even when he spoke to them. Who was he? they all
askedbut all kept aloof, as from one whose presence
was not lightly to be trespassed upon, and nobody could
tell. That he had authority and experience was evident,
but how far they went, was not now to be told, for he who
had paid him the most signal deference, the Captain,
was now in his winding sheet, and had never betrayed
the mysterious trust. All his officers had remarked that
the stranger was the only human being, before whom
they had ever seen the Captain stand bare headed, upon
the deck of his own ship.
Bolton too, it appears, under the controul of the
stranger
,
had fought with invincible resolution and effect:
but Bolton was as ignorant of his name, and history,
and character, as the rest. There was no being intimate
with such a man.
Harold was constantly occupied with an
unaccountable
anxiety about him, and this had arrived at that
pitch, at last, that he determined to address him
particularly
,
when he had a chance, and ask him in so many
words, who and what he was! and by what mysterious
power he held such dominion over the minds of men.
One morning, while occupied with his purpose, he
heard a noise on deck; the sound of a loud voice. The
drum beat to quartersand the ship was apparently
clearing again for action. Harold was helpless. He
called again and again, but nobody minded him now.
The sick were abandoned. But was it morning? was it
day, or night? The candles were burning dimly about:
and the air blew freshly down the companion way.
There was something cold and uncomfortable, but yet
very grateful in it.
Anon the windlass rung! voices were heard coming
over the ship's sidethe splash of oars.A gun!
another! and another!
Hourra! cried a wounded officer, we are in
port!
In port, said Harold.
Ayeis not that a salute? why, man, you have been
asleep the last fortnight, yard arm and yard arm.
The stranger appeared for a moment,his voice was
particularly solemn.
Man the long boat:arm the gigbring up the
prisoners, were successive orders.
The clank of fetters was soon heardthe dragging
of chains, and the heavy foot-fall of strong men, in
bondage.
Merciful heaven! cried Haroldcan these be
prisoners of war?
His companion stared at him a few moments without
opening his mouth, and then added
They are
Pirates
.
Pirates! echoed Haroldshuddering. He had
been taught to believe a Pirate, what he
is
, the most
damnable and dastardly of all the ruffians under heaven,
preying upon the defenceless, despoiling him, the poor
sailor, whose little pittance is literally wrenched from
the elements, at the constant peril of his life: a man that
riots in the blood and brains of his fellow men, yes, of
the widow and the orphan, and that too, upon the awful
solitude of the great deep, with the everlasting God all
about himand no human creature nearno hiding
placeno city of refuge, no sanctuarynone! O! of
what stuff must his heart be made, who can go out,
under
the boundless heaven, where there is no eye to pity,
and no arm to save, and bear down, in thunder and
lightning, with blood-red banners, upon the unarmed
and unresistinghewing and hewing them joint from
joint, the husband and the wife, old and young, the
mother and the babe!
Harold saw them executed. Only one was spared.
They were successively drawn up, to the yard arm, and
then let down part way, with a sudden jerk, which
caused the dislocation of their necks, like the report of
a pistol. Harold's blood curdledhis heart turned
sick, cold, cold as ice; and a clammy dew gathered on
it. He could
feel
it gathering, like the distillation of a
charnel house. I cannot bear this, said Harold, as
they run a poor fellow up like lightninga brief
struggle
,
a quick cry, and a loud crack followed! There
is such a horrible levity in itin the open sunshine, all
the business of life going forward under his eyes and
yet, perhaps, it is best, said the stranger. Harold
heard his voice and turned immediately to look upon his
face. It was shaded with his hand. Men ought to
know that all the business of life can go on without
them.
Harold laid his hand upon hisdo you know said
he, that I feel at this moment, precisely, as if I were a
witness against these menas if I had stood by and
seen their souls, arraigned, affrighted, naked,
shivering
and convulsed, before the judgment seat of God
himself. I do indeed. I cannot breathe with the thought.
A moment ago they were
herehere!
where I am, in
life and healthand now! O, may He be merciful to
them! Now they have received judgment! There is
the body quivering yet! but the soulwhere is
that
!
Do you feel thus, said the stranger, Young man
I venerate you for it.
And what think you of the reprieve?said he
in continuation.
I like that. I love mercy. I could kneel down
and thank them for sparing one life. And the very
sailorssee how they are affected by it! The populace
too, in the boatsthey are crying.
No. You are deceived. You must learn to think.
That reprieve was injudicious. Punishment should be
certain. Certainty
does more than
quantity
, in penal
codes, to counterbalance temptation. Were there but one
man in a million pardoned, every criminal would hope
that himself would be that man. Each expects the prize
in a lottery. No! these people are not weeping. They
are disturbed because they are disappointed. The
multitude
will run abroad at the alarm of fire, and venture
their necks to extinguish it; but let it prove a false alarm,
and they are angry. They love sensationthey love
spectacles.
Sophistry! said Harold smiling. Would you say
that a mother, who should hear that her child was burnt
to death, run to the spot and find it false; would you say
that she was angry because it was false? or because she
had been cruelly, and unnecessarily alarmed.
No, young man, your argument is ingenious. But I
speak truth. The populace will assemble to execute a
felon to day, with their own hands, and to morrow beset
the throne of justice for his pardon. I have seen this,
again and again. I have seen ten thousand people in
tears because a handsome boy was to be executed; and
I have seen the officer who brought his pardon, hooted
and pelted from the ground, by a part of the same mob.
Men sometimes sit down to cryand it is dangerous
to disappoint them. They have made up their minds
to be sentimental, and woe to him who interferes or
interrupts them.
I am not fond of arguing now; Mr. Bolton has made
me sick of it. It is unamiable and of evil tendency. He
who disputes, hardly ever attempts to storm his enemy's
entrenchments, without first abandoning his own. He
cannot assail the defences of his antagonists, but by first
leaving himself defenceless. Argument, like the sword
and the battle-axe, should be left for great occasions;
neither is an instrument for the fire-side.
I was once of a temper like
his
(looking towards
Bolton.) I was perpetually in a dispute; I was called
evil tempered, because I called myself so, and people
delighted to repeat it. I had my own purposes to
answer
by saying sofor I was weakand ruffians were
only to be intimidated, by learning that I was
inplacable
and
unrelenting
. But I am not. Young man, I take
an interest in you, and therefore I will speak freely to
you, more freely than I have for years, to any body.
What I know of you, pleases me; perhaps, because it
appears
to me that I was like you, at your age.
I have seen the time Sir, when I could convince
any man
of
any thing
, if I would take the trouble.
Because
,
no matter what I said, or how quickly, or on
what emergency it was said, it was never
unpremeditated
.
Harold smiled at the recollection of
her
sagacity,
whose remarks he had overheard.
No, he continued, what I said, however it
appeared
,
and I was willing that it should
appear
hasty, had
been deliberately considered before. You just expressed
some pleasure at this reprieve. I was sorry for it; hear my
reasons; and be accustomed to thinking boldly for
yourself
.
Trust to no man's authority. There are several
things to condemn in this affair. In the first place, all
the pirates are represented as penitent, and
assured
of
heaven. In the next place, he who is pardoned is kept
in ignorance of it, till the last moment.
Allow me, said Harold.Is not its effect the
greater:will not the criminal only, but the populace
remember it, with greater seriousness. He has
suffered
all but death:the ignominy, the anticipation, the
horrour, and the pain of such a death is nothing,
absolutely
nothing. I am sure of that, for I felt relieved
when their necks snapped. I expected something a
thousand times more horriblebut how instantly they
were motionless! Oh, there is no death so easy!
Right, young man, hence the glaring impolicy of
such executions; hence too the frequency of suicide by
hanging. Poor wretches! they see that the pain is
momentary
;
all feel as you did, at the sight of the first
execution. They expect to fall down, when the signal is
given, and yet they find that the reality is nothing to the
terrours of their own imagination. But let me proceed.
By delaying the reprieve until the last moment, for a
presumptuous and idle piece of dramatick effect
they
teach every man, at the gallows, to expect, even to the
last moment, the very last, a reprieve
.
Gracious God! cried Harold.Hence, every
man goes out of the world unprepared, in reality!
Yesand hence too, the hardihood and carelessness,
with which the most detestable ruffians go out of it;
depriving
the scene of all its terrours, making it a
brutal
farce, a trial of insensibility.
You are right. But why do you condemn their
penitence?
I do not, when it is penitence. But how likely
to be
affected
and how unlikely to be sincere. They
do not expect, or rather they are not
certain
of death,
and therefore they are not truly penitent. They are
too much agitated by hope and fear to become so.
Listen to me. Our system of punishment, reprieve,
and penitence, produces in every villain's heart just this
process of reasoning:
I will indulge my mortal appetite for blood
because
at the
worst
, if I
cannot
escape suspicion
cannot
bribe the witnesses, nor the juryand if my lawyer
cannot
get me clear by his wicked eloquence, by some
flaw in the proceedingsand if I
cannot
get a new trial
nor escape by subornationnor break prisonnor bribe
the gaolernor get a pardonnor a reprievenor a
commutation of punishmentnor get clear by some
revolution
,
political or moral, why, at the worst I can
repent
,
and go to heaven, at any rate
, with the whole
publick opinion in my favour, and the passport of many
a pious clergyman in my behalf; nay, who knows? I
may have a procession, a monument, an epitaph, be
interred in consecrated ground, and pass for a martyr, a
martyr to what! to the inexorable cruelty of my country's
laws.A pretty way to have those laws respected! a
most effectual antidote to temptation, and profligacy,
indeed!
No sirHarold, if you will allow me to call you
so
Do, I entreat you, I prefer it. And what shall I
call
you?
The stranger was completely caught. He smiled
faintlybut then, while his dark eyes penetrated
Harold's
very heart, and shot like dim lightning into it,
till he was fain to drop his eyelidsa thing that he
never did before, even in gazing at the meridian sun,
he laid his hand upon Harold's shoulder. Young
man, said he, have you any
design
in this?
Yes, answered Harold intrepidly.
Ha! said the stranger, frowning, and compressing
his lips,what may it be?
To know who, and what you are?
What!and you have the audacitybut stay: are
you employed?
Employed!said Harold, scornfully, and starting
upon his feet, employed! No!
And you ask only for your own gratification?
I do.
You shall be gratified. You are the first man
that has been so for many years. At the sword's point,
at the cannon's mouth, on the rack, at the stake, I
have been asked that question. It has never been
answered
.
Give me your hand. I am constrained to tell
you, and I do so, without any promise of secrecy.
My
name is Oscar
I am
Oscar! echoed Harold wildly, Oscar! surely I
have heard that name before.
I am an Englishmanof the
Vol. II. 2
O, I care not who, or what thou art! Thy name is
Oscar; that name is enough for me. I love that name.
I know not why nor wherefore, but it
is
very dear to
mesomehow or other, connected with my dreaming,
or my happiest moments. Well, well, henceforth I will
call thee, Oscar
Noneverexcept when we are together, and
alone.
Harold assented, and Oscar continued.
No, Harold, all this paraphernalia is absurd. The
dying man should not be seen to die. Imagination is
abundantly more powerful and terrifick in her
indistinctness
,
than any reality. Let the body drop behind a black
cloth, or into a box, and let us see nothing but the
agitation
of the rope, after our fellow creature is launched.
Oh! what fearful pictures will be drawn then, of his
convulsions, his spasms, his bursting blood vessels, his
starting eyes, and swollen lips, his chattering teeth,
with the bloody foam oozing from his nostrils, and
his imprisoned hands, cracking and shivering in every
joint! reaching, and straining at his throat!
O, forbear! forbear, Oscar! This circumstantiality
is so horrible, so unnatural!
Therefore do I press it upon thee, Harold. I do the
office of thine imagination, as if she were left to work
for herself. But she is not. She sees that the
victim
does not suffer, and she lies idle, except as to the
white cap, which she dare not lift up; and hence is it,
that, of all the horrible preparations which accompany
an execution, that of the
white cap
is the most distinctly
awful to the multitude, and remembered the longest,
spoken of too, with the most emphasis.
Another defect is this; men are executed in
day-light
,
and the mob go home, about their usual
occupations
.
Before their head is upon their pillows, all their
disquietude is gone, dissipated in the affairs of life.
But let executions be conducted at night, by torch light,
with tolling bells, at midnight, and what would be
their sensations then!permanent as life; and why?
Because they would go to their chambers, with all the
horrible reality ringing in their ears, swinging before their
eyes all night long. To the villain, the night would
appear interminable. To the good, it would bring
ten-fold
caution and distrust of themselves, and of every evil
passion.
No, Harold, No! I say it emphatically. There
should be no pardon, no reprieves, no commutation.
But if they
must
be, why let them be offered, at least
one day, before the time of execution. Let this rule
be inflexible. Have done with stage trick. Let a man
know that death is
inevitable;
and he will be agitated,
convulsed, and bowed down, if not with sorrow and
contrition
,
at least with terrour and dismay, the advantage of
which, to the publick, would be incalculable; while his
present indifference is productive of the most alarming
consequences. I have thought much on this subject,
Harold, and could I live over again(his voice faltered,
and Harold thought that a more deadly paleness
followed
for a moment)I might do
some good
yet.
His eyes were very wild as he said this, and a
troubled
expression passed athwart his high forehead.
Harold listened to him with veneration and delight. His
words were the words of wisdom. They were not to
be gainsaid. Day after day, held they such
conversations
together, until Harold's mind began to feel about,
and try her limbs in a new region. Harold never
forgot
his doctrines. On every subject there was something
peculiar and uncommon in his manifestations; but the
result was always satisfactory, and conclusive.
Of many examples that occurred during Harold's
brief acquaintance with him, it is in my power, to relate,
pretty nearly in his own words, one or two more, just
to show the peculiar energy and clearness of his
conceptions
.
They were speaking of toleration in religious matters
one day; and a man of great personal dignity and
scholarship
,
whom they had often seen at his devotions, was
announcing
certain opinions with considerable emphasis.
Nobody replied, until Bolton, first looking at Oscar, took
up the gauntlet.
Sir, said the clergyman (for so they found him to be)
this toleration is but another name for indifference.
We find people abundantly tolerant in matters, about
which they have no concern. Who is the most tolerant?
The atheist. Who the next? The deist. The least
so are those who are most deeply in earnest, right or
wrong.
My dear sir, said Bolton, I am astonished at
this doctrine. It is reviving the faggot and rack.
I should fear that, give it
power
, the same spirit would
torture us, and burn us for heretics.
O, no. We reason with heresy, we do not attempt
to force. We would not.
May not that be owing, Doctor, (the gentleman
bowed) because you have not the
power?
Why do
you use argument, persuasion?
From a conviction that we are right,
And consequently, that all who differ from you, are
wrong. Now, if you believe that to be right, is to go to
heaven
,
and to be wrong, is to go toI won't say where, how
can you reconcile it to your consciences, not to use every
engine, physical and moral force, and terrour, to make us
right? I see my neighbour upon a precipice, am I to
content myself with arguing and coaxing him away from
it? certainly not. May I not pluck him away by main
force? Surely then, if you
do
believe yourselves right,
you may be justified in using physical force, to convert
us, who think differently. Expostulatation is not
enough.
Surely, said Harold,for what force is more
irresistible than that of the mind? Is any influence
so seductiveso dictatorial? That man is not free
cannot bewhose opinions are subjected to the
argument
of a stronger, and mightier, and better disciplined
mind than his own. Therefore, you must, as Mr.
Bolton
says, either leave every man to find out his God, in
his own way, with such assistance as that God hath given
him, or you must permit any and every influence to be
exertedpersuasion, terrour, and force.
The divine appeared staggered for a moment, not so
much from the strength, as the unexpectedness of the
attack
.
He had been too long arguing with people of his own
persuasion, whom he found it mighty easy to convince:
all his bulwarks and entrenchments were in ruin, and
the enemy, a child, had broken in upon him, like an
inundation, before he had time to rally his thought.
He was silent, a good and great man, but one that
disdained
to
talk
, unless he were prepared. He cast an
appealing eye to Oscar, who appeared to take a deep
interest
in the question.
Oscar raised his head. These are matters, young
man, said he, upon which we ought not to speculate
lightly. If they be touched at all, it should be, upon
holy ground, with nakedness of feet, and heart. I
tremble when I hear the young and rash, trespassing
upon the mysterious confines of religion. There is one
law for them. It is plain and beautiful.
Do as you
would be done by
. It is the sum and substance of all
religion. It is the perfection of wisdom and love. But,
in seriousness, you are wrong. Your arguments,
Harold
,
would be good, and would justify
force, racks
,
and
tortures
, if force, and racks, and tortures could
convert the
mind
.
We may pluck a fellow citizen from the precipice by
main force, because, our purpose is accomplishedwe
save him by force.
But do we accomplish our purposeor
save
him,
by force, whom we torture to our creed? Noif we
could
mark meif we
could
so save a man's soul,
so
change his opinionand if we were firmly persuaded
that, unless he
did
change, he would be miserable forever,
then it would be our duty to torture and burn him:
Just as it is our duty to save a creature in spite of
himself, that rushes to the precipice, and gambols,
heedlessly
,
upon the brink.
But may we argue, and entice? Does not mental
force transcend physical force, as much as the soul does
the body? said Harold.
Certainly, and intellectual superiority
is
tyrannical.
We should be well assured therefore, at least of the
purity
of our intentions, when we attempt to influence
others; but once assured of that, an earnestness in the
attempt must ever be exactly in proportion to our
belief
in the exclusive superiority of our own creed.
2*
How benignant! how beautifully tranquil! said
Harold to Bolton, every moment developing newer
and higher qualitiesgrowing wiser and older with
the wise and the old; fighting every man with his
own weapons; and that, not for victory, but truth; look
at his countenance
now!
what sublime repose!
Harold felt an irresistible desire to prolong these
discussions
.
This strife of words!was it not a type of
his own warfare in the wildernesssuch coolness,
collectedness
,
composure? The planted footplanted
against the whole world, as in despiteand never
advancing
,
nor receding, but with a noble expression of
fearlessness, as if
sure
that the new ground was
familiar
alike to him, and that every step, no matter which
way it was taken, was one step toward the
consummation
of his purpose.
On another occasion, they had passed a slave ship. It
was in a hot latitude, and corpse after corpse was
plunged
into the warm blue water, as they lay a whole night
within hail of her, utterly becalmed, in a moonlight, so
holy, and so beautiful, that all the voices on board,
even those of lamentation, sounded like prayer in the
wind.
There was one universal pause of horrour and affright,
on board the ship, as something that floated past, was
discovered to be the naked body of a black; it was
bleeding
all over from the assaults of innumerable little fish
the eyes were eaten out of their sockets. But while they
were looking at it, and shudderinga sharp ripple was
seen approaching, and the next moment the body
disappeared
entirelythe water grew of a darker tinge, and
the trunk soon after emerged, gushing with crimson!
There was a general cry of horrour, as if they had seen
half of a living creature swallowed by a shark, and the
other half palpitating on the water, as their sick hearts
turned away in loathing.
Ten thousand curses on that vessel and her crew!
was the suppressed ejaculation of many; while others
groaned aloud, and Oscar stood, with the sweat starting
from his forehead, aud his hands clasped, and locked,
and raised.
He breathed aloud, as a sudden plunge announced the
interment of another from the slave ship.O God!
that I might open the batteries of this vessel upon her,
and send them all, at this moment, before thy seat, for
judgment!the murdered and the murderers, face to
face! the accuser and the accusedthe accurser and
the accursed! But
thy will be done!
A deeply interesting conversation followed, in which
Oscar did not participate, except at intervals, until he
was compelled, in a measure to it, by Harold. And
when he did, it was in a manner, so profound and
familiar
,
at the same time evincing such research, and
boldness, that men, who would have trembled and shrunk
from any other man that uttered the same snetiments,
clung to
him
with unaffected sincerity and affection.
With the soldier, said one, in speaking of him
afterwards
,
this extraordinary man has talked, till I
have heard him claimed as an accomplished captain;
with politicians, until I have seen them rise and
embrace
himlost in wonder at the clearness and
grandeur
of his speculations, the unspeakable wisdom and
foresight of his predictions. Yes, I have seen him
claimed, at the same moment, on a bet, by four different
professional men, each of whom was distinguished in
his way. You may judge of his powers, and of their
variety from that.
None liked him at first; none but him that could claim
kindred with him, could endure his lofty, stern aspect, at
times. In argument, he stood like some great captain
at bay, sure of the result, beleaguered in his retirement,
and permitting his enemies to exhaust themselves for
his amusement; making a sally, now and then, before
which, they were consumed and scattered, like dust in
a whirlwind of fire. Who could remember, young as
he was, when he had been conquered? where was the
man that could say to him, on any subject, thus far shalt
thou go, and no further! Often did he arise, like
some high priest, for the sacrifice, and his words then
were as the distinct, successive reverberations of thunder.
His look was inspiration, terrible, and overpowering,
not so much with the fire and splendour, as with weight
and solemnity. Often was his a passionate eloquence,
before which the wisdom of others became garrulity
and infatuation. Those who listened, listened in
thraldom
,
even when prepared for, and jealous of his power.
There was such an air of earnestness, assurance, self
conviction, such a total disregard of all trick and
preparation
he
was so plain, direct, and intelligible, that
every heart heaved as he approached, and discharged
itself of all suspicion, and all panoply.
On another occasion, while the matter of the slave
ship was still the theme of general execration and
horrour
,
Oscar turned slowly to one who had been holding
forth, uninterrupted, for a long time, as if sure of
sympathy
and accordance on such a theme. I like your
warmth, my dear sir, said he; it argues an
uncorrupted
heart, but permit me to tell you that it is a proof of
your inconsiderateness.
You are talking of the laws of England (his
opponent
was a lawyer) I have listened to you with great
pleasure. But you are mistaken. The laws of
England
do
justify slavery. You are startledyou wonder
at my presumption. Hearken a moment, and I will
convince
you that you have too hastily repeated the
language
,
and not the
doctrine
of Westminster Hall. Nay, more,
the Doctor there, has spoken a good deal, for which I
acknowledge myself deeply indebted to him, on the
conformation
and colour of the blacksand our good friend,
the clergyman has contended, erroneously I think, that
this accursed practice is interdicted by heaven. My
friends, I have but little to say. But I will undertake
to prove this proposition: namely, that slavery, as
it exists, in the British colonies, (for it is of them that
you are speaking) is justified, first, by scripture, next by
analogy through all the dependencies of nature; and
thirdly, by the history of all nations; and fourthly, Sir,
for
your
sake,
by the laws of England
and by all laws
human and divine.
One word, however, on another subject, before I
begin
.
These opinions of mine have been formed under
peculiar
and trying circumstances, and I forewarn you all,
that, notwithstanding your unwillingness to agree with
me, and all your prejudices against me, that I shall
certainly
convince you of some things that you now deem
impossible.
You smile, gentlemen. I do not wonder at it; but
I have convinced myself, and I have always found
that
more difficult than to convince another. I know myself.
You do not know me. You cannot. Yor underrated
me once, when we first encounteredI speak to
you
Mr.
Bolton; I crossed and thwarted you all, I fear, in
wantonness
.
I am sorry for it. Now you overrate me
It is always so with the world; while one is poor, he is
rated lower than he deserves; when he becomes rich,
he is rated higher. So with talent; the unknown are
underrated
the
known and eminent overrated. The
world love the marvellous, and the uncommon is their
aliment.
But sir, (addressing an old man) you are a
statesman
,
an Englishman, a friend of the black man. So am
I. It is our duty to follow truth, wherever it shall lead
us, to discharge our hearts of all prejudice: and if we
would do the African justice, to be wary and circumspect
against his enemies. Follow mewatch mebeware of
yourself and me.
What is slavery? Are we to depend upon the
definition
of men that make books? That is one thingbut
the slavery that
is
, is a qualified servitude, not moral
nor intellectual, involving neither life nor limb.
But, say the lawyers,Aristotle (for
he
was a
lawyer then) Grotius, Puffendorf, et
id genus omnes
,
Slavery is absolute. That is, they give a definition of
it, and then prove that it cannot exist! Say they, no man
can give up his moral freedom. The laws of God are
paramount to all others. No man can give to another
the right to make
him
violate the laws of God. But this
is nonsense. It is reasoning in a circle. Man cannot be
a slave because he cannot give up his moral liberty: and
he cannot give up his moral liberty, because he cannot
be a slave.
All the arguments of these great men only go to prove
that no such thing as a
slave
can be, in any way, right or
wrong. But such a thing
is
, nevertheless. The fault
then, must be in
their
definition. Take my definition
a slave is one held to perpetual servitude, having no
right of propertywhose posterity are slaves. Now
this
is the condition which I am to prove is justified by
all law, human and divine.
Slavery, say the lawyers too, can be in three ways
only: first, by warsecondly, by purchasethirdly by
birth.
But, say they too, in neither of these ways
can
one become a slave! Not by war; for the only right
you have over your enemy's life (as if the master must
necessarily hold the
life
of his slave at his mercy) is for
your own safety. The moment then, that you forbear
to kill him in battle, that minute you
prove
that his
death is not necessary to your life, and consequently
your right over him ceases!Not by purchase,
say theybecause the property of the slave is the
property
of the masterand consequently, the moment that
the money is paid into the hands of the slave, the
bargain
is complete, and slave and money are both
belonging
to the master. This cannot be a fair purchase, and
therefore there can be no slavery by purchase:None
by inheritancebecause, there being no way to make
slaves of parents, there can be no such thing as slavery
by birth! Sir, I appeal to you. Is not that the argument,
ten thousand times repeated, of your greatest lawyers
and civilians?
The lawyer bowed assentand blushed.
Now, let us examine this, step by step. They grant
me the right of killing my enemy in battle. Does not
the greater involve the less? And who shall judge of
this necessity? I, and I alone. If I may take his life,
surely I may take his limbs; and surely, if I am willing
to hazard the trial, I may venture to bind him, and bear
him off; and if my right to kill him, arise from his being
my enemy, I may slay him at home, and at leisure, on
the first symptom of disobedience.
No, said the lawyer. There is no compact.
None express. I admit. But is there not one implied?
Is it not for his benefit? And has not he, the power, if he
find servitude worse than death, of escaping from it, at any
time, by death. Besides, battle is a game. The
parties
play for profit. The prisoner is the property of his
conqueror, all over the world; his
slave
emphatically.
This is so, not only in Barbary, but all over Europe.
Prisoners of war are made to work upon the fortifications;
and are exchanged or delivered up, without ransom,
only by especial treaties. Besides, they are chained and
murdered, whenever the conqueror pleases. Witness
Agincourt
. Battle is a game; and its penalties must be
paid. Having a right over the life of mine enemy,
with nought but mine own discretion to regulate its
exercise
,
I have a right to forbear, at any peril, to take his
life; and a right to commute it, if I please, into perpetual
servitude, to which his assent must be implied, because
he has the power in his own hands of returning to the
original agreement, when he pleases, and exchanging
servitude for death.
2d. But he cannot be a slave by purchase! The
reason
, you have seen. But what is to prevent him from
becoming a slave by purchase, if the money go to
another
,
as a parent? Cannot a son ransom a father?
Cannot
a debtor sell himself for money, already received?
By war and purchase then, slavery
may
arise, and
consequently it may, for ought that we see, by birth.
But is there not a fourth way! Cannot a man
forfeit
his right to liberty by his crimes? surely he may.
What are the jails, galleys, prison-ships, and courts of
justice that we see, but proofs of this? Is not
imprisonment
slavery? Is it not an atonement, in servitude, to the
offended law?
But I disdain all this. I scorn to rely upon it. I
have only argued thus, to show to what an enormous
extent
,
the admission of the wisest and best men, will go,
if vigorously pursued. Only grant to me the right of
taking my enemy's life; and a slavery follows, infinitely
more terrible than any we know, because a perpetual
enmity
will be between the conqueror and captive, and,
of course, a perpetual power of life and death, in the
former, over the latter. Grant to me the right of going
to war, and letting myself, my limbs and life, out to hire,
and it follows, of necessity, that I may stipulate with my
master, by contract, that he may hew me to pieces when
it shall please him. Grant me the right of legislatures
to take away the life or limb of a subject, and I will
prove, therefore, that he may dispose of both, just as he
pleases
But I rely on the whole doctrines of analogy, and
law. The company were here apparently confounded
by the rapidity and suddenness of his combinations. They
were endeavouring to follow him.
Man! said the clergyman, would that I could
answer thee, but I cannot. There is an obliquity in
thy vision, and thou seest things, not as thou shouldst,
but as thou wouldst. All thy sublime faculties, for it
is in vain to deny thy powerit is enough for us to
resist itare warped and perverted, by a diseased
ambition
.
But go on! go on, thou dangerous man!
The stranger smiled, but resumed, in a melancholy
tone, like one assured of his own resources, and
confident
of victory. This is what I expected, my dear,
sir; but have patience.
Slaves are protected, in life and limb, in all
countries
;
call them what you please, villains, bondmen,
cerfs, helots, boors, peasants, or what not. If they are
slain by their masters, the latter only escape, by their
power; and that will protect
any
man, at
any
time, in
the commission of
any
crime.
But may a man bind himself to servitude for life?
Oh no, say you of the long robe,
He cannot
. But
you say falsely. Your equity courts will perhaps enjoin a
specifick
performance of such contracts, where the
servant
is an artizan, for instance; and your law courts do
it effectually, by making the servant pay for a breach of
contract, or, if he cannot, by sending him to prison, where
he completes his term of slavery, if his master be so
disposed
.
Are not all men slavesservantsuntil they are
twenty-one, in England; and twenty-five in France? Is
there any reason why this minority should not be
shortened
or lengthened? Does not the law enforce this?
Do not apprentices bind themselves for many years,
and does not the law enforce their contract? What is
a bankrupt but a
slave
to his creditordoes not the latter
swallow up all his earnings, often and often?
What is impressment? Our celebrated
Habeas
Corpus
is useless there. Do not soldiers, sailors, nay, every
officer of government and every individual, dispose of
their liberty, in a more or less unqualified manner, as in
marriage? and does not the law hold them to it? Is not
even a clergyman a servant, bound by law, to the
performance
of his appointed servitude? So are your
judges and your government at the universities.
Thus we see that men
may
and
do
bind themselves,
for months, years, nay, for their lives, under the sanction
and authority of the law, and let the compensation go to
their families, or to any third person.
But can they divest themselves of the right to
property
?
That, we know, is a distinctive badge of slavery.
We say yes; why not? Does not the man, who
involves
himself in debt, do this? Is it not, in effect,
abandoning
the
right
to property, if, by no possible event, he
can ever possess anyif it must all belong to his
creditors
.
Do not men, daily, contract obligations, which leave
them,
thus
, without any
right
to property? Or suppose
that they have the
right
left. It is as useless, as it would
be to the slave, who should be bound to pay his master
100,000 pounds, when he should have a
right
to all that
he could afterwards get.
A man may then, by contract bind himself to
servitude
for life; and divest himself, effectually, of all right
to property.
But may he bind his posterity?
This seems a question
of great difficulty at first. But where is the hardship?
Is it not heaven's appointment? Are not the sins of the
father visited upon the children? Do not the vices and
disgraces of a father, as well as his virtues, descend
to his children? Are not diseases hereditary? Is
it not wise that they should be so? What can more
effectually teach circumspection, to the dissolute and
abandoned, than the knowledge that this is so? Does not
the property of a parent descend to his children? and in
Vol. II. 3
a measure, do not his obligations? In justice they ought.
There would be no hardship in it.
The lawyer smiledBut sirthis is only
declamation
analogythe
law if you please.
The law! sir, I should scorn to introduce it, on such an
occasion, with all its absurdities, and nonsense, so
technical
and unintelligible, did you not drive me to it. But
since you have, I will show
you
, sir, that the
law
supports
it in principle.
Have you studied the civil law? At first, you know,
the child was obliged to answer the obligations of his
father. This might be very wise, because it would
teach that father circumspection, as in our doctrines of
forfeiture, and attainder in high treason.You are
startled sir,But I have not half done. After this, the
heir was permitted to choose between taking the estate
and paying the debts, or refusing it, and escaping. And
finally, he was permitted, by
indulgence
, to wait until
the value of the estate was known, before he chose.
So much for the Roman law. Now for
yours
.
What is your whole doctrine of warrantylineal and
collateralbut an entailed obligation upon a man's
posterity
?
Nay, even upon his kindred? What your doctrines
of inheritance? And what your doctrine of allegiance?
Here
I am peremptory, sir, and emphatick, because
this
contains the very principle, for which I contend. A man
binds his posterity, forever and ever, by merely begetting
them.
By the divine and human law; the laws of Rome
and England, a man may bind his posterity. Here are
the three constituents of slavery! Are not the elements,
I submit it to
you
, sir, are they not all found in the
British constitution, and in the doctrines of British law?
The lawyer
was
astonished. But he had the manhood
to admit it. And now, sir, for you (to the clergyman),
I have paid some attention to the bible, and I believe that
I can give you authority, chapter and verse, from that, to
justify slavery; and then, the practice of all nations.
O, sir, not so fast, said the clergyman, the
practice
of all nations will prove nothing for you. There is
no crime but may be so justified.
I beg
your
pardon, sir. And I believe that you will find
that there is no
crime
whatever, which
all
nations have
united in being guilty of. Each nation has its
own
,
I admit. But slavery is justified and practised by all
nations
,
and unless war be another, there is no example of
such unanimity in any
criminal
action.
The bibleif you please, sirthe Hebrew,said
the divine, a little nettled.
Well, the Jews made slaves, and they were
God's
chosen people. I remember many express regulations
on the subject. A father might sell himself from
poverty
,
25 Lev. 39. He might sell his children, 21 Ex. 7.
A thief was sold, when he could not pay his fine, 22. Ex.
3, 4. Creditors could seize and sell their insolvent
debtors, or their children, 2 Kings, c. 4, v. 1. Prisoners
of war could be sold. A Hebrew slave, ransomed from
a gentile, might be sold. Hebrews were slaves to
Hebrews
for six years.
What more shall I say? The whole scriptures are
full of ordinances and canons on the subject of slavery.
Shall I look for analogy? Do we not find, through all
creation, a perpetually diminishing gradation, order and
dependence? through the animal, vegetable, and mineral
kingdom? Is not one man stronger and wiser than his
neighbour? Is not dependence and servitude natural to
the weak? Even in the cradle, you find distinctive
attributes
;
Hercules and his brother were not more unlike
than twins often are. Nature, God himself, through all
his illimitable universe, has established different
degrees
of dependence. This qualified slavery is but one.
On the whole then, you justify slavery, said Harold,
shuddering. Yesslavery, as I have defined it, and
as it
is
. Do not mistake me. I do not justify the
stealing
slaves, or going to war, for the purpose of capturing
human creatures. But I say this, that a man, as free as
I am, at this hour,
may bind himself and posterity to
perpetual
servitude; and abandon the right of property for
himself and them
, and thus make himself a
slave
, in the
truest sense of the word, under the English law, if
principles
and analogy be followed.
This long, long discussion endedthe company
separated
for the night, but Harold heard some one, in
passing
him say, audibly, in his ear, Beware of that man!
He turnedthere was no one whom he could suspect,
except the clergyman, and the old man. He went
forthwith
to Oscar, and told him what he had heard.
Oscar pressed his hand. The warning
was
friendly;
regard it, Harold. Beware of me. I say the same.
Indeed
,
indeed, Harold, he added. in a melancholy, wild
voice, while he laid Harold's hand to his heart,All
is not right
there
Haroldno, nor
here
, (putting it to his
foreheadHarold's teeth chatteredit was as cold as
death!)
I am afraid that I am not in my right senses
.
Harold was so touched by the tone, in which this was
said, that he burst into tears!
Oscar, said he, tenderlywould I could comfort
theethou most extraordinary man! what can I do for
thee?
I know notleave me. It were best for thee and
me, Harold, that we never met again. Thy sympathy
will be fatal to thee else. Leave me!
Harold gazed upon him in astonishment. A new
expression
floated athwart his pale countenance, like the
shadow of spirits upon the water, at midnight,when
the moon shines.
Young man, said Oscar, beware! What the
united
opposition and enmity of the whole world hath failed
to do, for whole years, thou hast done, by one simple
ejaculation. Thou hast touched my heart. Its panoply
is shivered. Its iron is dissolving. Its poison is diluted.
In one wordI love thee, Harold, and there was a time
when I never meant to say
that
to any human being.
Harold, look at me. Thou canst form some notion of
what I might have been, by what I am. But thou never
canst entirely know, how wickedly and wantonly I have
misapplied my power. At this moment, I feel the
rebuke
of thy youthful nature so overpowering to me, that
mine grows unsteady, reels and repents before it.
Repent! cried Harold, repent of what! of
having
silenced the old and the wise, taught wisdom to grey
hairs, and borne all before thee, in the irresistible strength
of thy coming and going!
Yea, even of that, do I repent me Haroldeven of
that! I see in thee, the same unhallowed, regardless
spirit. I implore thee, Harold, I adjure thee, dear
Harold
,
as I would my brother, or my child, to strive with
it,wrestle with it, night and day; else wilt thou be,
what I am, a dreaded and avoided man, repulsive and
unsocial. Like me, thou art striving for any dominion,
so it be
absolute
, for
any:
though compounded of hatred
and distrust. Beware of it; it is a lying spirit. It will
make thee (lowering his voice, and speaking in a tone
that thrilled through and through the marrow of his
proselyte) detested, shunned, abhorred!none will love
theenone endure theebeware!
Harold's arms, already reached to embrace the
sublime
creature, in his desolation, dropped powerless at his
side, as if struck down by an invisible weapon, at the
sound of his voice.
He stood appalled, quaking. His spirit which, a
moment before, was all up in arms with that of Oscar,
as it stood and swayed the very senses of men, now
tottered
in his rebuke, like a child before the stern
countenance
of a giant.
All this was inexplicable. The more he thought of it,
the more mysterious and perplexing it became. Whence
this sympathy, this awe? was Oscar unhappy? No. It
could not be called unhappiness. It was something
darker
,
loftier. There were times, when his keen, searching
eye, appeared turning inward, and surveying some
empire
in ruins;when a cold, discontented, but majestick
shadowing of the brow would follow, and he would
smileignorantly it might be, but his smile was the
sarcastic
levity of an enthroned spirit, looking down, with
patient forbearance, upon the petty, and annoying
calamities
of life. It was the look of something wicked in its
nature, restrained from the commission of evil, only by
contempt for its littlenesswithheld from revelling
in the excess of consummate guilt and devastation, only
because guilt was of such every-day occurrence. At
times too, Harold had seen his countenance, by lamp
light, instantaneously changed, as it were to a pale bronze;
and over his high white forehead, he had seen the faint
3*
crimson rush so suddenly, as to startle himlike the
reflection
of a red meteor, in passing, as if some unknown
element, etherial as the hue of sunset, had been suddenly
let loose in his bosom, and flashed, instantly, through
all his extremities. And he had seen him too, when he
turned deadly pale, while he was alone, and silent;and
then the waking up, the shifting of his wild and
beautiful
eyethe mournful and expressive tenderness, the
immaterial, spiritual solemnity of his manner, as he
strove to recover his collectedness, were wonderful
things to the observation of poor Harold; things of
inconceivable
interest.
Their attachment increasedthey had been blown out
of their course, and the passage had been, already, of an
unprecedented length, and they now occupied the same
state room; till, at last, Oscar appeared uneasy when
they were not together. This was what Harold coveted.
He wanted this study all to himself. So many noble,
unearthly
,
heroick qualities were only given for the
contemplative
.
The apparent sullenness and misanthropy of
Oscar soon took their real shape and dimensions. It
was wretchednesswretchedness, so extreme, and
hopeless
,
that Harold, yea, even Harold himself, who never
wept at any corporeal agony of his own, absolutely
sobbed
as though his heart were breaking, as he saw Oscar,
one night, when he awoke by chance, leaning backward
in his birth, the whole live-long night, with his eyes shut,
and the lamp shining in his facehis hands locked upon
his bosomand large drops of sweat standing upon his
forehead and temples. His breathing was audiblelike
the beating of a heart oppressed to suffocation. Harold
watched him, after this, night after night. He found
that he never appeared to sleep. He was wasting away,
in silence, as by some mortal poison, and Harold could
see him fade, while he was talking with him. What kept
him alive? he knew not. He ate not, drank not, and
the rigid determination of his countenance, waxed, every
hour, more steady, resolute, deadly and sublime.
Thus many nights had passed, and poor Harold, who
had but lately recovered from the agitated and passionate
remembrance of his parting with Loenawould shiver
now, as if an ague were upon him, from pure sympathy
with the solitary and afflicted stranger.
But this could not last forever. At midnight he was
suddenly aroused. A cold hand lay upon his bosom. He
awoke, and found little Leopold clinging to him, and
gasping for breath.
Arise! cried a voice, that he had never heard
before
.
Harold's hair bristled. Arise, repeated the
voice. He
had
heard it before! It was dark, awfully
dark. The voice appeared to come from a great
height above him. Where was he? It was the voice of
a high wind. He endeavoured to recollect himself; but
the horrours of superstition were upon him, and his
joints rattled, as he shrunk backward from the cold hand,
that still pressed upon him, with supernatural strength.
For his soul, he could not articulate a sound. An
unaccountable
fear made his flesh creep. Was he awake?
He wasfor he felt poor little Leopold quaking under
the clothes, as if he had been dislocated by some
frightful
apparition.
A loud tread upon deck, and the changing of the tiller
and then the huge flapping of the main sheet, as if it were
rent fore and aft, by the movement, followed the voice
and shook Harold almost from his birth. A strong gleam
of light shone down the steps, and through the sky lights,
and rested upon an opening door opposite, where the
lamps were expiring in blue smoke. WhatHa!
what art thou? cried Harold, and fell back, with a
loud groan, into his birth. The cries of Leopold, half
frantick with terrour, soon brought assistance. And who
was that beingwhat was itwhence? It was Oscar,
but so worn and ghastly, so frightfully altered, since
Harold
had seen him, in the morning, before he shut himself
up in his room, that Harold could hardly believe his
senses. He stood before him like a dead manhis
hollow
eyes and sunken templesO! if ever death were
preternaturally
busy, it was then!The dew of the
sepulchre
was upon his limbs. The veins on his livid
forehead
were full and swollen, and dark and agitated, like
live wormsand when the pressure of his fingers was felt
upon Harold's wrist, his pulse stopped!the blood
retreated
,
shivering, to his heartand even that organ
seemed
to contract and hide itself with a mortal spasm at the
touch. Oscar put his hand upon Harold's foreheadhis
very brain grew coldand he shuddered, as he put it
aside, almost with rudenesswhence art thou to night?
Art thou Oscar? Speak! cried Harold, his teeth almost
chattering with affright.
Arise! cried the voice that he had heard twice
before
.
Was it his? O, it could not beit came from
a farfarplacethe depth of the ocean, mayhap, or
the hollow caverns of heaven.But Harold obeyed,
mechanically
.
They ascended to the deck. Lord! what
a night it was! The whole firmament was embossed, with
flowered silverall over white and shining, with a
profusion
of gems, glittering prodigally about it, like powdered
jewelleryseed pearls, thrown by handfuls over some
magnificent white velvet tenting cloth.
Come hither, said the same melancholy, distant
voiceHarold looked whence the sounds issued, but the
lips were motionlessCome hither! it repeated,
drearily
.
They approached the stern of the vessel.
I have seen her! said the voice.
Seen whom!
Hush! hush! it cried, I have seen her. Lo!
there she rises! Look there upon her. Dearest! I am
coming. O God what a voice! thought Harold, so
sweet, so tender, so plaintive,O, I would follow it to
the depths of the ocean!Harold looked where Oscar
pointed, and saw, or fancied that he saw, afar off, a dim
shadow, emerging, in the bright wake of the ship. Could
it be possiblegreat heaven, it is approaching! cried
Harold, gasping for breath.
Hush, hush! said Oscar with increased solemnity
his eyes glistening dreadfully in the moonlightHush,
She is coming. Speak not, breathe notor the charm
is broken. Harold shut his eyes.
Oscar waved his arm. There is thy ring, love, take
it, he said, in a low, disconsolate voice. I will
reclaim
it, in thy bridal chamber, ere the moon hath set,
plucking somewhat from his hand, and throwing into
the water.
What, is it gone! said Harold doubtfully, as he
ventured to open his eyes. Hush! boyhush! or I
will strangle thee on the spot, whispered Oscar. But
Harold could see nothing now. She has descended
for the ring!There! there!now lookshe has it
she has it! how it glitters upon her pale finger!
Harold
,
give me thy handI cannot see theewhere art
thoufarewellI would look upon thee, would kiss thee
once, ere we part forever, for I love theebutI
cannot
,
dare not take my eyes from her face again.
Farewell
!
I am going.Twelve years ago, I lost herby
merely turning away my eyesfor twelve years I have
hunted herthrough earththrough airthrough sky
and ocean.Farewellbe quickbe quickThis is
the appointed hourmidnightdearest! I cannot come
till midnight is accomplishedthou knowest that.It
was here, Haroldone moment moremy heart beats
timeIt was
here
that IIIslew her
here!
in
the middle of the oceanand
here
we meetdear
creature
!broken
heart, with broken heartthe ocean our
sepulchreour bridal chamber!
Before Harold could put out his handOscar's night
dress brushed by him, and he saw him alight upon the
water, at an amazing distance, astern. His first impulse
was to follow himbut Leopold, with his head in his
bosom, still clung distractedly about his neckHis next
wasbut it was too late, the vessel was sailing like a hawk
through the heavens,to call for assistance. He
shrieked
but
he could not make himself heard. His knees
knocked together. At this moment, the vessel shifted
her course, and in her glittering wake, just as the watch
at the top cried out a man overboard, and all hands
flew to put her abouthe saw a somethingcould it be
he felt that he was cruelly disturbedbut indeed it
appeared
to him, as he rubbed his eyes, and gazed upon it,
that there were two figures in the water, toiling and
toiling
togethernay, he was sure of itfor he distinctly
saw two black spotsand then they seemed to approach,
and stand up, upon the wave.
He was gonegone forever. They put about, and
sent out their boats in all directions; and covered the sea
with plank and casks and spars lashed with ropes, but
the moon went down, darkly, and there was no hope
left.
Harold seemed rooted to the spot. He suffered the
child to be taken from him, without knowing how, or by
whom. He felt a fearful apprehension that he himself
should die in some such terrible mannerin delirium.
Was he not like Oscar? alike in every strong and terrible
attribute?every evil passion?melancholypeculiar?
loving and beloved?to distractiondeath!
with
,
and
by
a broken heart?an outcast tooan abandoned
one! O God of my fathers! he cried, in the agony of
his spirittake me also. O take me
now
, even now, in
my unpreparednesslet me not live to be a madman!
She is goneshe!the unspeakably dear one. I feel
her chamber in my heart, cold, cold, and desolate
untenanted
it
is a sepulchre! Yeashe is gone. And
O, I pray thee, let me be with her! The waters are
rolling
between us.She is tempted, perhapsand where
am I?She is weary and dyingand I am afar off!
For the first time, now, poor Harold began to feel, in
its extremest latitude, the doubtfulness and apprehension
of love. Hitherto, he had been assured and confident;
and while he turned back, with a swelling heart, to the
western horizon, and thought, in the deepest devotion of
his spirit, with his hands trembling upon his bosom, of
his dear Indian girl, the gentlest and kindest of human
beings,her, who would have laid down life for him, a
thousand times overthe creature of heroick, but untried
principleand when he so turned, with these holy and
uplifting thoughts, he was happy, even under the
apprehension
that she waspossibly, no moreor what was
yet worse, possibly alienated from him!But
now
, he
was miserableyea, the most miserable of God's
creatures
.Why
did he ever leave her! he asked himself a
thousand and a thousand times.Where was
she?
among
strangersand he!upon the pathless watershutting
his eyes wilfully upon the only star that shone upon
him in his desolation!leaving it to go outunthought
oflike a neglected vestal fire, in the far heaven.
How wild and visionary are our dreamings at such a
season! How Memory, the wizard, delights to dwell
upon, and aggravate all that we have lost; hallowing and
touching out with a melancholy tenderness, every bright
and beautiful spot, in our long journeying of the past, and
concealing, with a gentle waywardness, which we,
ourselves
,
while feeling the amiable deception practised upon
us, have not the heart to resist!every infirmity, every
unlovely part, every unholy feature and expression; all
are shrouded in twilighthidden, like the secret ravages
of death in the consumption, under colour and light,
radiant
eyes, and yet more radiant lipsand all that was
endearing, affectionate, captivating, is recalled, with a
bewitching regard to allurement, and more exquisitely
tinted anew, with beauty and delicacy. The faded
flowers
are newly perfumedthe grave yard sprinkled anew,
and frankincense burnt, amid musick, and prayerand
the faces of the dead are hidden, benignantly, that we
may not be too much terrified with the awfulness of
reality
.Emotions,
long since forgotten, are set thrilling
anew, like neglected harpsupon which, it is said, that the
spirits of the departed love to repose their fingers, and
breathe their melodious breath.O what reveries come
to us in these hours of enchantment! The great solitude
of the heart is newly lighted up, and newly peopledand
musick and dancing are there!as in a great city after a
pestilence.The spirits of them that died have their
revelry and feasting, under the necromancy of that
enchanter
,
Memory!
Poor Harold! a new and impatient sense of
confinement
followed the deep revery of his heart. He panted
to tread back the waters; and clasp his dear girl once
more! only once more! to his heart; and then, if so it
should please God, to abandon forever, all his fiery and
fierce schemes of ambition, quench all his arrows that
were stacked for dominionand enter, hand in hand, the
untrodden solitude of the graveand there be with her
and aloneforever and ever! O if that might be
he had no other wish, nor prayer!
His temples grew animate with the thought. His veins
swelled, as if he were exciting all his mental energies to
upheave some weight that threatened to overwhelm him.
Nature could no longer endure it. He faintedand
slept. A delicious and shifting dream came to him, in
his slumber, but all that he could remember, when he
awoke, the following day, was, that his lips had once
more thrilled to the touch of hers! his dear one's.
There came a beautiful tranquillity and assurance in the
thought. It seemed that he had revenged her,
how
,
he knew not; but when away from all that we love,
there will come such delicate insinuations of wrong, in
the one, or the other part, and we become
so
tenderly
solicitous to meet once more, and press the dear hand
of our beloved, and reassure our hearts that we are
forgiven
.
There was a melancholy oppression upon
Harold
,
when he awoke. He could have covered his face
and wept, in the mere lunacy of passionate tenderness;
and yet, he was less unhappy than usual,
notwithstanding
the sudden and terrific death of Oscar. But he
soon awoke more fully to a sense of his situation. The
month, the season, nay the very day struck upon his
recollection, like the knell of death. It had been nearly
fatal to him once before; and this season had ever been
peculiarly inauspicious. He trembled as the thought
arose, with undefinable apprehension, like one
approaching
the scene of some early and distracting bereavement,
some consecrated spot, where he wept and parted
perhaps
forever, with the dear creature of his affection
the unspeakably beautiful and cherished onesome
place, where he first heard the sorrowful annunciation
of some calamityno matter what. Who can approach
the insensible things that were about us at such a
moment
be
it but a chaira green turf seatan old tree
nay though it be the brightest and greenest spot on
earth, who can approach it, after years have passed
a ay, without growing weaker in every joint,without
mournful, and sweet associationsattended, while his
eyes are filling and his lips tingling, with some melancholy
presentiment that
all
has not yet been done in the way
of desolation and bereavement!
Thus it is with
time
. We are naturally gifted with
superstition. Whatever is mysterious, is
preternatural
in the philosophy of simple hearts. They love to
imagine dependencies and associations where they are
touched. And thus, an event, mournful or festive,
happening
to some gay reveller, under extraordinary
circumstances
,
makes a lasting impression on him. The
season
comes round again, and he remembers it, with woe or
jubilee, according to its character. His heart quakes or
palpitates till the appointed day, week or month, or
perhaps
season, hath wholly past. On that day, he weeps
and gives up his spirit to futurity: or falls to exploring,
with bright eyes, and a confident step, the shadowy
solitude of time and space. Perhaps, while he is thus
occupied, another event, which at every other season had
been disregarded, or forgotten, takes place, holding
affinity in mournfulness or pleasure, with the first.
If the former, his heart is wrung with ten-fold cruelty.
The season becomes accursed, to him. He dreads its
return
and
feels that a portion of the blessed year, is
under a blight; a part of the sun's path through a
perpetual
eclipse for him.
Let the wisest deny it if he can? All men have their
fortunate and unfortunate seasons of adventure; their
preferences, partialities and antipathies, even to
inanimate
things. The wise are only so, in their choice
of objects. Yea, we may say what we will; the
sternest of us will truckle, and look about him, with a
troubled and disconsolate air, as that day approaches,
or that month, which has been successively calamitous to
him. Yea!and the soberest, will enter rather more
confidently upon any undertaking, if it occur to him, at
the time, that, in similar undertakings he has hitherto
been successful, at similar
seasons;
for after all
what is the difference,seasons and places, become
lucky or unlucky to him.
What are our anniversariesjubileesfestivals, but
a tacit acknowledgment of this?
I speak from neartfelt experience. In my boyhood,
when I ran, barefooted over the wild mountain, heedless
of aught but the flowering precipice, and the blue water,
there was one month, one! in which I was first
distinguished
;
Vol. II. 4
that month was ever after a festival to me: and
there was another, in which I have been forever
disappointed
,
broken down, and discomfited. And now, even
in my old age, I feel a tenfold assurance, that whatever
I can begin and conclude in that former month, will be
happily concluded. In that month I was never
disappointed
,
never visited by sorrow, or sickness, or
mortification
.
Nay moreI am weary of the world, and I feel
assured and certain that in that month, I shall dieand
be happy.
The wise will call this folly. It may be soit may
be too, that the very belief of failure or success may
lead to it. It may be, that, in the season of flowers, if
aught of an unpleasant aspect obtrude itself upon us, we
persist in believing that there are goodness and beauty
under its disguise: it may be that we thus perfect the
delusion, by perpetual industry. And yet, all the
reasoning
and authority of experience cannot dislodge the
tremendous belief that occupies my mindthatif I
should
die in that month of sorrow and disappointment,
I should die a death of horrour, unutterable horrour: but
I shall notI shall be gathered to my fathers, I am sure,
in the blessed month.
Would heaven that I might believe in the consolation
of philosophy, at such a momentbut I cannot. To
religion only, can I lookwith her have I abided and
found comfort. Thrice, in the listlessness of my heart,
have I been torn and lacerated by the wantonness, or
wickedness, or rashness of othersthriceyea thrice,
mortally wounded, where I had put my whole of
happiness
,
here and hereafter, I fear, upon the casting of a die.
Thrice have I been shipwrecked, in foam and wind
and lost my all. Thrice have I been brought down to
the very dust, and prayed that I might no longer live.
Cruelty and desolation beset me, like famished
blood-hounds
.
But, my nature arose above it all. The same
month, yea almost the same
day
, was the successive
witness of my annual tribulation, for many years. But,
it hath passed. I was made, by the great and good God,
to be happy, and I have always felt that he would not be
thwarted in his appointment.
With thoughts like these crowding upon
him
, and his
poor brain fevered under their importunity, Harold
consumed
hour after hour in panting, with a sort of sullen
impatience, for the arrival of the ship to some land, he
cared not where, so that he might tread firmly, once
more upon the earth, and feel no longer the everlasting
motion, heaving, and giddiness of the sea.
While lying in this way, one afternoon, with a
disposition
guardedly contracting from all intercourse with
others, he was startled by a hurried movement on deck
a prolonged cryand a general rushing and trampling.
He listened, and a musquet was fired just over his head.
He raised himself up, and discovered, through the distant
window, a sail. No great matter, one would thinkbut
after an endless voyage, over the lonely and unfrequented
solitudes of the ocean, every animate and inanimate thing
is pleasant; every thing that reminds you of your
relationship
to other human beings. You are, as the
survivors
of the floodnot
certain
but that the dry land
may have passed away since you left it; not
certain
,
until you meet some other human being, like yourself,
adrift upon the water, but that
you
are the wreck of a
whole world. You may smile at this extravagance, but
is it not, may it not be, the thought of the weary mariner?
Yea, even of the philosopher?
O! it
is
pleasant to find another creature coming
toward
you, with all her sails spread, as if she floated over
the horizon, or emerged from the blue vapour of the
firmament, if it be only to show you that you are not,
as you believe, in the very centre, fixed and motionless,
forever and ever, of the round ocean. For this
is
the
belief of the senses, go as you will, on the wings of the
windyou have nought in heaven or earth to mark your
progress: a perfect circle, beyond which, as if it were
an enchanted one, it seems impossible to passyou are
forever in the centre! and the boundary flies from you,
as you pursue it.
A single sail, thus breaking out of the sky, like a great
angel with his wings spread, comes to your weary and
sick heart, like a celestial visitant; and brings home to
it: with an emphasis, that few can withstand, and none
who have not been at sea, can comprehend, all the
beautiful
,
and tender, and comfortable recollections of home.
Harold arose and went on deck. It was a calm; and
the boats of the stranger were soon alongside, and the
usual inquiries and compliments were interchanged. His
return to the deck was hailed with triumphant
acclamations
.
He had become, in spite of his reserved and
haughty demeanor, which, in the world would have been
mistaken (if he became distinguished) for a princely
spirit of command, quite a favourite with every one
whom he had thought fit to approach, in his kinder
moments
.
Harold had a faculty, and one which never left him,
of making whom he would, his friend, and whom he
would, his mortal foe, almost without an effort. If he
chose, there was no resisting his frank, cordial, vehement
manner. Your blood would thrill as you listened. You
would not only feel, as he felt, but look, as he looked.
And, if he chose, there was in his deep toned melancholy,
his inexpressible abstraction, a somewhat of the sullen
and discontented, that, now and then, begat a
correspondent
disquietude in all about him. It was not ill humour,
nor sulkiness. It was a sort of intellectual weighing;
but it often looked like the closeted and moody bearing
of a selfish and proud spirit, disdaining to be pleased.
Perhaps it was so, at times: for there were times, when
it seemed that he scorned to hold his happiness by any
tenure common to his brethren; as if he had sworn, and
concentrated all his energies to support the oath, to be
dependent only on
himself
for enjoymentcareless of all
other earthly things. And yet, how untrue were such
appearances! They who least knew him could remember
some
proof of his disinterestednessand that sacrifices,
of the most painful and trying nature, for the good of
others, were so familiar to him, as to appear a part of
his occupation. All that he
said
was remembered; all
that he
did
was forgotten. He
said
that he would not
yield to othersthat he could not weepthat he never
forgot nor forgave an indignityand that he would never
consent to hold his happiness, by a tie so frail as the
changeable opinion of the world. And yet, he
did
so
hold it, and voluntarily exposed his choicest blessings
to the seductiveness of fashion; and this, when it was
neither sought for nor expected.
And thus it was with Harold's temper. He, himself,
spoke so suddenly and passionately, and his dark eyes
flashed so portentously, and his nerves so vibrated, at
times, that they, who could not recall a single instance of
wickedness in action, still believed that he would act
wickedly, on any befitting occasion. They overlooked
the
proof
that he gave out incessantly, to the observing
mind, that he resisted where others yielded, and yielded
where others resisted, from a natural violence of temper.
No man had seen him violent, where it was magnanimous
not to be so; and many had seen him sorely beset. But
they forgot his
doings
. They remembered only his
sayings
.
They remembered that, where others were gracious
and conciliatory, benignant, smiling and complaisant; they
had seen his pale lip writhe in scornhis brow contracted
in wrath and detestationhis cheek and eye flaming;
and hence, they very naturally concluded, that he who
was so terrible on light occasions, would be tenfold more
formidable on greater ones. But they wronged him,
Harold's self-denial and forbearance rose with the
occasion
,
and always overtopped it. It was his delight to do,
what other men could not. When his heart was
sweltering
to suffocation, his forehead was unwroughtpale,
very pale, but immoveable. Where others would be
clamorous, he was always calmso calm, that they who
saw and heard him, would think him sicksick unto
deaththey would never suspect that it was a mortal
passion. Could it be, that such self-command should find
no eye to discover it, no lip to bless it, no kind heart to
applaud and encourage it! Yea!and Harold passed
before
them that should have loved him for this very trait
them that
he
loved, throughout his whole lifeas one
not to be trusted with the happiness of others. Nay, such
was their merciless infatuation, that he, even
he
, who
had been the guardian of his own happiness through
every peril, temptation and vicissitude, and had risen
forever and ever, where other men had sunk, becoming
better and wiser every hour, with the bitter and humbling
*4
mortifications that beset him, and were poured upon him,
with an unsparing hand, by those from whom he had a
right
to expect better thingseven
he
was classed with
the fluctuating and common.
Alas for Harold! his was no uncommon fate. Many
a heroic spirit is brought to judgment, and condemned,
in the same way,
unheardundefended
with no dear
one to plead to heaven, or to mourn for him, and no
blessed hand to treasure up the good deeds of his day,
and no proud heart to interpose, and array such deeds
against his arraignment.
No, no, never! cried Harold. I never will stoop
to defend myself. I will not remind them that ought to
know me, of what I have done in their sight, and for
them, to prove my nature. No!
qui s'excuse, s'accuse
.
He who asks me to defend myself, has already found me
guilty in his own mind. He might as well ask a woman
if she be virtuous.
These reflections broke from his lips, occasionally, in
rapid, but inarticulate exclamations. He was suddenly
but kindly arrested, as he sat looking down into the water,
by a hand put gently upon his shoulder. Harold started,
trembled, blushed, and endeavoured fully to recover
himself, before he looked up. What had he been saying?
his heart rose in his throat with shame and vexation
and he had half determined to rebuke the intruder,
whoever
it might be, sternly, for having trespassed upon the
secret chamber of his soul; but he could notfor his
soul he could not. The hand was still there. It was so
warm, and indulgenthe felt it as if it were pressed
upon his naked heart. He tried again to look up, but
could notit was impossiblehe feared to disturb it
and merely as an excuse for not looking up, he said,
carelessly, what a delightful blue! pointing to the
water. No answer was returned.
Who would have believed it! they, who affected to
know Harold, would have looked to see him throw off
the hand, in scorn and sarcasm, and smite the officious
intruder to the eartha faint sound, as of sorrow, was
breathed over himhe placed his hand upon that which
rested on his shoulderit was a woman's!
Harold!
wilt thou not look at me, said the voice.
He turnedhe attempted to risehe staggered and
fell, his whole length upon the deck!
Many hands were instantly busy about him; some tore
open his waistcoat, and some chafed his temples. A tall
female in black, leaned over him; her countenance deadly
pale, wherever it appeared, in glimpses, through her torn
veil, which he had snatched at and torn, as he fell, with a
delirious laugh. She offered him no assistancescarcely
seemed to bewail him; but tear after tear fell upon the
hand that she held locked in hers, under her veil, and her
bosom heaved with the strength of convulsion, under
her black velvet drapery.
Harold soon recovered, but his eyelids were humbled
to the earthhe stretched out his arms, and surrendered
up his spirit, and bowed himself down, until his forehead
touched the deck, before the severe and lofty presence
before him. It was the attitude of worshipthat of the
most unequivocal, unqualified, and profound adoration.
They that were about, were struck with consternation.
They stood aloof in silence.
Harold said the female, with a deliberate
emphasis
,
and without emotionit was the voice of a judge
about to pronounce some irrevocable doom.
Harold locked his hands, and shook all over, with
insupportable anguish.
She trembledtottereda passenger ran to her
assistance
,
but she waved him off haughtily. She took his
hand. She said something in a low voice, at which he
attempted to rise, caught her hand, and pressed it again
and again, passionately to his lips. He arose. She put
both of her hands into his
Harold, said she, in a tremulous tone, my poor
boy! she withdrew her hand, and put it upon his
forehead
;
how wet and cold thy forehead is.
As that hand touched him, his knees bent again, and he
would have fallen down again, had she not withheld him.
Harold, said she, be composedbe wary. We
are among strangers. There is a long account between
us; it must be settled. God hath brought us together.
I will be with thee again.
Nay, nay, thou blessed one! thou wronged and
terrible
woman! Do not leave me! Almighty God! O no!
we shall never meet again. I cannot, cannot bear to see
thee. But do not leave me! I will not survive it!
Woman
,
woman! do not leave me! Behold mehere am I!
do with me what thou wilthere I am at thy feet. And
wilt thou go? O woman, woman! canst thou leave me
again!
Madman, was the reply; where is thy discretion.
I must silence thee. She then bowed herself a little
toward him, and he caught her hands again to his lips
in transport, bowed in submission to her, and suffered
her to depart, like some majestic phantom, unquestioned,
unabused, in its royalty.
Harold rushed to the cabin, threw himself upon the
floor. I thank thee, God of heaven! I thank thee,
he cried, O Father of mercies I bless theeshethe
dearestthe bestmy own, my ownhorrour, mine!
O Loena, Loena. He shuddered, arose, and staggered
against the pannels of the birthing, as if he had been
upon his kneesblaspheming, deliberately, Jehovah and
his angles!
His heart waxed damp and desolate. He remained a
long time in a sort of stupor, and he recovered only at
the sound of a female voice, when he found himself
clinging to the dark dress of some one that stood before
him, as if he were a drowning man. He opened his eyes,
they were full. He tugged at the dress in silence, with
a look of desperate and impassioned supplication. It
was the beseeching of one who has only one hopeonly
one, on this side of heaven.
O do not, do not leave me, lady! he cried, as the
terrified woman appeared well nigh fainting before him.
Say, whither wouldst thou go? where, where? His
voice was preternaturally loud and shrillshe plucked
her gown from his grasp, and escaped. His arms fell,
extended and lifeless upon the floor; and he remained
upon his knees, but gazing with a mournful, bewildered,
and reproachful air upon her receding form, motionless
and breathless. His lip trembled a little, with a quick
and irregular feebleness, and a few tinges of crimson
shot hastily over his templesall denoting the fierce and
ill subdued agitation of his spirit. He strove to rise
staggeredand reeled to a seat. He became delirious
for a moment, and shouted for Elvira and Loena! He
recovered, and cursed himself; and a rooted melancholy
appeared to take possession of his whole countenance.
But why detail these cruel vicissitudes. A vision opened
so blissfully before him, inviting his heart to its expansion,
and then so cruelly it shut itself up, sullenly and
treacherously
,
just as he leaped toward it! He was in a
wilderness
.
A flowret blossomed at his feet. It was
tempting
and beautiful. He stopped, and it vanished! It
was
cruel. On the deep solitude of the ocean, holding no
fellowship with aught that was instinct with life, poor
Harold had started into a rapturous sense of vitality and
loveliness, with all his arteries tingling, as he awoke from
a feverish and protracted dream, and found
her
for whom
his heart panted, bowing her transcendant beauty over
him, and actually dropping her tears upon his eyelids.
He should have shut his eyes again, and slept forever, to
prolong the innocent and delicious thrilling of that
moment
.
CHAPTER II.
Reader
! hast thou ever, in thine own chamber, while
meditating on some beloved one, thought to thyself, and
held thy breath as the thought arose in thy heart, how
thou wouldst feel, should that beloved one, casting off all
that shackled her to the vain customs of the world,
holding
a sublime confidence in thee, hallowed and protected
by the shedding halo of her own purity, appear before
thee, beside thy very couch! Hast
thou
never, woman?
hast
thou
never?Speak to me, there are no listeners
presenthas it not been thy wish, at midnight, in thy
lonely chamber. Remember ye how your hearts sounded?
Did not your very blood and pulse ring an alarum.
And thou, dearest! hast
thou
never heard a still small
voice near thy pillow; or some faint, delicate echo, like
the note of a well remembered song;hast thou not been
at thy window too, love, at midnight, under a concave of
deep, deep blue, and heard, in the very air, near thee, a
kind and peculiar footfall; and started, with thy head
beating hurriedly, as it passed thine ear, like the familiar
step of him, thy most beloved:hast
thou
not listened,
and trembled, more than half asleep, to catch another,
another, and another naked footstep upon the floor of thy
chamber, struggling all the while to allay the riotous
intoxication of thy thought! Thou
hast
. I know thou
hast. It is in thine eye at this very moment. The leaves
tremble in thy hand. Thy voice falters in reading. Thy
breath is hurried. No mortal mannay, not even a
woman
hath yet lived and loved, but hath felt all thisheard
all this in some sweet revery; no man that hath not
heard such gentle notes, and welcomed them; clasped
some soft hand, that melted in his, and held on, and
blessed it, and kissed it, trembling all over, lest, after all,
it
should
be a delusion! and shutting out, with a delicate
and almost painful perseverance, all that could dispel it!
O! how often have I dreamt, in my youth, and felt, in the
innocent persuasion of my heart, that, at last, I held the
dear hand in mine, and felt the thrilling movement of
her
fingersor the smooth, passing touch, of the gentlest and
purest lips, long, long after we had parted forever.
Judge ye of Harold then. Night after night had his
heart gone back to the Indian girl, as to lay some
sacrifice
upon the altar of its idolatry; and night after night
had trembled in its allegiance, and visited the earlier and
wilder, and prohibited scenery of its hauntswhere, let
no one tell. They that have loved
can
tell; for they
know, however they may disguise it, that love is like all
other passionsit is various, and of every degree, like
friendship. People talk as if a true heart can love only
one; nonsense!You may as well say that a true heart
can only have one friend
one
object of enmity,
one
ambition
.
True, there will be one, more loved, more hated,
than any, or all others. It is a childish notion, this of
one
love, and
one
only. When you can show me a man
or woman who has had but one friend, and one only,
through a long life of vicissitude and affliction, having
no friendship for any other human being, then will I
show you one of these idolatrous lovers, whose inveterate
obstinacy is so much the theme of the sentimentaland
not till then. Reader! art thou indignant? Did
thy
heart
never tremble? Lo! I have thee!Alternately thou hast
played falsely, while reading this tale! Alternately thy
heart hath beaten for Loena and Elvira, Elvira and Loena.
Hath it not. Confess it, and I will forgive thee. The
book is written only to convince the pure in heart that
he is not a heretick in love, who has loved more than one
even at the same time! But I hardly hope to succeed
The world are
so
obstinate.
Yeawomen!ye who believe in the canons and creed
of this deityye who are of the orthodox, believe me.
You may break in upon the dwelling place of the god
this
one
lovedislodge him, scatter his shrines and
jewelryrend his hangingsquench his arrowsand
banish his priesthoodand ere you have turned your
back upon the ruin, you will hear the flutter of their wings
upon their return, and you will be dazzled and blinded
by the re-assembling dust that passes before you, at their
command, to take the form of some other and more
permanently
sceptred divinity.
Yea! disguise it as you will, such is love. The vacant
heart is always hunting after a tenant. The censer, once
kindled, it will not suffer to be extinguished, in its bridal
chamber. The odour, and live coals once thrown upon
the altar, must be there forever. It is tender, doubly
tender after its bereavement. Let two be torn apart, two
that have grown together; and you will find that neither
will heal, neither stop its bleeding, till its lacerated
surface
,
and ruptured vessels have found some other
companionship
,
than the emollient or balsam. When its
young fibres are bruised, and broken, and torn and
trampled
on, if there be any life left, they become inconceivably
more sensitive, and while they shrink from the ungentle,
they cling with the tenderest pertinacity, like searching
tendrils, to whatever is sore, and bruised, and delicate
like themselves.
Such is love, and Harold found it soin the fierce
and dreadful aspirations of his spirit, the very
indefiniteness
of whose movements partook of the sublimity, which
characterized it, in the wilderness and the storm. It was
a spirit born and bred in the hurricane. A spectre would
often pass before him, as he sat in the haunted chambers
of memory,her garments flying in the windmournful
and incessant musick following her tread, like an echo;
and he would recognize the deportment and countenance
of dominion and lovepassionate loveof her who first
broke his heart, as with a sceptre of iron.
In one of these lifted meditations had he been, when
he awoke and found her, yea
her
of his heart, leaning
over him;her, the wronged and abused creature of his
affections. No wonder that his brain rangno wonder
that his heart leaped. Her presence was the fresh cold
water, scooped up for the dying man, and held to his
cracked lips, by the dear hand of his beloved, who, to
his dim eyes, was at that moment afar off, weeping and
watching for his return.
He awoke againand found her sitting by his side,
with her quiet hand upon his forehead. Harold shut his
eyesfor he had not the heart to look her in the face
the rifled and abandoned ladythe creature of such
pale and majestick tenderness.Why had she never
cursed him, O why? why no reproaches, no
denunciations
,
no threats? O nothey were unworthy of her.
He drew her hand to his lipsstill without daring to
lift his eyes,just put them to it, and articulated God
bless theeO noI cannot look upon thee,thou most
injured woman(her tears fell upon his cheek)
Elvira
!ladyI
dare not speak to thee yetthou canst
not forgive me.The last words were scarcely
intelligible
.
She bowed her face upon his forehead. Their
lips metthrilledmy God! my God! he cried, and
leaped upright in his bed.
Harold,
dear
Haroldwhat ails thee?what art
thou staring atspeak to me, dear.
His lips moved.I cannot
cannot
O!leave
me Loenaleave me, or she will destroy thee.
She!
Poor, dear Loena. Didst thou not see her? O, she
was very pale.She has been sadly dealt withhush
hushone moment. She will not be seen by theehush
I will tell thee all when she is gone.
He inclined his head as if listening, and Elvira's
haughty forehead trembled for a moment in the pale lamp
lightand she drew her veil over her face with an
agitated
handa face, still beautiful and meek, beyond
expression
,
but pallid as the young lily that floats upon the blue
pond, gleaming in shadow and ripple.
Harold put out his hands, tenderly, as if to smooth the
parted locks of some sick girlLoena, dear,said he,
tenderly, she loves theeI am sure she does. She
will not harm theeloveonly do not weep.Ha!
she is gonegone!that flash:oh it scorches! it
scorches!
He turned and took Elvira's hand, and fixed his keen
dark eyes upon hers, while his lashes glistened with the
deep emotion of his heart. He was himself again. And
all the great resolution of his nature rose, like a giant,
at his command. He reverentially bowed his head upon
the hand that he held, as upon the hallowed relicks of
some earlier religion, in which he had been born, and
with which, all that was innocent and tender was
associated
,
in his recollectionsuntil they were scorched and
shrivelled, and polluted, in flame and blood, by the
spoilersand then, would have relinquished them
forever
.
But no!no!
The lady understood his emotion, and his purpose.
The governour, said she, distinctly, looking him full
in the face,Harold shuddered, and he leaned toward
her with a look so intense, that it showed all at once, all
that he felt, or hoped, or fearedis dead.
Harold dropped his head upon his bosom, with a wild,
inarticulate laugh. His whole face brightened and
darkened
successively, three or four times, before he could
speak. It was now deathlyas his heart smote him
for the sinfulness of his thoughtO can it be!have
Vol. II. 5
I lived to rejoice at the death of that benevolent old
man, said he. It was now glowing crimson, as he looked
up, and reflected the eloquent blush of
her
countenance.
A silent pressure, faint and trembling, re-assured him.
Harold, whispered a voice, more indulgent than his
own heart, to his own frailties, thou didst rejoice for a
momentnot, I believe, for the death of thy benefactor,
but, because, by his death, thou hadst ceased to sin in
thy love.
Harold blushed. It was too true. But when, I pray
thee, lady, when did this happen? nay, there are ten
thousand
questions, but I have not time to begin. When thou
wast away, there were a hundred things that I longed
to ask thee about. But I forget them all now. My heart
reels with the multitude of thoughts that beset me. It
is full, even to bursting, andFather of mercies!The
red pain shot over his forehead, and his eyes rolled again,
very wildly for a moment, as he endeavoured, with the
expression of detected guilt, to interpose his own form
between Elvira, and something that he appeared to see:
but her pale hand allayed the one, by a single touch, and
the soft breathing of affection soon subdued the other.
The countenance of Elvira was troubled. Who was
this Loenathis poor, dear Loena; she was on the point
of asking a dozen times, but her pride withheld her.
But stillhow in the name of heaven, said Harold,
thoughtfully, How came we here? Where are we? Is
this accident? Nay
I
cannot smilebut
thou
mayest.
I love to see thee smile. But why have I not seen thee
before.All this timeO, lady!was this kind? How
many hours, days, weeks of innocent and respectful
communion
have we,forgive me, ladyhave
we
lost.
The lady looked anxiously upon him, as if doubtful
whether she heard him aright.
Harold reddened. He lifted his eyes to hers
beseechingly
he
laid his hand upon hersa strong hand, but
the softest in the world.Who could resist him? It is
really wonderful, he continued, after a short, but
expressive
silence, wonderful indeed, that I should never
have gone in pursuit of thee, after that night, naynay
I am entirely recovered nowdo not alarm thyselfI
am indeed.Why didst thou not speak to me?
When? where? said she, in agitated voice.
That evening when I met thee, just after we left
Quebec.
Harold!recollect thyself, dear. I was never at
Quebec.
What! cried Harold, not near me, all the night
longdid I not touch, by accident, the hem of thy
garment
,
and did not my heart feel sanctified from that
moment
as
if it had been bathed, baptized all over, in some
etherial essence, warm and penetrating?And then
what madness, that I should not have known the cause
of these symptomsand followed, and plucked thee
forth, from the whole body of the passengers, and wept
with thee, and been with thee, from that hour to this. O,
how happily might have been spent so many dreary,
endless hours!
Harold, I should say that thou wast dreaming, did not
thine eyes assure me that thou art awake. Thy
countenance
and tone convince me that there is some
foundation
for this. But believe me,and go to sleep, for
indeed
,
dear, thou needest it.
We shall meet hereafter, only by
accident
. We have
met
here
already, by the purest accident. Nay more, for
thou art young, and it were pity that thou shouldst
much
mistake methou wouldst never have seen me,
even after I knew thee to be here, in the same vessel
with meseparated I find, by only a thin partition
By heaven! cried Harold,it
was
thy voice then,
that I have so often heard, whispering my name. Ah!
yesblushI could look at thee forever, when thou art
in confusion.I have supposed it fancyand yet, it
thrilled me, when I was awakeI have heard it
then
.
I saw thee, some time since, no matter where:
from that time I kept myself industriously concealed
a circumstance that I
cannot
(her eyelids droppedand
her eyes filledand her lip trembled) cannot speak of
now, betrayed thee. Another accident made me betray
myself. NaynayI command thee, she continued,
smiling, to sleep now. Hereafter thou shalt know
more. I have much to tell thee.
I cannot yet.When did he die?
The governour?
Yes.
Nearly a year since.
And how came this meeting? whence art thou?
I had departed for England in a ship of war. It was
my only chance for the season. It was the largest, and
therefore the safest ship on the station. Being so, the
captain was ordered to cruize awhile, along the West
Indies. We had sent in a number of small vessels, and
this ship which we fought the other day, is the second
vessel of war that we have captured.
After the battle
, I saw thee her voice faultered in
the first words.
After
the battle?go on,said Harold, eagerly.
I inquired about thee. None knew who, or what,
or whence you were. A fellow prisoner of yours told
me, at last, that you came on board at Quebec, under the
especial countenance of the governour. Is it true?
YesI am now going to Europe, under his
direction
.
To Europe!what part?
To France. Such
was
my intention. Now I
must
go to England first. The lady grew thoughtfulso did
Harold. There was a dead silence of some minutes
some thought, which neither dared to utter.
Harold's eyes suddenly flashed fire.Lady! Elvira!
Was
it
after the battle?
She arose, and attempted to pass out.
No, no, by heaven!thou shalt not leave me!my
brain is all on fire with the thoughtwhirling, whirling.
Lady, speak to metell meO tell me! was it not
thy
hand that plucked me out of the slippery shrouds?was
it not?didst thou not, thou most exalted woman, didst
thou
not plunge into the thick of battle.Gracious God!
Elvira(he gasped for breath,) quick, quickart
thou
the mother of that child?
Her tears gushed out, and she laid her face upon his
shoulder. He was overcomehe wept with her. Their
lips met, and their tears mingled. O, Elvira, he
whispered, my heart knew it was
thy
childhow it
doated on him!Thank God! thank God! that I saved
its lifethe life of
thy
childthe babe of Elvira!
Harolddear Harold murmured Elvira, hiding
her face in his bosomLeopold is
thy
child!
Merciful heavenwhat!what!O, Elvirado
not drive me mad. Speak to me again!
my
child! mine!
Some devil is besetting me. Where art thou love?
Something just whispered methathush! hushno,
no, I cannot tell it. Thou wouldst die in my armsand
yet he raised his face drowned in tears, and
crimsoned
with shame, and joy, and contrition; and
endeavoured
,
but in vain, to get a glimpse of
hers
,but no
her long hair, and her hands covered itand it was buried
in his bosom.
Speak to me again, love,tell me, whisper itart
thou indeed the mother of
my
child? She pressed his
hand in silence; Leopold
thy
childLeopold
my
child!Harold the father of
thy
child! OI am
delirious
with a guilty, and unnatural transport. Where is
hewhere is he!I must, I will see him, before I sleep.
Elvira remonstrated, but in vain. The child, who since
Harold's last illness, had been kept away, was soon
produced
by his mother.
O my pa! my pa! cried the little fellow again, in
the same voice as when Harold first saw him. Harold's
heart danced in his bosom, and Elvira's eyes sparkled
through her tears.
O Leopold!my child! my child!said Harold,
clasping his hands. Our Father! I
do
thank thee.
Now
,
I could die contented.
It was high time to separate. And when they next
met, Harold learnt many interesting particulars of the
past. A shattered ivory tablet, she said, had been found
in the woods, its leaves glued together with bloodit
came to the hands of a little, old, active man, with very
bright eyes, half Indian, who passed for a prophet with
the Indians, and was much respected among the whites;
he severed the leaves, and found that Logan was of an
ancient family in England, and related, by blood, to the
5*
governour himself. For a long while, he had kept the
affair a secret, pursuing and watching Harold, until the
governour was on his death bed, when he revealed it to
Elvira, with many mysterious allusions to her calamity.
She was compelled to defend herself. She did so, before
her dying husband. He acknowledged that he had
wronged herdeceived her in marrying her; that, under
an apparent disinterestedness, he had profited by her
childish admiration of his valour, and her ardent
gratitude
,
to prevent all reconciliation between her and the
lord of her heart; for all which, he besought her
forgiveness
with a contrite and broken spirit.
This was too much. She fell upon her knees, and
avowed to her husband that the little boy whom he was
then straining to his heart, was not
his
but
Harold's!
The governour started as if a viper had suddenly
uncoiled
about his heart, and shot him through and through!
He raised the child with a tremendous malediction, as
if to dash out its brains, when the mother shrieked, caught
it away, and told the story as it was.
Such is the majesty of truth!He grew calm. He
forgave hernay, he believed her, wept with her, and
adopted the child, with his last breath, as his own
acknowledged
it, and left it the bulk of his property. He died
and the last words that he uttered were, I did wrong
to marry hershe was too ambitioustoo youngtoo
beautiful.And Itootoo old,farewell love.
The day following, Harold arose early, and, for the
first time, opened a pacquet of baggage, which had been
sent on board by De Vaudreuil. He was not a little
pleasedit is in vain to deny itwith the contents.
There were several superb military dressesa
magnificent
watcha commission, open, with all the appendant
seals, appointing him a colonel, and praying the
recognition
of royalty thereto. Many letters, directed to
persons
of rankin Parisand letters of credit, which
Harold knew not the use of, until long afterward.
He equipped himself, in a splendid dress of green and
gold, with black facings, and was coxcomb enough to walk
about, and get up and sit down, a number of times, with
some emphasis, before he was entirely composed. He
felt betterhaughtier; and he was willing to
acknowledge
it. Indeed there is no fact of more common
experience
than thisthat a better dress makes a man of
more consequence, not only in the eyes of others, but
of himselfwhen among strangers.
Throw the greatest and wisest man upon the world, in
a garb, meaner than he is accustomed tolet him have
a long beard, and soiled linen, and he will be a little man
directly. He will lose his aspect of authority, and tread
and speak doubtfully. Every body is prepared to
browbeat
him, or pass him by with contempt; and what is
more, he looks for it, and expects it. Hence it is a part
of the religion, and politicks of a Frenchman to have
one dress, as good as he can possibly afford. The
greatest
are restrained and humbled, by appearing worse than
they are. Fill the pockets of any manwash his face
and dress him up, and you give him clean and new ideas.
His countenance, and tone, change upon the spot. His
very loll is graceful, or imposing; and he
feels
that it
is
so. He does better, and
what
he does, is better received.
Therefore, reader, I should say to thee, and I would
have thee remember it, let thy colour be what it may,
that it is better to
be
a fool and a knave, and appear
graceful and gentlemanly, than to
be
the wisest and best
man, and
appear
dirty and lubberlyamong strangers
I mean. And why?because you pass before a
multitude
,
with whose first glance, you are judged forever.
They never see you again. Fewvery few can, or will
take the trouble, to penetrate what is repulsive or
discouraging
;
and few, therefore, can ever know the
real
worth of a man, while his
apparent
worth is always
obtruding
itself upon their senses.
Harold was intoxicated for a few momentsa few
moments
;
but, after a while, his self-complacency began to
abate. His eye fell upon a suit of citizen's dressand
then upon a fashionable frock. He was bewildered. In
the mere listlessness of the moment, he was about trying
on another suit, when he observed some linen curiously
wrought below. This led to a further examination; and
such was the sensibility of his nature, such his gratitude
for all this kind-hearted attention, that he pressed article
after article to his heart, like some overgrown girl, when
first rummaging a new baby house.
He plucked out his watch.He stamped with
vexation
!
Five o'clock only!and they would not
breakfast
for three whole hours. It
was
too much for mortal
patience. He sat down, and twirled his thumbs, and
twisted and fidgetted aboutput his hands upon his
watch chainand then forbore to pull it out, a little while
longer, with a determination that, he flattered himself,
partook of the sublime. Thank heaven, said he, at
last, one hour at least has passed, since I looked at
it.He took it out again. It was only ten minutes
later. The hands appeared motionlesshe feared that it
had stoppedhe listenedbut even that consolation was
denied him. He had half a mind to undress, and go to
bed again.
Oh, my dear boy!O, I
am
glad to see thee!
he said, as Leopold, newly washed and brightened,
jumped into his arms,and clambered up in his lap,
delighted
,
beyond expression, at the beautiful buttons, and
splendid trimmings of Harold's dress. He kissed
Harold
,
again and again, pinched his cheeks, played with
his hair, jumped down, and ran about capering and
clapping his hands like a mad creature, shoutingO,
my pa! my pa!
Harold's brown complexion and deeply coloured lips
and cheekshis flashing eyesall grew deeper and
brighter at the sound. Leopold pointed out a hat with
plumes.Harold put it on, and was struck with his own
martial appearance, as reflected in the mirrour. It was
of a singular fashion, and its fur trimming made it
resemble
the warriour turban that he had once worn in
battle. His bold front had never endured a hat. Leopold
was half frantick with delight, nor could he be appeased
until he had helped his
pa
buckle a cimitar upon
his thigh: an unfortunate affair for poor Harold, as it led
an officer, who happened to pass the door, as he walked
to and fro on duty, to look in, and then go to the captain
and detail the mysterious transformation that he had
seen. The captain sent his compliments, and desired to
see the
officer
, for so he appeared, by his quality and
bearing in the battle, as well as by this martial
preparation
.
Sir, said the messenger, descending and touching
his hat, the commander's compliments, and expects
you upon the quarter deck.
Harold could not help blushing, but he repelled the
insolent look of the intruder, with a glance of such
imperial
steadiness and fire, that the man shut his eyes as if
the hot lightning had fallen, melted, upon his balls. A
quick feeling of native pride and indignation succeeded
in Harold's heart; and, in the twinkling of an eye, he
was equipped:At the electrifying effect of anger, all
the thousand petty and provoking awkwardnesses of
a new dress were forgotten. He forgot his trepidation
forgot Leopoldhimself, and even Elvira, and was
already
on deck, before he thought of preparing himself
for the interview. And lucky indeed for
him
was it,
that he
was
unprepared. Preparation would have ruined
him. He was like some speakers, who are only eloquent
and natural, when they have no time to be unnatural.
Like them he could forget, at the sound of a single word,
as it tingled in his ear, all his timidity, and all his
embarrassment
.
Before he knew how he had got there,Harold stood,
face to face, with the present commander, even in the
plenitude of his authority, uncovered and undisturbed,
with the tread of a soldier, and the look of a young
champion, about to enter the tilting ground, against
whomsoever
it should please heaven.
A general murmur of surprise and encouragement
welcomed him. There was, moreover, an involuntary
movement of all, that bespoke respect.
Sir, said the new made captain, turning toward
him with his arms folded, as he strode fore and aft the
deck, in a tone of good natured, honest, blunt
arrogance
his
little, gold laced hat, perched awry upon his
round, fat, red face,his hair standing out from under it,
in all directions, and stiff with what looked like tar, at
least,his long white waistcoat, with enormous flaps,
smutted and greased, and falling away from the buttons,
and his shirt sticking out between that and the waistband
of his breeches, with a venerable midshipman, of about
sixty or seventy years of age, at his elbowSiryou
are an officer I take it.
No, sir.
No, sirdamme, what d'ye mean by that? Two
epaulets, and no officer!a cheese toaster half as long
as our main mast, and no officer!
What regiment, sirCome, comeHis majesty has
no reason to be ashamed of you. What regiment?
SirI do not know, said Harold sternly. I have
answered your question once!
Where is your commission, sir?
On the table below, in my state room.
A servant was despatched.Damn this lingo, said
the captain, holding it up sideways between his thumb
and finger,I am no scholarthis here Latin stuff
never suited me.Your diplomas, and epitaphs, and
things, why arn't they in English? Are they
not
to be
read? Symmons, send the chaplain here.
The chaplain came, and assured his commander that
it was
not
Latintreason perhaps, for he could not
expound it.
Harold now recollected his danger. He was a British
subjectholding a commission from the French, in time
of war!
Sir, said the commander, you appear to be a
gentleman
,
sir. You are a brave fellow,
that
I'll swear to.
You have done your duty against his majesty's enemies.
There is your commission. I don't ask you
what
it is.
But, if there be any thing under the hatcheswhy
take my advice, and keep it there. Sir, I remember that
I once carried, for charity, a whole cargo of miserable,
dirty devils, with their heads all bound up, over to the
land of the monsieurs. But they changed wonderfully
when we touched the port. They were all marquisses,
and generals, and the devil knows what alland I was
finely choused. Sir, the whole hospitalthe lame, and
the blind, and the halt, were knighted on the spot. It
appeared that I had brought home a whole cargo of their
ancient nobility. This made me suspect
you
. You will
pardon mefor I shall now order a search among all
our prisoners, and who knows but I may find some
patent
of nobilitydamn it!why, may be,
that's
one!
Harold laughed outright, at the sudden change of tone
and look which accompanied this remark, but he assured
the honest sailor that he had nothing to fear; he was no
nobleman.
Harold returned to his cabin and attempted to repack
his clothes, but while thus engaged, a paper that was
sewed within the folds of a handkerchief, rustled in his
hand. Could he be deceived! His eyes glanced at it
his hands shookand he felt a sickness at the heart. He
opened it. His feeling, his truth were not extincthe
fell upon his knees on the spot. The paper dropped from
his handit was blank, save one scrawl in the middle.
It was blistered all over, as with rain dropswere they
tears? The letters of his name were traced hazardously,
and without any knowledge of their import, one would
have thought. But he knew better
her
hand had traced
them!
her
eyes had wept over them! andwhat was
that!something fell from the inner fold. It was a lock
of hair!
her
hair. O, bless thee! bless thee for it!
cried the agitated boy.
He sat down and mused, and pressed his temples.
What, said he, aloudof what am I made? Have
I no heart?none!Where is my fidelity? no heart, no
feeling, no sense of the desolation that besets her!She
scorned to complainshe never reproached meand
yet, she wept over me,and her own undisciplined
fingers
have scrawled the characters of my name, while her
heart was breaking. Where is my resolution? I have
been very weak, wicked. I have taught her to conceal the
most innocent working of her own pure heart. Ha!
mother!is it
thy
breath that I feel upon my forehead
stirring my hair.Loena, is it thine, dear? Mother!
Loenaweep for me. I am very miserable. Ye have
seen me weepno, not thou, my mother, but
she
has.
And when, when was it?not at the stake, not in the
mortal agony. No!Had my heartstrings been snapped
asunder in the vehement gaspings of my hearthad I
been torn, limb from limb, ligament from ligament, and
burnt to ashes, would I have shed a single tear?No!
Then why have I wept
with
thee, Loenaand
for
thee?
Indeed, I know not; and yet there is a melancholy
pleasure
in itsomething so sweet and delicious, so
soothing
,
and so dear to the bruised and weltering heart.
Even now I could lie down, and weep myself to death.
Love!Shall I,
can
I be faithful to thee,to thee,
whose only beauty, as thou hast told me often, is thy
sincerity
,
whose only dower is thy valorous devotion?
That dear confiding girl! O, who knows of what she is
capable! She told meand proved it, by irresistible
evidence, that she loved me. And yet, mayhap, she has
cast me off for ever. Could she have loved me? Yea
she
did
. I know she didbeyond all things in heaven
and earth. And yetshe has torn herself asunder from
meuntangledunknottedand rent away every fibre
and nerve that was intertwined, or interwoven, with any
of mine.If it beshe
is
an heroick creature!
Harold's cheek reddened. Loena had threatened him.
A threat! from her too, a being in his power!almost
living and breathing upon his will. He started upon his
feet; and paced the apartment, with a troubled eye, a
few times. He became composed. He returned. He
sat down. He dwelt upon her love, her loveliness, the
apparent meekness, yet fiery intrepidity of her character;
her gentle and sweet admonition; the wonderful self
command that she had sometimes shownher power
over herselfhe dwelt upon all this, until he grew proud
of her, unspeakably proud of her.
Could
she leave
me? he asked himself, again and again;
could
she?
Harold doubted her power, and was half inclined to
try her, as no woman was ever yet tried, feeling, while
his own character evolved, like tapestry, in the light and
wind of a storm, full of magnificence, beauty and terrour,
that he never could marry one who was not capable of
undergoing a fiery ordealtreading, literally, with naked
feet, over heated plough-sharesyea more, of tearing
herself loose from every human beingevery living
thingin earth and heavenexcept her Maker, if
that
were the penalty of abandoning a loved one, who had
acted unworthily.
He thought of her last words. They rang in his ear.
His heart listened, and echoed them. They dwelt upon
his memory with a heavy, perturbed, tolling prolongation,
like a death bell sounding in a sepulchre,for a
subterranean
funeral. A tear dropped upon his hand. He started
he had not the strength, no, nor the heart, to wipe it
away. There was no aching of his vitals, no scorching of
his eye-balls now; and yet, he wept. The tears did not
rush like blood to his eyes, as if his heart had burst with
the effortno! that time had passed; but they gathered
slowly, and fell, drop by drop, with a mournful
pleasure
a
sweet melancholy sensation, such as the heart
might be supposed to feel, if it were naked, and the
moisture of twilight fell upon itstarshine, air, and dew.
Harold was subduedutterly subdued; to be
so
loved
,
so
treasured, so tenderly and so loftily by one, to
whom he had been playing falsely.He clasped his
hands, and bowed his head upon them; and felt, for a
moment, as if
his
heart were bounding against the heart
of his own dear,
dear
Loena.
The hair was turned about his fingers. The touch
recalled
him. So jetty and smooth!Loena had ever been
remarkable for the wavy luxuriance of her tresses, and
their glittering shadowy beauty; they were Indian only
in their shining blackness: not in their rich and glistening
undulationsand this! then, was the loveliest of them
all! He uncoiled it, drew it through his hand, smoothed
it,and his fingers thrilled to the bone. He remembered
itthat very lock, he was sure, had once parted upon
her forehead; for he once, as they sat together, of a
moonshiny night, by a blue fountain that sparkled over
its pebbly barrier, and oozed through the abundant moss,
like a perspiration of quicksilver; a feathery and
whimsical
grouping of light trees playing with the air of
heaven
,
just over their heads, and the dim mountains
towering
between them and a sky of surpassing brilliancy
and distanceonce! on such a night, in such a scene,
he had pressed her forehead with his lips, and smoothed
her beautiful hair, as it waved, and rose and fell, very
slightly, in the fresh air, like satin, rumpled in the wind
and dew, and shining in the starlight. Yea!it was
the very lockthat which he had caressed so often and
so tenderly.
Vol. II. 6
An approaching step alarmed himwith the
trepidation
of guilt, he attempted eagerly to conceal the hair; but
it was impossible; it was so entangled with all his
fingers
:
at last he succeeded, and advanced, glittering in
his uniform, and blushing to the eyes, with the hair
waving
in his hand.
It was Elvira. Her eye glanced, like lightning, from
one to the other, changing its expression as rapidly, and
finally resting on the hair. She compressed her beautiful
lip, and a transient shoot of crimson passed over her
forehead
.
Harold attributed her confusion to
his
imposing
appearance
!
a flutter of gratified vanity was the
consequence
,
and he took her hand,
so
graciously. She raised
her blue eyes to hishe dropped her hand, and stood
trembling before her. His dress was no longer
becoming
.
He was sorrowful. In his warlike Indian garb, so
picturesque, so martial, he had no rivalit seemed made
for himdesigned for himand
his
carriage, head, and
look, seemed made for that!and then, how he strode in
it! Nowhe would be compared with others, to whom
the strange habiliments that he now wore, were familiar.
How would he stand the comparison? Hitherto his dress
had been a standing explanation, and history of his
character
.
It was strikingly free and spirited, and accorded
admirably, with his swarthy complexion, and eye of
unearthly
brightness, as if it were the foil, and setting, of
some dark jewelry.
And shewhy stood she thus?her queenly aspect
overmastering all the woman for awhile: her innate
disdain
of all puerility, and all the paltry devices of a
coxcomb
,
overtopping for a moment, all her delight and
tenderness
.
Harold awoke. He would have given his right hand,
that he had never seen the detested baubles that
encumbered
him. In his vexation, and disappointment, he
could have taken the watch from his pocket, and dashed
it upon the floorand trampled on itand ground it to
dustas he observed the slight motion of her upper lip,
while her eye glanced, scornfully and deliberately, over
the chain.
There she stood!and never was the unruffled
grandeur
of woman more finely opposed, to the disturbed and
agitated embarrassment of man. Harold determined to
be at easemade many desperate efforts, but all were
ineffectual. He feared to move, lest she might think it a
trick for display. And he dared not be still, lest she
might imagine that he could
not
move. Did she enjoy
his embarrassment? Indeed it were hard to tell; her,
emotions were strangely contradictory.
He was certainly, even in this uniform, what the ladies
would have called an elegant fellow, but he was not
what
she
had loved; the wild Indian boyor rather, the
Indian prince, whose fierce eye, and untractable spirit,
first awakened the lioness in her heart. He stood now
before her, not in the solitudethe awful solitude of the
wilderness, wrapped in fur, his half naked limbs, full of
expression and character, all his sinews quivering with
the excess of his natural electricityand no matter in
what other character he might appear, it seemed to her
that he was no longer Harold.
Elvira addressed a few common-place observations to
himin a remarkably lady-like, courteous, and
unconstrained
style(for which, by the way, Harold never
forgave her!) and then turned, in her stateliest manner,
and departedwithout one expostulating gesture or
look, from the proud Indian.
She was gone, gone! and he gradually sunk upon his
seat, stupified and humbled to the earth.
Can
it be?
said hethis woman, this queenly one, can it be that I
have strained
her
to my bosom convulsivelyCan
she
be
the creature whose warm cheekand trembling lips
and scalding tears, I have heretofore felt upon my own
cheeks, for whole minutesin one embrace! Merciful
heaven! can it be!But staywere it not worth while
to avenge myself?Dear, dear Loenathy simple and
affectionate heart would never have supported thee to
this.
Thou
shalt regain
thy
ascendency.
A whole day passedwearily indeedbut it passed;
and the night came. Harold, troubled and tossed about
for weeks and weeks as he thought, now half determined
to arise and write to her,and now half resolved to
buckle
on the sternest of his mental panoplyand
forget
herand
scorn
her. But no!that was not for
him
to
do. Feverish and worried, he at length arose, and at deep
midnight, and scrawled a letter to her
Lady!
Forgive me! That I have sinned, I am sure, and yet
I know not how. I cannot sleep. The paper is blistered
with my tears. There was that in the rebuke, with which
I was left, dearest of women, which I cannot, cannot
drive from my recollection. What means it? Are we
to meet no more?no more, as
we have met?
Lady,
forgive
me. I am distracted. Let me see you once more
but oncefor one single moment, and then, if we
must
part for ever and everI will obey.
The moment that there was sufficient light to see his
way, Harold was upon deck, habited as of old, feeling a
new manhood in his frame, a higher and more pervading
sense of his own dignity than ever. Little Leopold came
whooping and hallooing to him. How lucky! Harold
gave him the note,and then recalled it. It would excite
remark, and, with all his habitual indiscretion, there was
that innate and delicate sense of propriety, which is
always
the attendant on pure affection, to restrain him, at
such seasons.
He thought of a book which he had. He put the note
in that, and sent Leopold with the book to his mother.
No answer came. The day passed away; and they were
near land. But the shouting of the crew, and the
tumultuous
gratitude of the passengers, as the bluish cliffs of
Albion appeared like a waving and broken cloud, upon
the centre horizon, were of no interest to him.
His pride was wounded. But perhaps, perhaps the note
was lost; perhaps toohis heart leaped at the thought,
and he gasped for breathperhaps, she was ill.He
shuddered
.
Leopold had said that his mother would not kiss
him, when he left her. Her frail and exquisitely delicate
constitution had, at last, yielded to her watchfulness and
anxiety over him. And how had he requited her? He
could have lain down and wept like a child, at the thought.
He determined to know the truth.She
was
sick, sick
at heart. He learnt this, and was willing to forget all, even
his pride, in the overflowing of his tendernessand
love
yes love! Was it treason? No mattertreason or not,
he had said it
now
, and he cared not, though it were
trumpeted to the four corners of heaven. He wrote
again.
What is my fault? O, tell me. What a day have
I passed!a day of sorrow and humiliation, such as I
could never have believed that I was capable of
supporting
.
Lady!I do not deserve it. What have I
done? O, tell me in mercy. I am prepared for the
worst; for any thing, rather than this terrifick
uncertainty
.
At least, send me back the book,it is now my
only relick of
thee
.
The book was returned. Upon a blank leaf was
scrawled, with a
pencil
, in a trembling hand, You
have deceived me. You deceive yourself. You love
another. I would have you wholly mineno rival
none! Never, never would I share a divided heart. I
have resources. There is a career open to me,
that
,
and the devotion of the few who love mewill support
me. I have had my dreamsbut they are past.
Farewell
!farewell!heaven
bless you.
Harold wept; and who would not weep? She
was
sicksick unto death; and why? O, full well did he
know itsick, sick at the heart? He read the letter
over and over again, a hundred times. Every syllable
burnt itself into his heart. His memory was on fire.
Forgetful of all, of his beloved, yea even of Loena, her
who he had loved
so
truly, he replied.
Almighty God! Ladycan it be possible! This
then is the cause of your illness. Lady, hear me. I
cannot
lose you now. I
cannot
. Hear me, I conjure thee.
`Deceive
thee!
'no!No, I never have deceived thee,
I never can. `
Loved
another.' Yes it is true. I
have
loved another. But how?not as I love now. She was
artless, young, and inexperienced, with many high, and
many noble qualities, butshe was not Elvira. Let me
see you. I must see you. I cannot, will not survive a
separation.
Elvira was asleep, when the note was brought. She
awokeread itand they met; were reconciled, and
happy. Alas! for Loena.
They arrived. Harold and Elvira stood together, side
by side, before she stepped into a magnificent carriage
that awaited her,about to part for ever. Their hearts
had been fearfully disturbed of late,and now they were
6 *
inconceivably more devoted to each other than ever. She
was too thrillingly sensible of his changesaccustomed
always to kindness, and courtesy, the slightest
intermission
of either was death to her.
Harold was anxious, yet afraid to touch her hand.
With much effort, however, he at last stammered out an
offer to escort her to her dwelling. The offer was
affectionately
accepted. They rode side by side in silence.
Harold was in a new worldhe had been compelled, for
his own convenience, after all, to adopt the uniform of a
French officer, and he was not yet at home in it.
The carriage stopped at a magnificent mansion. They
were alone in it. Their eyes met. They embraced.
It
was the last time
. She leant her head upon his shoulder,
and wept.
Harold took her hand. It was motionless and cold.
He pressed it. It made no acknowledgment, showed no
sensibility.
Elvira
, said he, as she alighted, I
cannot
part
so. She recovered, smiled through her tears,
threw aside her veil for one moment, and murmured,
God for ever bless you! Harold
dear
Harold.
And thee! and thee, love, was his answer, for
ever and ever!
CHAPTER III.
Harold
was on the point of ascending a flight of
marble steps, amid all the attendants that were arrayed,
by the previous arrangements of a relation, to whom the
arrival of Lady Elvira had been made known by the first
boat;but he hesitated, he could notit was too publick,
and all that had passed, seemed whirling, and mingling
with the present and future, before his eyes. He grew
dizzy, and caught at the brazen balustrade. The awful
distance to the palace, for so this noble mansion appeared
to his inexperienced eyes, and even the throng of busy
and happy faces about him, oppressed him with an
insupportable
feeling of insignificance and melancholy.
A bustle in the hall seemed to indicate that some
person
of consequence was approaching. Harold still
lingered
and
Elvira, by a significant look, arrested him as he
prepared to go, and to a middle aged, handsome man
that approached, presented him as colonel De
Vandereuil
Harold
starteda French officer,adding,
We shall be happy to see you in the
evening
, colonel
you will not disappoint usthe gentleman of the house
seconded the invitation with great cordiality.The
carriage will convey you whither you order;said he,
and then entered the house.
Harold bowed, and sprang down the stepsbut struck
by the appearance of a beautiful horse that stood near,
with a groom holding it, he flung his arm over the
animal's
neck, and began caressing it, with his accustomed
ardour. His spirit revivedhe forgot himself entirely,
and actually sprang into the saddle, before he had asked
to whom it belonged, precisely as he would have done,
had he met him running wild in the American forest!
The animal leaped upright, and snorted furiously.
Wo! Csar, wo! cried the groom, abandoning the
reins, and starting, at what he had no doubt was the
freak of a madman. Elvira threw up the window, and
smiledand the next moment a servant descended, with
sir Edward Armains' compliments, desiring the colonel
to make what use he pleased of Csarbut he was a most
perilous animal.
Harold blushed, and bowedand the creature stood,
under his loose rein, and firm seat, stamping, with affected
petulance, flinging the thick foam over the servants, and
arching his bold neck in the sunshine, as if conscious that
he was the admiration of all that stood around, and
waiting
the signal only, to charge, in thunder and lightning,
upon the rabble.
Another window was raised:the sound started the
horse, and he plunged headlong down the street, his iron
hoofs striking incessant sparkles from the pavement
while Harold, conscious that he was observed, for he
heard a faint, suppressed cry above him, gave him his way
without any restraintdashed through the crowd, and
narrowly escaped collision, with a magnificent equipage
that came thundering round the corner of a narrow
street; before his rider, who felt that he had been longer
out of practice than he had at first believed, and was still
giddy with the motion of the shiphad recollected
himself
fully. One of his earliest maxims had been, to ride
always as if he expected to be thrownto be always on
his guard; and he acted upon it, long after it was
forgotten
,
from habit.
It was but a moment, however, that he was dispossessed
of his habitual self-mastery. The next, by the sudden
compressure of his thighs, he arrested the animal, as
instantaneously
,
as if he had been shot through the heart.
He reared upright once, and stood stock still, quivering
all over;his red nostrils, red as raw flesh, shivering as
the hot smoke streamed out, and his heart and lungs
sounding in his chest.
Zounds! cried a person joining him, with an
expression
of hearty delight in his honest, broad face, you
have mastered a colt that never was mastered before.
Sir Edward will thank you indeed. He has broken the
neck of one groom for him, and dislocated the collar bone
of a particular friend: has been under the circus riders,
and a score of jockeys, all to no purpose. I never saw
that rascal, he continued, endeavouring to get near the
horse, and soothe him, but in vain, for he appeared to
disdain all caressing, and wheedlingI never saw him
in his tantrums, that he did'nt unhorsecrack!
As he uttered this, he slapped his hands together
smartly, and Csar leaped upright at the sound.
There! there!I told you so. You have'nt half
done with him yet. He'll unhorse you now, if you dont
mind your eye.
Harold, however, though somewhat electrified at this
new evidence of rebellion, from a creature that he thought
utterly subdued, instantly brought him to his bearings.
He had no fear of being unhorsed,
that
was an event,
not within his experience. He had ridden the untrained
colt of the desert, without saddle or bridle, whip or thong,
and never had he been thrown, never had he fallen, but
when the animal tumbled with him. Harold heard a good
deal of speculation about him. He is so and so, says
one; He belongs to the circus, said another; No,
no, said a third, don't I know him? is'nt it the prince's
groom!
Harold wheeled his charger abruptly round, and felt
for the hilt of his sword. Luckily for
him
, it was left
behind, or the speaker would have been made a head
shorter, in the twinkling of an eye.
To be mistaken for one, playing his premeditated
pranks!it was too bad!
Harold moved on, amid a crowd of ragged boys,
perpetually
augmenting on his way, dodging, and running
in an out, among the coal carts, wheelbarrows, and
carriages
,
and shouting Hourra for the prince! Hourra
for the circus! Hourra for Csar! supposing
that
was the name of the rider.
The poor fellow was inconceivably mortified. Woe to
his vanity!never had he indulged in it, but it led him
into some confounded scrape.
His companion was at his side.
Who the devil are you? said the irritated Harold,
turning short upon him, wearied to death with his
importunity
and gabble.
The man laughed in his face.Well, faith, if you
ar'nt a pleasant chap! Here have I been telling you, over
and over again, who I am, and what I am, and now, you
turn snap on a fellow, and snub him up, damned genteely,
I must say,with `who the devil are you!' Sir, I'll tell
you who I am,I'm Sir Edward's private chaplainSir
I am so.
His
chaplain!
Yes sirI've told you so, a dozen times already: but
never mindwhere will you go? where stay? I'm at
your service. My nag here, is well broke, and, if you
say so, we'll look about us a while before dinner. I dine
with youyou know?
With me! said Harold, in unaffected astonishment.
Certainlycertainly, my dear fellowcolonela
a Harold could forbear no longer. He laughed aloud
a chaplain!a clergyman! spunging upon him, so
unaffectedlyso unceremoniously!
Very well, sir, we will dine together then. And you
shall lead me whither you will, said Harold, as soon as
he could breathe.
Done! for a thousandnow that's what I like. I'll
show you the placesuch a table!such wine!that's
hearty, ye see.
Harold's appetite for observation began to revive, as
they strolled along the broad and beautiful streets,
glittering
with equipages, and encumbered, as
he
thought,
with all the magnificent lumber of earth and ocean. He
was stunned and wearied too, with the perpetual
movement
about him, the giddy whirl of faces, the infernal
clattering, and all his bones ached, with the incessant
effort of his muscles to restrain the mettlesome colt. This
increased, until the throbbing of his temples, and the
rattling of his feet in the stirrups, apprised him of his
danger. He threw himself offstaggered, and well nigh
fainted. His limbs were uselessnor was he aware what
desperate muscular action he had used, until it was
necessary
to use them a little in another way.
You look very pale, said his conductor, the Rev.
Tom Senclare; What will you drink?there is a house
close by.
Nothing, sir, nothing. Let us go in here.
Here!
damn it! why this is the duke of
Bridgwater's
.
Well, what of that. Come, let us go in a moment
I only want to sit down, I care not where.
Mighty free, 'faith!but, I say, colonel, had'nt we
better pop into some coffee house, or tavern, hey? may be
his grace may be out.
Tavern!what is that?
The Rev. Mr. Senclare looked at him for some time,
in consternation. Poor fellow!egad, it's all over with
himnot know what a tavern iswants to step in and
rest himself, in a duke's drawing roompoor fellow!
Sir! said Harold, has a duke no humanity? will
he not suffer a fellow creature to rest himself a moment
under his roof? If not, why go to a tavern; what right
have we to expect another will treat us more kindly? Are
they not all alike?
The clergyman looked dreadfully blank. His red gills
faded. I suppose, said he, playing with his glass,
which dangled at the button hole of his waistcoat, that
was literally buttonless, with the air of united foppery
and nastinessI
suppose
you are not without money.
Money?
yesI am,what is
that?
My good fellow, said Senclare, becoming every
moment
more familiar, as he found him more and more
helpless, and losing his awe, altogether, in a burst of
humanity, Come, come, go with me. I have some cash
leftand what I have, is yours.
Harold understood nothing of the plan; but, as he
held on the bridle of his horse, he pressed his hand
gratefully
,
and walked on, saying, I cannot endure this noise.
It sounds to me like the roaring of the Atlantick. When
I set my foot upon the firm earth, I feel the motion of
the vessel in itand in these flat stones. Let us begone.
Whether it was that the Rev. gentleman had no
luck
in riding, or that the recollection of some disastrous
evolutions, which he had once been compelled to perform,
with great precipitation, before a multitude of ladies, had
unfitted
him
for horsemanship, we do not pretend to say;
but this we do know, that he regarded good
horsemanship
,
with the profoundest veneration, as the
ne plus ultra
of science, and wisdom, and breeding. And when he
saw Harold managing the unconquerable colt, as if he
were a part of the animal, it created a sudden and
extraordinary
emotion in him. From that moment, he attached
himself to him. Here was another case in confirmation
of Harold's characteristickhe loved to be unexpected.
Whatever he did, he seemed to do well; and he knew
that
that
seeming would be exceedingly enhanced, could
his display appear the effect of unquestioned accident.
Thus, he danced, and walked, and rode, and wrestled,
and fenced, remarkably well, and yet no one could charge
him with having sought any opportunity for mere display.
It had been insufferably amusing to Harold, to witness
the clumsy attempts of the chaplain at horsemanship,
and yet more irresistibly so, to see his round, honest face,
shining with such perpetual self-complacency, as he would
lean over the bony neck of his pitching and ricketty
charger, whose joints rattled like some crazy enginery
over a rough pavement, pat him, and caress him, and
comb out his grizzly and tangled mane with his fingers,
and cry woa! woa!my fine fellow, woa! as if
soothing
some unmanageable charger: and this too, while the
whip and spur might have been applied to him in vain,
after he had been flayed alive.
They were received at a superb hotel, in distinguished
style; the chaplain being perfectly at home, and doing
the honours of the house in a most comfortable manner.
Having secured an apartment, ordered a porter for his
baggage, and dined; a friendly conversation ensued, in
which, the chaplain manifested one of the best hearts in
the world; and, after much questioning, discovered and
explained the use of his letters of credit, promising to
get him advances from some French house directly.
Soon after this arrangement, Harold renewed his
rambles
,
merely to kill time, until evening; but his feet were
soon sore with the pavements. He stopped and leaned
against a lamp post. The multitude went by, like a
crowded panorama. A few months since, said he,
to himself, a savageroving the woods of America
a lover!and of whom? His reflections became
insupportable
;
he rambled, he knew not whither; palaces
and churches past before him, and many nations, peoples,
and tongues, but they passed as before a sleeping man,
in indistinctness and confusion, leaving no vestige
behind
.
The lamps were lighteda new cause of wonder
to himtheir interminable lines, approaching in the
distance
they
reminded him of his engagement. He
started
was
it necessary to change his dress? Had he time
to do it? Nohe would notthis was a comfortable
one, and why should he change it? Indeed he began to
like it much better than his Indian garbperhaps because
it was more convenient, lighter, and more beautiful; and,
perhaps, because he was unwilling to profane that garb
of royalty and dominion, by exposing it to a brutal
populace
.
At home, it was the battle signalhere, in
London
,
it might be the butt of mockery. He stamped, as
the thought lightened through his brain.
By the happiest accident in the world, he was arrested
with the touch of a friendly hand, as he was passing by
a magnificent building, illuminated from top to bottom.
He turnedit was the very house. The chaplain was at
his elbow. I have been hunting the town through for
you, said he.
Harold ascended the steps in silence. His heart
misgave
him, as the light burst upon him, with the sound of
many voices: but it was too late,he was expected, and
the doors were flung wide open before his approachand
he entered the first of a superb suit, of rooms, all of which
were crowded, in a dead silence. What meant it? Was
he to be oppressed, dazzled and blinded at once? Or was
it in kindness, because it is sometimes easier to face a
multitude, than a few?
A gentleman approached, and accosted him with the
accent of inquiry. Colonel De Vandreuil, I believe?
Harold bowed, and coloured. That was
not
his name;
and yet, what other name had he? Logan, it was true,
was his by birthright; but who knew Logan, or cared
for him, in London? And perhaps, said he, aloud,
while his eyes flashed fireperhaps they may dignify
the Logans, by the title of
colonel
Logan!damnation!
The gentleman saw the working of his nether lip, and
bowed again, as if expecting an answer, in some anxiety.
Yes sirso I am called.
A card; said the other, and immediately presented
one to him. It was in a well known hand. Ask for
the
lady Beryl
. You will be led to me. Speak to me,
as if you were yet in the governour's family. Be
prepared
for every thing. Show no astonishment, whatever
may happen. Let nothing surprise you. Be not
intimidated
.
Be yourselfbe
Logan!
The gentleman left him, and passed out. His heart
beat furiouslystoppedand beat again; a mist came
over his eyes. I will, said he, audibly, I will; and
turning to a servant, he said, lead me to my lady
Beryl
.
The servant bowed, and led him forward, through two
rooms, blazing with lights. A strange stillness followed
him; and he traversed the last apartment, deliberately,
with a firm step, while every eye was upon him.
A party, who were all busy, very busy, in the sprightly
nothingness of fashionable employment, separated as he
approached, and drew themselves up, in silence, as if to
receive a standard; and a lady, whom he instantly
recognized
,
advanced to meet himbut, heaven and earth,
how changed!Harold scarcely dared to lift his eyes to
her face. Her beauty was awful and majestick. She was
glittering in pearl and blackher dark hair was parted
in simplicity, upon her pale forehead, and interlaced with
broad bands of threaded pearl, that passed aslant over
her temples: her sweeping drapery, her perfect waist,
the beautiful dropping of her shoulders, and her look of
encouraging frankness, as she promptly extended her
hand to him, took poor Harold almost off his feet. He
was petrified at her self-command.
VOL. II. 7
`Colonel,' said she, `I am delighted to meet you
again, and acknowledge, in the house of my
brother
,
how deeply sensible I am of your obliging, and
incessant
attentions on the passage, to myself and
child
.' As
she said this, and he faltered out some unintelligible
reply
,
she stood more erect. He instantly comprehended
her, and followed her example.
He was then successively presented to the family of
the governour, as he, of whom they had `heard so
much
.'
Harold instantly recovered himself. His dark eyes
lighted up, and he threw a glance over the faces
about him, with all the deliberate leisure and
nonchalance
of high fashion. They shrunk, however, from his
inquisitive look, but admired his composure. This was
an experiment to him, but he made it the essential
rule of his future conduct, never to doubt, never to
hesitate
It
being better to offend, by disregarding
custom
,
than by being ignorant of it, particularly of
fashionable
custom. For the former you are never ridiculed,
though you may be hated; for the latter you are always
ridiculed, and sometimes hated too.
A new face, apparently seeking an opportunity of
studying
his
, without being seen, soon attracted his eye. It
was, as he caught a glimpse of it, the countenance of one
profoundly acquainted with mananother passedIt
was full of fiery impetuositytheir eyes metan
unequivocal
expression of pleasure passed over the lips of each.
All eyes were upon Harold. All were delighted with
the sudden and beautiful variations of character, to be
seen in his face. An old, and remarkably tall, stately
man, was among them. From the first moment that
Harold opened his lips, he had fixed his eyes upon
him, and kept them there. `Astonishing,' said he, at
last, reluctantly withdrawing his eyes`De Vaudreuil!
a Frenchman! astonishing!'
He moved, and shook his venerable head, with the
aspect of royalty, repeatedly, as he renewed his gaze,
from time to time. A servant was passing. The old
man touched his elbow, and when he turned and
saw Harold, a sudden exclamation of surprise broke
from
his
lips.
Harold was exceedingly embarrassed. How strange
it was; go where he would, he was forever thus watched
and assailed. Was it custom? No; for he saw that other
strangers were overlooked. Turn which way he would,
he found himself exposed to the most painful scrutiny
a perpetual attention too, respectful, it was true, but
nevertheless, of a nature terribly irksome to
him
. He
felt as if there was henceforth, to be no quiet for
him; no solitude, on this earth. He could not be alone.
He felt as if he were haunted!
He heard a quick cry. Some one touched him, in the
crowd that passed him, and as he turned, whispered,
`
be surprised at nothing!
' He instantly awoke, and
pressed a hand convulsively`merciful heaven!' he
cried, and dropped the hand. It was the hand, not of
Elvira, but of an old manhe shook in all his joints,
as a pair of little eyes, preternaturally vivid, were
turned
upon his face. He was barely restrained, indeed,
from uttering a cry of horrour; for the last time that he
had seen this apparition was in the blank solitude of
the westby a voice that he knew. `
Be undisturbed!
'
it said. It was Elvira's; and he felt as grateful, as if she
had laid, forever, some spectre that had long
haunted
him.
She passed on, and Harold followed her, and found
her occupied by, and occupying, a whole room of
really
intelligent people. Never had he seen her so
fascinating
,
so full of spirit, and grace, and promptitude;
her tone thrilled through and through him, at times.
He heard voices in low conversation, near him. He
turned, but there was nobody near him, so occupied.
Could it be his fancy? One said `no, no, a Logan.'
Then a pause followed, and after a few moments, the
same voice continued, in a whisper, that, had his eyes
been shut, Harold would have believed to be within
reach of his arm`resemblance!' pho! it is
he
, himself
the whole family.'
`But why not apprise us of it?' said another, eagerly.
`Oh, that is for you and others, to discover.
Resemblances
are always easy to find, when we go in search
of themwe are delighted with our own sagacity, you
know, in
guessing
right for a portrait, and pained, if
we are wrong. No, they would have it acknowledged,
by all, accidentally, without any premeditation.'
Harold's
uneasiness at length, became downright
irritation
.
To be thus examined, even in kindness, by one
who could not brook any examination, seemed to be
carrying matters a little too far. His face soon showed
what was passing in his mind, and the whispers
instantly
ceased. But others, at a distance, were still talking
about him, and they paid no regard to his agitation.
It seemed to give excitement to their remarks; for as
he became more and more impatient, they became more
and more earnest and emphatick, in their gesticulation
and glances.
Harold's patience was now gone. He threw up his
front, with that lofty and intrepid manner, which was so
peculiarly his own, when all his character was about to
break out at oncewhat was his surprise and
mortification
?there
was a general and unqualified burst of
recognition, and Elvira looked at him, as if, at that
moment
,
he were
acting
a part, and had exactly
touched
out with terrible distinctness, some point, hitherto
held inaccessible, of his original.
`Remember your lesson, Harold!' said she, coming
near him. `You are a heedless pupilbe patient, cool,
and circumspect.'
Harold heard her; and while he wondered the more,
at what she said, stood trebly braced for the conflict,
as her eyes shone upon him. One desperate effort
one!and he took her hand, and conducted her to the
group, into which, he immediately penetrated, and
began
a conversation, with three or four, at the same
time, partly in French, to a lady, who so addressed
him, partly in Spanish, to an officer that was present,
and partly in English, of such raciness, energy, and
poignancy, that lady Elvira was overpowered, and
overwhelmed, with the display.
Harold was amazed at himself. There was a
startling
energy, a promptitude and readiness in all his
thought, that astonished him. It was inspiration to
him. His abruptness of look and language was set off,
by an adaptedness of muscle and action, that made him
appear to think all over. It was a new study to them
that were about him; and his deep, musical voice,
without
tone or affectationthe strong emphasis of his
unqualified
,
and apparently unchosen language, full of
vigour
and power, were absolutely thrilling. Whence
came these new faculties? He knew not. True, he had
often felt in the war council, the loud prompting of a
spirit, anxious alike for distinction in the senate, and
the field; and twice or thrice, had he, under the sudden
and ungovernable excitement, produced by wrong or
violence, broke out, in their presence, with what they,
the men of the woods, the elder of whom had listened,
for half a century, unmoved as their own oaks, to the
thundering of their mightiest oratorswith what
they
considered the voice of denunciation and prophecy.
They shook in their seats. Their hair rose, and their
eyes lightened, as he stood planted before them; his
naked arm outstretched, with every muscle quivering,
as he pointed to the track of the depredating white men.
But then,
that
was at homewithout preparation; for
if he had one moment to prepare, his heart withered,
and he shrunk appalled, from the fearful undertaking
of Eloquence.
True, he could debate, and after he had debated with
irresistible effect, where no formality or preparation had
unsettled or disturbed him, he would quake at the
recollection
of his own temerity: but
then
, it was the rashness
of a vindictive spirit
now
, he was no longer in an
Indian
council, but standing under a blue canopy, glittering
with other lights than those of heavenin a vast
apartment
,
swarming with beautiful apparitions, and peopled
with creatures so heavenly fair, that their very thought
seemed transparent. And yet! here, even here,
unaccustomed
as he was, to the blaze and luxury of fashion
and beauty, he was speaking, before he knew it, with
such rapidity and effect, in his strong, poetical, and
awakening manner, that the priesthood of fashion stood
still before him; and he was soon completely environed
by eager and palpitating listeners. Was Harold aware
of their presence, and accumulation? He did not
appear
7*
to bebut, having once mounted his chariot, he
could
not descend, till he had thundered and lightened to his
heart's content. He finished, and he started, as from a
trance, and the whole room appeared to swim before his
eyesand the tapestry to be all alive with parting lips,
as he recovered, and saw how entirely he was the
speaker
of the assembly. He blushedfaltered
attempted
an apologyand his character was instantly
established forever!
Was ever triumph more complete? One only thing,
Harold then wanted, for consummate happiness. The
wish was feebly, faintly articulated, but it passed over
his fevered heart, like the shadow of something green
and cool. What was that wish? It
was
, that his Indian
girl were near! He felt himself growing sick; but
struggled
and arose. The thought of
her
would not be
dispossessed
.
It held its place. The lights burnt dim; he
heard only a confused ringing, and he put his hand to
his forehead, and covered his eyes. `Why?' said he, to
himself, `why comes she to my remembrance, now,
amid intoxication, and delirium?sweet, blessed
creature
!
how have I wronged thee!thy meek,
uncomplaining
countenance is before me, now. I cannot shut
it out. I close my eyes, and cover them with my hands
but thou art still visibleI am glad of it! I love this
secret spirituality of our intercourseno, no!' he added,
passionately rising up, utterly forgetful of where he
was, and who was looking upon him, and dashing the
cold sweat from his forehead`I have wronged her
but, by the living God! I will atone for it, in blood and
tears!'
The company withdrew from him, in consternation.
The apartment was a solitude. One person only
remained
the
very lights made the vacancy more
melancholy
,
nay, even more appalling. They shone, as if
in some of the self-illuminated mansions of the dead
in silence and immobilityescutcheons and banners,
and spears, and rosaries, perhaps around, but all lifeless
and motionless. Harold turned deadly pale, for he
heard an echo, as he thought, to his own suppressed
groaning. It was lady Elvira. She put her hand upon
his forehead: and when he lifted his dark, mournful
eyes to hers, she fell upon his neck, and wept there.
He thanked her, pressed her hand, and arose, with
lips strongly compressed, and quivering with
convulsion
,
as if he felt, and would stifle, a mortal agony.
His brain whirled. He had been eloquentbut the
spell was broken, his subjects scattered, and his
dominion
gone. He recalled a part of the dramahe saw
himself
, distinctly, like a disembodied spirit, pass before
him!he shudderedturned to Elvira, and pointed
with his hand. But she saw nothingnothing! Yet
there
he was!the same stately, cold silencethe deep
musing of his stepthe folded arms, the haughty lip,
rebuking, with an inward scorn, the childish hilarity
and revelry about him. He saw the apparition of a
crowd. They stood awe-struck, before a black shadow
that declaimed before them, with a simple and strange
motion. He felt, the next moment, something like a
cold serpent, sliding over his heart. He was now
fronting a group of dancershe paused, and lifted his
foot, as if he had set it, unshod, naked, upon a coiled
adder!
`Who can he be?curse his familiar impudence!'
he cried`let me but reach him, and I will strangle him
before her eyes! Gracious heaven! he has taken her
handnay, I will abide
here
he holds it too: holds
Elvira's hand, before an assembled multitude!'
This spectacle brought him to his senses at once. A
tenfold state and solemnity sat upon his brow. He
suffered
O!
that
he did, to the extremity of mortal
sufferance
;
but he was too proud to let any one suspect it
no! though his heart were dissolving in its own
agitation
.
He approached, and attempted to renew the
conversationbut his very voice had changed. It was
mournful, and deep, and thrillingbut unsustained
he was absent, distressed, and his countenance was ashy
palebut his words were even more composed and
steady, than ever. No! no! he could not conceal his
agony. His fits of silence, suddenly broken, with a
melancholy earnestness to be occupied, and then
resumed
,
as if merely to distract the observation of the
company, from himselfthere were enough for the
youngest and least experienced to judge by. No! no!
Harold was a bad player. His distress was visible,
immediately
,
where he least wished it to be, to Elvira,
herself. Others
saw
it, too, but they attributed it to
sudden illnessShe, alone, of all that were near him,
felt and knew the real cause.
`I fear, my dear sirI fear,' said a gentleman that
was near, in a tone of the most friendly and
affectionate
concern`that you are seriously ill, my young
friend.' As he said this, he extended his hand, as if to
feel Harold's pulse.
Harold bared his wrist, and stretched his arm over
the chair, with a smile; but the effort to be cheerful, at
such a moment, was worse than all. His eyes filled, in
spite of himself: and he was unable to speak for an
instant
;
but it was only
for
an instanthis soul rose like
an abused monarch, and he was himself again!
master
of his feelings, his looks, his tones, and his speech;
but still, above the affectation of appearing cheerful.
He arose to depart. The evening had been, O, how
unlike
what he had expecteda time of weariness and pain.
Yet there was an involutary accompaniment, in all that
were near. They felt, and showed in that unequivocal
manner
,
a deep interest in the dark stranger; some had other
ways of showing itsome by silencesome by
earnestness
of lookothers, and they were all women, (for men
have no such delicacy) by diverting the attention of the
company from his distress, and embarrassment.
`
Farewell!
' said Harold, at last, rising abruptly,
as if he dared not trust his mind to linger on the
thought, and speaking in a low voice to his host, while
he bowed to the circle around, without once lifting his
eyes to
her
, the object of all his inquietude.
His host pressed his hands in silence. `Colonel! I am
sorry
(this was said with uncommon emphasis) to
part with you. I am a man of few words. But I
expect
to see you every day, while you are here. My carriage
is at the door.'
Harold bowed, and was soon in his own apartment
ignorant almost by what magick, the removal had been
made so quickly and silently, for he had heard nothing,
seen nothing, as they thundered along the streets.
CHAPTER IV.
Behold
Harold now in his roomhis head resting
upon his handsa tear! can it be possible?a tear
trickling through his fingers. Verily, the Indian
must
be broken in spirit! Hark! that is the pulsation of his
heartand thatlisten!
that
is his breathing, so almost
articulate, as if he were suffocating in his sleep.
`Where am I?' he cries, striking the table with his
hand`what have I done? Am I mad? Yes, I
am
mad, mad, beyond the reach of palliation, or excuse.
He could not have been a loverhe
is
notby heaven,
he is not! woe to him, if he be! People that love, do not
show it so openly, at least, in publick. And yet, damn
it, he cannot be a relation; relations do not yearn for such
familiaritiesher hand
held
in his, unresistingly
pshaw! who cares for her hand now? Once, it was
distinction, to touch itshame, shame, on her! base,
unfeeling woman!'
`But * * butwhat am I?I!can I
complain
?
Where is
my
fidelity? Loena!O, thou art
bitterly
avenged. This is jealousy, devouring jealousy
feeding like a serpent upon my brain. Who is he? No
matter. Brother, lover, friendit has taught me one
lesson. I have been a
scoundrel!
Heaven forgive me!
I repent, deeply repent. Loena! love! living or dead,
thy triumph is now complete! I am thine, and thine
alone; mine only love, my dark-eyed Indian girl.'
Yes! the conquest
was
now complete. Harold was
now firm of heart. Nothing could shake him. Once
determined
,
he was forever immovable. Composed by
this resolution, self-sustained, and self-restored, He
slept this night a more refreshing sleep than he had,
since he met lady Elvira on board the vessel. And this
night, for his reward, he dreamt that he held her whom
he
did
love, though for a while he had forgotten, in the
drunken exhilaration of his spirit, her and himself, to
his heart; and felt her bosom throb against his, in
purity
and love, in timidity and passion, of purity in its
perfection, and love in its sublimity.
He was awakened, in broad day, from a blissful
dream, in which he had recapitulated all,
all
of his
transgressions to her, and been forgiven, and blessed
by a servant, who handed him a note. It was as
follows
:
`I was distressed at your conduct last evening: we
go into the country after dinner, and we expect you to
go with us. Before, or on the way, if I have an
opportunity
,
I shall speak of some occurrences that have
taken
place.'
Was such a note to be disregarded? No, surely not.
And Harold, of course, was again by the side of Elvira.
Not, however, the feeble and irresolute creature that
he may seem for awhile; but he was there. She never
appeared more captivating, more majestick. Her
blandishments
were, what few could resist, but yet, Harold,
whose spirit was now in armour,
did
resist them. He
had been told, and he delighted to repeat itBeware
of precipitate promises, beware of rash resolutionsBe
slow to resolve, but speedy to execute. But having
once made a resolution, (as he
now
had to overcome
his attachment to Elvira, for Loena's sake,) whatever
it be, keep itkeep it, for life and death. Was it weak,
rash, precipitate? keep it and punish yourself. It will
teach you more caution and wisdom. Not so, if you
could set yourself free from it, when you pleased. You
would then, never be wise. Besides, it takes away all
dignity from your resolutions and promises, if you are
known ever to break them, under any pretence. Do you
fear a change? Then learn to make them
conditional
.
Such was Harold's reasoning, and, therefore, it was his
way, nay it was his religion, to keep
his
promises, good
or bad.
Was this right? Harold had persuaded himself that
it was. But he was asked, `Suppose you had promised
to kill a man, would you kill him?' `Assuredly,' was his
reply.
They, that heard him, shuddered. They forgot to
ask, if he would ever
promise
to kill a man.
That
he
would never do, even in a passion. Why? Because,
experience
had made him wary. He was careful
not
to
promise, because, he knew that he
must
pay the penalty
of his wickedness and folly, by performance. Others
might commit murder in their hearts,
threaten
, and lie,
and repent. He did not. They were contemptible. He,
at the worst, was only wicked.
`I have much to communicate to you,' said lady
Elvira
,
in an impressive tone, as she seated herself by his
side. `Be prepared for something that will try you. Do
you know who you areyour parentage?'
`Yes,' said Harold proudly, `a Logan.'
`But your father?'
`An adopted Logan.'
`But have you no curiosity! He was a white, an
Englishman
.
`
Tant pis
,' said Harold, half smiling in scorn, and
mockery. `Harold,' said Elvira, reproachfully, `
Harold
,
you do not wish to hurt
my
feelings, I hope.'
`A white!' said he, laying his hand upon her
shoulder
,
and looking her full in the face, `Yes, Elvira, he
was
, but in appearance only, not in heart.'
`Do you know that he was an Englishman?'
`Yes, from what you told mein no other way. I
never asked. I care not who, or what he was. All white
men were alike to me, (
men
, I speak of,) treacherous,
cowardly, cruel: all countries were alike, where
they
dwelt, the abode of wickedness and tyranny.'
`Patience, Harold, patience. Why what has taken
possession of thee, so on a sudden. Come, come, be more
temperate; remember, we are not in America now. Let
us talk this matter over calmly. You have come here
providentially. You are young, nameless, friendless
hush, dont interrupt me, in the estimation of
men
, you
are so. Now prepare yourself, be composed. What
would you say, were I to tell you that your father was
a nobleman?'
`Say!nothing, except that I was sorry for it.'
`That you have relations still living'
`Gracious heaven! I! Where, lady, where?'
`Oh, I thought that I should disturb your apathy.
But remember your promise. Be firm. We shall see
some within another houryou have a
sister
.'
`A
sister!
' cried Harold, leaping upon his feet, and
seizing her hand, with the most impassioned
earnestness
`Lady!
on thy soul, do not trifle with mehave
I a
sister!
O, my God, my God! Yes, dear Elvira. I
will believe thee, I
must;
thy countenance is too solemn,
for a doubta
sister!
O my heart is yearning to pour
out its gathered fountains of tenderness. Where is she?
O, tell me, dear,
dear
woman! How passionately I long
to find some living creature related to mea
sister!
O, how I shall doat upon her! I shall lavish all these
inexhaustible stores of affection upon herall these,
that have been accumulating ever since my birth, in
darkness, desolation, and loneliness. Their seals shall
be meltedbut no! no, noit cannot be.
Thou
wouldst
not mock mebut, nay, forgive me, I have no
sister
,
I can have none. My mother died, and my brothers,
and my sisters, all, all! in flame and blood! I alone
escaped
.
I feel it, I know it. The dream is passed, my
heart is cold again. I am alone again. No living
creature
is related to mealone, alone!'
He covered his face, and sank into a chair.
`No Harold, believe me. I do not speak unadvisedly,
I have the proof. Thou hast a sisteranother child of
thine own father, but not the child of
thy
mother; one
whom thou wilt love, Ah how devotedly! Yea, more
perhaps
thou hast a brother (her voice faltered)it is
possible; but of him there is a melancholy tale to tell.
Rank and fortune are within thy reach, dependent,
however
,
in some measure, upon the certainty of his fate.
You do not comprehend. You are bewildered; but,
there
are the papers
, (as she said this, she opened a secretary,
and handed him a bundle; and Harold fancied, that she
turned deadly pale, as she touched them, and that she
approached them, with a strange reluctance, nay even
with terrour.) `The governour knew the whole, as I
have before told thee, and when he died, he gave me a
part of these papers, with his own hand, bidding me
interest my friends, who are powerful here, in your
behalf
.
Nay, do not interrupt meI have obeyed him.
I have succeeded. I have invoked
his
spirit to thine
aid, and it appeared. To its prompting I have yielded.
We shall take council, and proceed thoughtfully in the
business. Some years may pass, before you are
acknowledged
.
But, in the mean time, you are young, ardent,
ambitious, and resolute, with the alphabet of greatness
already at your command; but you want discipline,
system
,
time and experience. You must prepare yourself,
Harold, for playing no second part in the great drama
of life. What say you? will you,
can
you devote five
years, with all your heart and soul, to solitary study?
toil, night and day, for distinction?forget all your
early
habits? and tie your spirit down, hand and foot, to it?
If you will only
say
that you will do this, we will
believe
you, we know that you
can
; and we, I am
authorised
to say this, we will give you elevation, riches, and
opportunity to be what you please. What say you? We
want your
promise. That
is enough for us, for we know
you. Five years may seem long; but we do not press
you to an immediate decision; we do not even attempt
to influence you. Take your own time for consideration.
But no shorter probation will do for
us
. There is much
for you to do. To do it well, you must have consummate
experience and self-collectedness. The time appointed
is short enough. You are thunderstruck; but I am
obliged
to adopt this manner toward you now.
We must
forget all that has passed. Henceforth, there must be no
allusion to it;
on your
future
conduct alone, do we rely.
Read those papers, when you have recovered your
composure
.
You will have need of much to support you.
There is a stupendous mystery concealed within them.
Perhaps your self-love may be wounded; but that will
soon pass away. You are, naturally, too great a man
to be afflicted long with such weaknesses. No, you need
not look thus. I do not flatter you, you
know
that I do
not. I never did. I never will. Among them, you will
find two miniatures, one of your sister, and one of your
brother. O, you are roused, I perceive! Well, well,
you
may
look at them a momentbut dont tear the
VOL. I. 8
papers open so furiouslythere!see what you have
done!'
Harold tore open the bundle, and soon discovered the
miniatures, and pressed the first, without looking at it,
to his lipshis eyes filledhe wiped them and looked
at it he wiped them again
`My sister!
that
my sister!' he cried, in a tone of
unutterable horrour. He groaned aloud: the picture fell
from his hand, and he sat staring at Elvira, his noble
countenance full of preternatural vacancy and terrour.
It was the picture of Elvira herself.
She shrieked aloud, at his aspect. His eyes were
motionless, and, as her hand approached him, he
shuddered
,
and shrank from her, and his knees smote
together
.
`In the name of heaven! what ails thee Harold, dear
Harold?' she said; but he gave no answer; he only
covered
his ears with his hands, as if he had gone raving
mad, at the sound of her voice.
Her eyes fell upon the picture. She took it up. She
was amazed. `Merciful providence!' she exclaimed,
how came it
there!
It was shivered and bloody when
I saw it last! It was upon
his
bosom. Who can have
had it! Whence came it?' She began searching, with
hands that shook so as to prevent her from untying the
ribbands, and she was obliged to tear them asunder,
breaking seals and all. She soon found a third
miniature
.
`There, Harold, there! dear,
dear
Harold. Look at
thatthat
is thy sisterpoor girl. No wonder thou
wast death-struck. Harold! Harold! rouse thee!'
She held the miniature to his eyesthey shut
involuntarily
;
she shook him; and, at last, a deep sigh burst
from his labouring heart; he attempted to rise, and
walk, but he did not appear to feel the floor; his joints
yielded, and he fell. `Where am I?' said he, putting
his hand faintly to his forehead, upon which the thick
clammy moisture of death was standing, `where am I?
lady!Who art thou? Why am I pinioned thus. I
knew it not. No, by my hopes of salvation! No! What
have I done? I know not. Speak to me, lady, hast thou
any compassion upon a dying man? Thou hastthy
tears, bless thee lady! I am not then utterly reprobate.
That picturetake it awaythere is one exactly like
it, hot, hot, burning in my brain; put thy hand here
lady, here!dost thou not feel itAh!'
Elvira wept over him, soothed him; and after a
while, ventured to repeat the name of
sister
. His lips
quivered a little. She then produced the picture, the
true picture. He appeared to recover. The wildness,
and fixedness of his look departed. He pressed her
hand, and arose, and sat down by her, upon the sofa
still partially bewildered.
He was holding the miniature of his
sister
now in his
hand. He looked at itbrought it nearer, and then
turning
,
with a melancholy smile to Elvira, he said, `pray
tell me, lady, Elvira, what has happened to me? Have
I been sick? The last that I can recollect is, thatpray
is
this
the portrait of my dear sisterwhat is her name?
`It isher name is Caroline.'
`Well, I could weep heartily over it. Do you know
that just now, when I first took it into my hands, its
countenance appeared to changeyes change!aye,
Elvira
,
I protest to thee, that it looked for a moment like
thee
. What a strange delusion! I fear that I am not well,
my temples are sore; there is an odd, whirling sensation
in my head; and I remember that it grew suddenly dark
about me, when the face changed. What did I say?
Have I had a fit? Surely,lady, look at mewhat has
happened?Thou hast been weeping.'
`No matter now' said the delighted woman, `all is
well now'
`What a heavenly countenance!' cried Harold,
poring
devoutly over the beautiful picture, `such serene
dark eyes? What colour are they?not blue surely'
`NoI hardly know what they areI only know
that I have mistaken them, at night, for black, when she
was a child, and that they were always exceedingly
beautiful.'
`How smooth and high the forehead!the blue veins
rippling over itlike delicate stains over the
transparent
leaf of a magnoliahow beautifully archedher
eye-brows! and yet straight enough for dignity and
expression
.
O, what sweetness and purity! what
intelligence
love
her!O, I love her already, as if we had
been a thousand years acquainted. But come, let us
see my brother, ha! ha! ha!'
`What do you laugh at, Harold?
`Ha! ha! ha! I am thinking of the strange sensations
that I just had. It appears to me that I have lost my
memory. I have heard of shocks,
apoplectick
, I believe
they call them. Perhaps this was one'
`What! Harold. You amaze me. You cannot surely
laugh at such an event.'
O, no. not at that, but I laugh atwasn't it very
strange, dear, that I should think
this
face looked like
thine, and yet I didI protest to thee, that I thought
it exactly like thee. But, while I was looking at it,
it changedindeed it did?'
While he was speaking, he took the other miniature
from the hand of Elvira, who appeared unable either
to look at it or relinquish it. He turned his eyes to it
he appeared bewildered for a momenthe put his
hand to his foreheadhe held the picture at different
lengths, now afar off, and now near, with a continually
increasing astonishment, now shutting his eyes, and now
turning them off, as if unwilling to believe his senses
`By heaven, and all its angels!' he cried, at last, in a loud
voice, springing from his seat, `it is
he!
'
`Ladyis thatthat!(the picture dropped from
his hands into her lap,) is
that
the picture of
my
brother?
The brother of Caroline, the sweet Caroline?'
`Again, Harold!you alarm me. Another
paroxysm
'
`O, Oscar! Oscar,' cried the agitated Indian, `O, would
that I had known thee! Thou fierce and implacable
spirit, would that I had known thee!'
Elvira stood apalled at his convulsive agitation. His
voice rung through and through her brain. `Oscar!
she echoed, `who hath dared to pronounce thy name,
before my presence? Oscar!O, let my malediction
'
`Forbear! forbear!' cried Harold, plucking down her
agitated hands. She obeyed, and they sat down,
unwillingly
,
as if they had no power to support themselves,
or resist some outward pressure; as if their very bones
were made of waxunwillingly, and in silence.
Harold told her when, and where, he had met the
original of the picture. She was stupified with
astonishment
.
She could not believe him. It was impossible
impossible!' she said, vehemently, `on board of the same
vessel, with
me
, and I not know it! Oh no! Harold, by
my hope of salvation, I do tell thee that it
could
not
be; I should have felt Oscar's presence thrilling my
very blood, had he been so near me.'
`Stay,' said Harold, `perhaps
this
will assure thee.'
He opened a little folded pocketbook, and took out
some scraps of paper with an agitated hand. `I found
these,' said he, `upon the deck, after he left me; I saw
him throw away a handful of paper, but the wind blew
a part of them back to us. Do you know the
handwriting
?'
`Alas! it is true,
true
,' she answered, in a broken
voice, `but stay,' (she began to read here, and the
colour
came and went, with terrifying rapidity over her
face,) `O yes! yes!' she cried, clasping and lifting her
blue eyes to heavenFather! thy will be done! It was
he,
he
himself!'
A part seemed to be in a female hand; but there were
marginal notes in another character. Harold attempted
to read them again, and succeeded in decyphering a
few legible sentences.
thy destiny!what knowest
thou
of thy destiny?   Infatuated man!
A murdererthe slayer too of thy sister
O, Oscar! Oscar!  defend
suicide!
To this was the following note: `Yes!I do defend
it. What right hath any one to bid me live? Who cares
for Oscar? May I not, at my own free will and
pleasure
,
risk
my life and limbs, in charity, battle, or
adventure
?
Then have I a property in thembut'
8 *
`That I
have
loved thee (was written in the former
character)passionately, I do not pretend to deny.
That I no longer love thee, I will not attempt to say.
It would be false, if I did. No, Oscar, I do love thee,
I shall love thee to my dying dayBut
I dread thee  More to be
feared than beloved.   Who would
dare to couple her fate with thine?
Hast thou not  said that it
was
perilous
and when I told thee what she said, didst thou
not reply, and tell me, yes, yes! it is too true. She is
thy best friend  She does not wrong me.
Thy courage
is
terribleto think of marrying one like
me   Didst thou not?
And when I have seen thy rivetted brows
thine intensely bright eyes fixed, in deadly wrath,
upon some other eyeand heard thy suppressed, but
terrible voice, denouncing some one, upon whom it
seemed to fall, syllable by syllable, like a cursedid I
not tremblejoint and marrowand
can
I love thee?
O, Oscar!    farewell!
farewell
forever!
Hast thou  forgotten
that
night? O never
shall
I
forget it?thine unhallowed trespassthy
strange levitythy suffocationagonythy brief
repentance
O
Oscar!Thy convulsive sobsI hear
them yet?thy hot tearsI feel them yetmy heart
was blistered as they fell.
and yet, I
forgave
thee!Is it forgotten?
Was not
that
a proof of my love, unbounded, and
impassioned
as thine own?
No, no, it is all over now.  farewell forever!
Repent, repent, I conjure thee. A murderer thou
art
alreadya madman perhapsbut O, Oscar, O my
beloved
,
thou, whom I must never see again. Oh, put
not the seal of blood and death, forever and ever, to
thy consummate guiltO, be not, I conjure thee, thou
most wayward, and desperate man, be not a self
murderer'
farewell
.
To this was a note also, in the following words
`No, no. She did not, I should have worshipped
thee
did
I ever aught
said
I ever aught, unkindly to thee,
woman? No, never, never! I should have died over and
over again, without one look of reproach, or coldness
nayhave I not been dyingand loved thee yet.
Was not my heart bursting more than once, and did I
ever wrong thee.
A murderer!noI am a martyr.'
The tears fell fast from the beautiful eyes of Elvira,
as she assisted, in assembling the fragments, and
decyphering
them, which she did, with an avidity and
readiness
,
that Harold afterwards thought extraordinary.
`That was
thy
brother, Harold,' said she, as he
deposited
them again in his pocket-book, `thine own
brother; and never walked there, upon this earth, a more
god-like spirit. May God forgive him! The fine gold
became dim, clouded; with a profane foot, and a
desperate
hand, he plucked down the image of his Maker,
from the place of his sacrifice, and put up a man in
armour, reeking with blooda creature whom
he
called
Ambition. But, he is gone, gone, with all his
colossal
attributes and transgressionsO, may it be that
he went, as thou thinkest, in a delirium, insensible to
the awful weight of his obligation to the Eternal!'
`
These
papers,' she added, laying her hand, with a
convulsive shudder, upon a part of the bundle, which
was tied with a blue ribband, stiffened and discoloured,
`relate to his life. They were tied with his own hands.
They have never been untied since.
That
ribband is
wet with the heart's blood of an enemyone whom he
slew, before his own family altar, in the very presence of
his household gods!Read them. Beware. Thou art
fashioned like him, Harold, and the lesson should sink
deep, very deep, into thy soul.'
Harold was chilled to the heart. There was
something
so awful and admonitory in her voice.
`But who art thou, lady?who, and whence?that
seemest to have been so familiar with my brother's
transgressions.'
`No matter,' she replied with dignity`no matter.
Remember mine admonitions, as thou wouldst prosper.
Watch thy temper. Crucify thy pride. Trample to the
earth thine arrogant, overbearing spiritO Harold, I
beseech thee, as I have besought him, with a sore heart,
aching and trembling with prayer for ye both
Be a
good man
.'
She was upon her knees. All at once, a light broke
in upon him. He caught out his pocket-book again, and
examined the writing of the female.It was not to be
mistaken!he was breathless.
`Lady Elvirahave I not heard thee pronounce the
name of
Oscar
beforeeven in America!'
She covered her face with her hands.
`O,
now
I see it, all! noble, excellent creature! I
see
it, all! I
feel
it, all!my sisterbeloved of my brother
thou, who didst abandonbut dost lament my
brother
heaven
bless thee!'He embraced her, and
mingled
his tears with hers.
Their silence was interrupted, by the entrance of a
servant, to announce that the carriage was drawn up,
and Mr. Hammond waiting: once more, then, they
joined hands, like a brother and sister, and soon came
in sight of several beautiful cottages, near a large
mansion
,
upon a hill.
It was visible, like a bright spot, in a wide
amphitheatre
of glowing verdure, long before they were near
it. The hand of Elvira was upon Harold's arm; and
already had he learnt somewhat of the feelings that are
fraternalhis passionate, tumultuous, overwrought
sensations
were chiefly allayed, or assuaged; and now, he
was doubly thankful that he had thus anticipated, as it
seemed, the resolution of Elvira,and taught his heart
a new lesson of constancy, while it was yet apparently
in his power to be inconstant. Such is ever the reward
of virtuous resolution.
`That cottage,' said Elvira, as they turned the
corner
of a narrow road, over which, two rows of aged
elmsinterwove their dark and irregular branches,
forming a tangled and broken canopy, through which
bright glimpses of the sky were caught, looking as if
the whole heaven were one mirrour, with parts of the
quicksilver, here and there, rubbed off.`That cottage'
they caught another view of ither lips movedbut
no sound followed. Harold understood the silent
pressure
of her hand upon his armbut he, too, could not
utter a word; his heart was too full. It seemed a
profanation
to speak aloud, in such a scene, so still, so
beautiful, so serene!
`But,' said the stately old man that accompanied
them, `you ought to be more fully apprised, than I
believe
you are, of whom you are to meet.'
Harold, who had begun to endure the scrutiny of
his eyes with tolerable composure, bowed in silence.
It was irksome to be interrupted at such a moment,
with the matters of the worldand insufferably so, if
not impious, he thought, to touch upon lighter
affairs
,
in a season of such religious beauty. The fine
countenance of the old man was illuminated with a
most benignant smile, as he observed the imploring of
Harold's eye, when he bowed his assent; and still more
was he pleased, when Harold, as he began, threw
himself
back in his seat, pulled his hat over his eyes, as if
to hide his emotion, and sat, with his arms folded,
listening
to what affected him so thrillingly.
`You are a Cumberland,' said Mr. Hammond. `Your
father was George Clarence of Salisbury, third son of
the last Cumberland. He held a seignory in his own
right: the family were wealthybut your father was an
extraordinary manhe loved and was belovedhe had
rivals among the blood royalprincesEnough for the
present. His ungovernable ambition led him to
America
.
You are henceforth to assume the name.If you
choose to retain your commission, which seems to be a
somewhat questionable one, to say nothing of its
danger
you
will be colonel Cumberland; or, if you will
indulge
us
so far, we will delight to recognize you as
Harold of Salisbury. Your sister is known as Caroline,
of SalisburyCumberland is the family name, to be
worn or not, at pleasure. We cannot invest you with
your rights immediately, but we can put you in the
way of living like a gentleman, and of occupying the
place, to which it is probable, that heaven has destined
you
if you deserve it
a place of authority and power.
I am not at liberty to speak more plainly now. In the
mean time, I do trust, young man (this was said in a
manner strikingly solemn and impressive) that you are
not forgetful of your acknowledgmentsno, noI do
not mean
that
. You do not understand me. I do not
mean gratitude of so earthly a characternor does
she
,
I am sure. Your cheek burnsit is a good symptom,
at the slightest impeachment of your gratitude, for the
favours and indulgences of your earthly friendbut
remember my words. I would have them engraven on
thy
heart. They are the essence of all that I have
learnt, all that I can teach thee, and I am now three
score and ten.
Remember thy Creator
.'
Harold
felt
the rebuke. His heart rose in his throat.
He
could
have thrown himself into the old man's arms
as a son, into those of a fatherbut he
dared
not.
There was so much sublimitysomething so serene
and benignant, so dignified and amiable, in the
countenance
before him, that he felt, for the first time, the
reverential
emotions of awe and love, at the same
moment
,
flooding his heart, and rising to his eyes:that
tribute which they, who are not utterly forsaken and
reprobate, involuntarily pay to the aged and goodthe
truly religious and venerablefor the old seem to stand
as especial monuments of divine pleasureliving
beyond
their allotted term, almost by a continually
repeated
miracle. It is, for we all feel it more or less,
the homage that vice itself cannot withhold from
virtue
.
In the presence of a religious man, one who has
been sorely tried and perplexed, during many
generations
with the doings of Providence, and yet stands
upright
and smiling under his gray, thin hair, we seem to
breathe the same air with him, who has long held a
communion, which we are too undeserving, or too
thoughtless to desire, with his Father in heaven
Jehovah
the
living God!Is there notI appeal to thee,
readeris there not somewhat purifying and exalting
in the thought?to meet a fellow creature, just rising
perhaps, from a conversation with the Deityis it not
as if we were one of the men of Israel, that
saw
the
lawgiver descend from the mountain, where he had
been, while it smoked and thundered with the
everlasting
presence.There isand Harold felt it.
Harold was constituted of such materials as martyrs
are compounded from. But, like others, his visitations
were forgotten. Whatever kindness came unexpectedly
to him, he was grateful for: but his gratitude
diminished
,
as the cause increased. He seemed thankful for
nothing that was habitual and familiar to him; to grow
insensible of aught but special favours, and to become
weary, even of acknowledgment. Nay worseeven
the cold, lifeless, habitual exercise of devotion, became
inexpressibly irksome, and dissatisfactory to him, (for
while he felt it so, his heart reproached him for it;) if
heaven were indulgent, for any continued time, to his
infirmities and wants.
From his very boyhood, any unexpected incident,
seeming like kindness, in Him who is habitually kind,
in things where we are most insensiblegood fortune,
no matter of what naturean escape from a precipice,
or a wild beastthe meeting of one that he loved, would
prostrate him upon his face, in the dim solitude, and
he would pray, as the children of nature always do
pray, in breathless and awful silence, pouring out his
very heart in thankfulness.
But, in adversityin calamity, Harold was apt to
forget his God; to rely upon himself alone. To pray
then, seemed to him, in his strange language, like
coaxing
his Maker. `He knows what is best for me
is unchangeable, and why need I importune him?'
Harold
was young yetthoughtless, and obstinate. He
knew not
then
, for he had never asked himself the
question
,
that a father may appoint some mode of
application
,
for his child to pursue in his petitioning, even
when he knows every of its wants, and has already
resolved
upon his course. Prayer is the appointed
medium
,
(this is no cant, readerI am not, and never
was, what people call a religious manstill less am I a
sectarianI belong to no sect, no creedI am neither
Jew nor Turk, Christian nor Mahometanall my
religion
consists in the belief of one supreme Being, to
whom we are all accountableand that, if we do as we
would be done by, it is all that He requiresfor man
to show his dependence upon, submission to, and
confidence
in, his heavenly Father. But, let us return.
Harold was none of those that suffer their conscience
to
repeat
their condemnation, over and over again. No!
And when that monitor once stood up, she was
recognized
and acknowledged, if her countenance were
solemn
,
and her port princely. On this occasion he felt
that he had been forgetful of his kindest benefactor, his
truest friend, and he determined, on the spot, no
longer
to stifle the natural gushings of an affectionate
spirit
,
toward that good and great Being.
Here began the
reformation, the radical and thorough reformation of
Harold
. His heart was sore with its own effort to
purify
itself, and had been so, for a long while; but never
had he seriously and solemnly undertaken to cleanse it
of all impurity and wickedness till now. His first step
was his self-denial respecting Elvira;
that
accomplished,
all others were easy in comparison. It is with virtuous
as with vicious resolves, each hour's acquaintance with
one, makes us fitter to be acquainted with another.
Every act, of either character, is but the link of a long
chain, which by a propensity of our nature, easily
perverted
,
we seem determined to carryand every link
that is lifted, renders the remainder easier and lighter
to be borne. A few bright thoughts, like angels busy
on messages of mercy, passed rapidly through his brain,
during this short ride, and purified and illuminated it,
with the speed and effect of lightning. He was a better
and wiser man, from that moment. The scales fell
from his eyes. Thus, a casual movement of the waters,
had tempted him to go down and wash, and be well,
when they might have been troubled forever, more
violently
,
without affecting him. A slight reproof,
apparently
accidental, though not truly so, (for the old man
was a being of that provident benignity, which will not
obtrude its kindness or admonition unreasonably,) had
done more than much entreaty, great inquietude,
with severe disappointment, travail, weariness and
affliction
had ever done for him.
He lifted his eyes to those of Mr. Hammond, to
thank him, but was startled at a new, yet strangely
familiar
expression in his face. `Surely,' said he, almost
audibly, `I have seen that face before.'
Elvira heard his voice, and asked the reason of his
astonishment. He repeated his remark with an air of
singular perplexity. `Do you not remember the little
man of the woodsyour familiaryou are amazed, I
perceive. He is a relation of your guardian here, I
findand, accompanied your father to America. He
returned with us in the same vessel, without my
knowledge
,
until a few days before our arrival, when he
made himself known to me, and commanded me, in his
strangely imperious way, not to inform thee. He
appears
to be strongly attached to
you
, Haroldbut I
must apprise you that he has been delirious at times,
and that he prophecies much evil against you. You
smilebut he says that you
shall
die a violent and
sudden
death; and bids you be prepared for it, declaring
that
he
is commissioned to tell you so. Nay, do not
look so
very
serious
some
impression I should wish it
to make, but it would be
weakness
to let it disturb you.'
`He
is
commissioned,' said Harold, solemnly.
The mansion was again in sight; for they seemed to
have been travelling round and round it, without
approaching
,
for a whole hour. Harold had kept his eye
upon it for some time, watching it, as the carriage
gradually
rose and sunk, in the undulating and circuitous
road, by which they wound up the beautiful hill upon
which it was built. The cottages about, were literally
embosomed in greenness, and encumbered, roof and
lattice, with a profusion of brilliant wild flowers, shrubs
and vines. Far to the left was a clump of disordered,
broken, and decayed trees, from whose remains the
mouldering bark was, here and there peeled off, leaving
the wood beneath of an intensely white appearance, in
patches and stripesand these were all hung around
with the brightest verdurenewly sprouted, of a most
VOL. II. 9
luxuriant growth; damp and glittering, in garlands, and
tresses, and bunches;so exceedingly fantastick, and
vivid, and beautiful, as to seem the sport of the
mischievous
creatures, that delight in mocking at decay
and ruin, and busy themselves in burying dirt and
rubbish
,
under a vegetation of tenfold brilliancy and
richness
.
From this spot, there commenced, and ran
entirely
over the hill, in a waving line, a mass of
shrubbery
,
chiefly in flower, and changeable with all the
varieties
of purple, yellow, white and green, here and
there intermixed with some delicate trees, that,
shooting
up with a lone, bewildered aspect, from the flowers
below, and spouting, at the termination of the limbs, in
gushes of clustered foliage, vivid as emerald, and
changeable all over, as the wind blew upon them, like
bunches of coloured feathersand looking, at a
distance
,
where the branches, which were often
exceedingly
slender, could not be seen, like something afloat in
the air, motionless in general, but incessantly active at
times. A sheet of water lay belowfar, far below,
shadowed, on one side, by an irregular entrenchment of
young willows, that gave the very depth a tinge of
greentill it looked, all about, like floating herbage:
a dark cloud hung over another part, blackening it to
the far shorewhile, over the other side, the waves
were rippling in the light of a setting sun, now brilliant
as a sheet of flame, and now, as the faint wind went
slowly over it, resembling an agitated mass of clouded
gold,while the wavy outline of shadow was confined
by a broad halo of ruddy and sparkling lightand
sprinkled all over with white and blue pond lilies,
drifting
in ambuscade under their green leaves.
A thunder shower had just passed off, and there was
a transparency in all the green things about, surpassing
all that Harold had ever seen. The foliage looked, or
at least so Harold loved to conceit, as if it were
thankful
for having been newly washed from the dust, and
gave out its beauty and freshness, as an offering to Him,
who had just purified the air and earth. At the
extreme
north of the sky, directly in the centre of a
perfectly
black cloud, which overhung the water,
shadowing
it to the very bottom, as could be seen from the
high hill that overlooked it, like a pile of huge and
broken rock, rampart and parapetthere was a part,
and only a part, of a broad and beautiful rainbow, of
the most brilliant tinting, to be seen. It appeared to
be a solid column of coloured spara pillar of fire and
crystalization. It shone, as if inlaid, in the very
blackest
part of the cloud, and terminated abruptly; not as
rainbows generally do, in a fading and aerial tint, that
defies you to say where the splendid arching hath
ceased:a little higher up, it could be traced again in
a brighter part of the sky, after the eye had been long
searching for it, by a faint, delicate gleaming of rose
colour and gold, much narrower than the base in the
shadow, and resembling, from the tendency of the
sweep, another rainbow. Add to all this picture, which
is no creature of the fancy, the variety of verdure and
huethe nearer leaves, in the fore-ground, shining and
dancing in the wind, like coloured ising-glassthe
farther
ones, of a bluer and graver aspect and movement,
and all finely dying away, on the one side, in a glowing
sunset, and on the other, under a preternatural darkness.
On the very verge of the horizon, the village steeple
shot up, like a white steady flame, into the blue air;
and just by the bend in the pond, a fort had been
erected
,
from which floated a broad banner of many colours,
upon the wind, with a singularly cheerful effect. The
smoke too, from the little hamlet of white, nestling
cottages, was beautiful, just emerging from the
chimneys
,
and running along, almost in a straight line upon
the damp atmosphere, with a density and whiteness,
made remarkable, at this time, from the deep green and
blue of the far landscape, and the black sky beyond.
Harold had the eye of a painter, although he could not
paint; the heart and soul of a poet, although he held,
to his dying day, that it was no proof of ardent, pure,
or natural feeling, nay, nor of religious feeling, to talk
over your raptures, at such a moment, either in verse
or prose. No!the heart swells and swellsthe wing
mounts, and there is a sanctity in your loneliness, which
language or sound, even of musick, breaks in upon, like
some unholy visitantit is, like the feeling of first love,
when the loving and beloved wander together, for the
first time, in the starlighttoo happy, far too happy
to talk, with just enough of life to press each others'
hands with full eyes, and fuller hearts.
Harold was startled from
his
reverie, by the stopping
of the carriage. Reader, let us stop with him. The
old man's eyes were yet upon his countenance, with a
smile of complacency, as if he understood and
approved
his meditations.
Harold offered to assist Elvirashe was deadly pale,
spoke not, but gave him her cold hand, and alighted.
A moment more, and a slight, beautiful form flashed
down the avenue, broke through the trees, and was
instantly
pressed to Elvira's heart.
Elvira whispered something to her, and then gently
led her to Harold. `Are you prepared, my dear
Caroline
,'
said she, `to welcome your new brother?'
Caroline raised her sweet, clear, timid, innocent eyes;
and Harold dropped upon his knees before her.
`My brother!'said she, in a voice hardly audible,
`my
dear
brother!'
`
Thy
brother! dearest! O, yes, I am thy brother! I
feel it
here
and
here
all over, in every artery and
pulse.'
He arose and embraced her, holding her to his
desolate
heart, as if all that earth contained dear to him,
was then within the circumference of his arms.
Elvira stood near, contemplating the scene with a
mixture of delight and sorrow; her look was that of
one who rejoices in the happiness of others, even while
the sight of it brings back many melancholy, and some
deadly recollections.
Our party were soon in the house, and every servant,
old or young, soon discovered something to be done in
the very room where they were. Some, with sidelong
look and averted faces, were adjusting the vines, at the
long window shutters, directly fronting Harold,
although
they
were in the nicest order, because next the
roadwhile others, which were behind him, were
utterly
neglected, although in need of all their attention.
Harold observed all this, and felt an innocent
gratification
in detecting the artifice. Every face looked
kindly upon him; but he was more especially gratified,
when a decrepid old woman, of amazing vivacity and
almost blind, stood before him. She trembled all over
at the touch of his hand, and when he spoke, she
uttered
a faint cry.
`A Cumberland! a Cumberland!aye, go where ye
will, the world over, ye would know one of the blood,
by his voice. Were I blind and deaf, I could tell him
yes, that I could, (running as she said this, her
trembling
,
withered, little hand, over his high forehead, and
peering closely in his face)by the touch alone. Very
darkvery dark, but masculine'She stopped
abruptly
.
`Young man,' said she, `my masterSalisbury
CumberlandHarold, or whatever may be thy name,
God is good
. Remember him. Mayest thou have all
the virtues of thy bloodnone of its follies!'
`Follies, dame,' said Mr. Hammond, `speak plainly
to the young man. This is no time for mincing
matters
.'
`Well then, if it please your worship,
vices
.
Remember
thy fatherthy brotherdo thou rightly, as
thou wouldst shun their sorrow. O, heaven have mercy
on them both! They were noble creatures!'
`Dame!' replied his worship with solemnity. `It is
falsefalse!They were
not
noble. Great qualities
they had, but them they perverted, polluted, degraded,
trampled in the dust. No! they were ignoble, for they
were wicked.'
`Sir,' cried Harold, respectfully`Spare
me
. I am,
as I now find, a son, a brother. Whatever may have
been their transgressions, now surely is not the time to
rake among their ashes.'
Caroline lifted her soft eyes to him,
so
meekly, that
he could hardly refrain from kissing them. They were
wetand as she did so, she leaned somewhat more
9*
confidingly upon his arm. Her terrour,a feeling that
Harold was very apt to excite at first, by his stern
expression
,
and erect, imperious carriage, was fast melting
away, before the thought of the affectionate girl. He
put his lips to her white forehead; and it crimsoned all
over, like a flash of red fireher very neck and bosom
grew ruddy too. Harold's eyes sparkled with pleasure.
So innocent too! said he, and
so
lovely. But loveliness,
and innocence, and purity, cannot be separated.
Mr. Hammond turned a look of approbation upon
him, and was silent; not, it was evident, that he was
intimidated by Harold's reply, or sorry, or exhausted,
but merely because he had said all that the occasion
seemed to require. He never lost an opportunity of
this
sort. He always rose to reprove the unthinking,
when, dazzled and confounded by some magnificent
criminal, they lifted up their voices in his defence. He
had lived long, he used to say, and he had seen more
evil principle, more wretched paradox, gain a seat and
an abiding place in the hearts of society, by the
unprincipled
or thoughtless approbation of high talent, or
enthusiastick tempers, than from any other cause.
He
looked to the
goodness
of a man, as the only standard
of his
greatness:
and he stood, like a giant, in his
denunciation
of them that dared to hold up greatness as
distinct from goodness. `No!' he cried, `the simplest,
humblest act, of the humblest human creature, is really
greater, if it make a fellow creature wiser or happier,
than any deed, though it convulse an empire to its
foundations, and shake the four corners of the earth
with the noise of its trumpeting.' Such was
his
doctrine
.
The sadness of lady Elvira now became painful to
all. She observed it, and knowing her own power,
either to cloud or brighten whatever she approached,
she strove to recover her self-possession; but, the effort
was too distressing, and why should she make it? was
she not among them that loved her? them that were
indulgent
,
and kind-hearted? yet, she was repeating the
attempt, when a harp suddenly sounded in the
apartment
above, like the snapping of a chordshe started
from her seat, and an involuntary exclamation of
terrour
broke from her lipsand even Caroline, Harold
thought, looked paler than usual; but, unacquainted as he
was, with the delicate proprieties of life, he had an
instinctive
and quick perception of what is proper on such
occasions, and therefore took no notice of the sound, nor
of the emotion and dismay that it seemed to have caused.
After a few moments' conversation, Mr. Hammond
took his arm, and led him out upon the lawn, in silence.
The clouds were passing away. Over one part of the
sky, however, there still hung a portentous and strange
darkness, while the other was of the deepest and most
luminous blue, apparently solid, like a vault of sapphire,
with the star light shooting out of it, into the dimness
of their uplifted eyes, like rays from a broken diamond.
`What a sky!' cried Mr. Hammond. `Almighty
Father! this is the work of thy hands.'
These were the thoughts of a man, in his simplicity
and strength. These were the aspirations of true
religion
.
In exclamations like these, so fervent, and
unpremeditated
,
Harold, who knew little and cared less,
for all the artificial distinctions of men, could mingle
all the immortality of his nature. His bible he had
read, but not as a criticknot as a theologiannot as
a votary of scienceno, but, as one who was affected
by its simplicity, and uplifted by the sublime walking
of its spirit. No!but he read his bible,
when
he read
it, which, it is true, was not often, and loved it, as a
book containing all that was needful for the government
and instruction of man, whether in sorrow or suffering,
or throned and sceptred. That he was perplexed with
partsdisturbed by partshe did not deny; but he
found all that was necessary for his happiness, here
and hereafter, so plain, so beautifully plain, and
simple
,
that he
could not
misunderstand it. As for the
meaning of heresy and heterodoxy, and orthodoxy, he
cared nothing. They were but other names to express
what the bible did notthe infallibility of man. No!
exactly in proportion to the immateriality of a doctrine,
he had always found, was its mysteriousness; and the
obstinacy and ingenuity of them that professed it.
Therefore did Harold, in the first yearning of his heart
for higher attainments, learn to abhor and reject
whatever
was inscrutable and mysterious as either
unnecessary
or pernicious, in morals and religion, just as in
the commonest affairs of life. The commandments
were plainso were some other principles and laws.
Do as thou wouldst be done by!that
was his favourite.
It was his religion in so many words; a religion too,
from which, if he departed under some fierce and
unexpected
excitement, his heart never let him rest, until he
had returned to it again.
`What a sky!' echoed Haroldlong, and long after
his companion had forgotten his own voice. `A
studded
canopy of blue crystal, dropt with fire.' Harold
was not trying how well he could express the thought
of his nature at such a moment, but rather he spoke as
if the thought would have way, as if it had fashioned
itself in the solitudes of his heart, associated itself with
a resemblance, like a chosen and natural companion,
and then burst, spontaneously, into being.
`I do not know,' said his companion, `that I ever
before saw such a sky in this country. I have, in Italy
or perhaps, and I dare say there is much reason in
it; perhaps, I am at this moment, one of the happiest
that I ever spent, particularly disposed to turn mine
eyes and thoughts upward; to ramble about infinity, and
to doat and dwell on every green thing, and every
living
thing, that is within the embrace of my thought,
or reach of my vision. Ah, we are happy, here, say what
we will, my dear child; and happiness so far
over-balances
all our sorrows, that it is a sin to complain,
under
any affliction.'
`
I do believe it!
' responded Harold, devoutly. There
was an energy in his manner, too convincing to be
doubted.
`Yes, my son, it is so; and the sooner you begin to
yield yourself entirely to that belief, the sooner you
will be what you desire, a good, and therefore a great
man; for you will be nearer the best and greatest of
beings; more in his presence, and in more intimate
communion with his angels. Beside all this, you will
have an unfailing support in all tribulation.'
`I have found it so. I can now look back upon
all
my disappointments, and trace them step by step, to
their consequences and causes, said Harold, `until I
can see them end in something beneficial. Yes, I do
believe, that I am, at this moment, the better and
happier
,
for what I once thought would break my heart,
or had broken itevents, which I did not wish to
survive
,'
said Harold.
`Yours is an enviable disposition,' answered Mr.
Hammond; `encourage it. Whatever happen, look for
consolation. Do not, as many do, seek to aggravate it.
Think how it might have been
worse
think of what
you have
left
. Remember those who suffer more, and
have less to comfort and uphold them, than yourself.
If you lose a friend, and he be wicked, comfort
yourself
,
that he has escaped an additional weight of guilt,
if good; that he has not lived to
fall
.'
`My own experience, sir, short as it is,' answered
Harold
,
`has taught me this; to look with distrust upon
all events. Hitherto, what I have deemed, at the
moment
of enjoyment, or in the avidity of anticipation, as
the especial and long-sought happiness of my life, has
never ultimately proved so; and what I have too often
received as a calamity, has generally proved the
reverse
.'
`Perhaps, my young friend, there is a reason for
this in our own constitution. If suffering come upon us,
we become wiser, more cautious, kinder, avoiding
temptation
and offence. But if good fortune visit us, we are apt
to fall into forgetfulness, insensibility, negligence, excess,
and arrogance. Take a familiar example. A man is led
into some expense, that upon cool reflection, he finds
his circumstances would not justify. As an honest man,
he not only determines to avoid a repetition of it, but
fixes immediately upon some plan of retrenchment,
which probably leaves him a richer one at the end of
the year, than he would have been, had he not first
been extravagant, or unfortunate. On the contrary, it
has become a proverb, that they who get money in
lotteries
,
lose it in lotteriesso too, by any other means,
without labour, as by inheritance or marriage. A
sudden
accession of wealth, is, in nine cases out of ten,
the destruction of the soberest man. And I will
venture
to declare, that within my experience, there is no
man who has not died poorer for all the prizes that he
has drawn in any of these lotteries. Who are the rich
men? They who were born poorthe aged?they who
were once at the point of death, and learnt caution
the good? they that have been wicked.'
`They, who have robust constitutions, are less likely
to live to a good old age, than others who are sickly.
The former are rash, and perpetually plunging into
danger; the latter are cautious, on all occasions. Take
another example. A boat upsets. Who are the
drowned
?
they that could swimfor they abandoned the boat,
while they that could not, clung to it, and were
generally
saved; and usually, if you hear of one being
drowned
,
it is some one that could swim, and was headstrong,
and daring. So with moralsReputation, and
confidence
in ourselves, are often our destruction; while
distrust
ever preserves us, from every trial and temptation.'
`A lottery, sirI have heard you mention the word
beforepray, what is it?'
`Are you really
so
ignorant? I am glad of it. It is a
legislative gambling.'
`Gambling! I do not understandis not gambling a
vice?'
`Yes, when perpetrated on a small scale. It is
prohibited
in private, and among them who have few
amusements. Laws are made against it. It is
reprobated
.
The pulpit and the stage, and the forum ring with
denunciations against it. A professed gambler is little
better than an outcast, living by his plunder and
depredations. But, mark the difference. The very
government that prohibits small gambling, as ruinous
and improvident, in every shape, and leading to the
worst encouragement of man's worst viceshis
avarice
,
cunning, and laziness, will set on foot,
countenance
,
and uphold, on the most magnificent scale
a gambling table for millions!'
`How!for what purpose?'
`Why, to build a
church!
a bridge, or a monument.'
`A monument! what is
that?
I
am
exceedingly
ignorant
,
I confess.'
`Some useless edifice; a column for example, of
stone masonry, erected at an expense that would build
an hospital for the scarred, and wind-beaten veteran
to perpetuate what?the virtues of men that cannot be
forgotten.'
`A
great
man. Is it necessary? Are great men so
soon forgotten, here? Are monuments common?'
`I am amazed at thy simplicity, Harold. Thou art
indeed, a child of nature, a republican after God's own
heart. It is, to speak seriously, an idle and profligate
waste of money; a shameful and useless piece of
ostentation
;
as if the truly
great
, and their memories, would
not outlast all monuments. And yet, thousands of poor
creatures are made to contribute, by ministering to
their vices, to the erection of some Babeland deluded
into the most destructive habits, under the fascination
of the game. Noif we must have monuments, let
them be useful asylums for the indigent. Was the great
man a hero, the deliverer of his country, there should
be a refuge for them that toiled with him in that
delivery
,
or for the afflicted of their posterity. Beside, it
is a wicked and foolish precedent. Every publick man
must have his monument, in time.'
Harold stood leaning over the gate, under a huge
oak, and listening, with all his soul, to the calm,
honest
speculations of his companion, respecting lotteries,
and gambling, and monuments.
`Gracious heaven!' cried Harold, at length; `but
what respect can men have for such laws? The same
deed punished as a crime, denounced and scorned,
when done in one way; and yet encouraged, proclaimed,
and trumpeted forth, as pious, charitable, and
patriotick
,
if done in another!'
`Nay, this is not half,' quoth the other. `A debtor is
not deterred from adventuring desperately in a lottery;
on the contrary, just in proportion to his emergencies
will be his spirit of adventure. He will invest his funds,
as a sure resource, in lottery tickets, reasoning thus:
`What I win is mine; what I lose is my creditors'.
And this is strictly true. In the former case, he goes
on, and flourishes away, till new distresses drive him to
a repetition of the same adventure; in the latter, he
becomes
a bankrupt. It is no reproach to have grown rich
by a prize; hence, he is not to be deterred from the
lottery
office, though he be from the gaming table. Of
whom, does the winner in a lottery, take
his
winnings?
generally, from the poor and needy; them that are not his
equals, and cannot afford to lose. Nay, from men who have
starved their families to raise the money, which he has
won. How many of the poor and miserable, infatuated
by the success of some unknown speculator, by
worrying
penny from penny out of famine and nakedness;
have finally accumulated enough to buy a chance in
some lotterybought itand spent the period of
expectation
in a fever of restlessness and idleness, expecting
`a prize!' for it is in vain to deny itevery man
expects
a prize, or he is a fool for buying a share.'
`Is not all this worse than gambling? In gambling, you
win from your equals. In a lottery, from the very blind,
and maimed, and starving of society; at least, in part.
Gambling is, therefore, less base and sordid of the two.
And is it not, as if heaven so judged it, and dealt
out the maledictions of the poor and disappointed?
Look about, and see what has become of the
fortunate
.
The reason is plain. There is no miracle, no judgment,
no especial interposition of heaven. He who has drawn
a prize, becomes a gambler in every thing. Sober
acquisition
is drudgery to him. No maxim is more
universally
just than this; whatever is with
difficulty
acquired
,
is with
difficulty
lost. Who are the rich and
great?they that
were
poor and little. Let no man
gamble
,
if he would be permanently respectable, and least
of all, in lotteries. Another reason why
they
are worse
than faro tables, is, that there is no publick obloquy
attached
to him who has enriched himself by the former,
and consequently, nothing to counteract the
temptations
that beset him, But'
`But, what a sky!' he repeated again, laying his
hand affectionately upon Harold's uncovered head.
The moon was at the full. The abundant foliage, the
changeable willow braid, the distant elevations, were
all shifting from alternate shadow of the deepest hue,
to the lustre of a mild and beautiful light. Not a sound
fell upon the ear. The water below, lay like a sheet of
pearl, gently tremulous, and glimmering, as if to the
tread of something spiritual, or to some subterranean
agitation; while an occasional bubble, breaking in the
deeper part, or a sharp, quick ripple, as some insect was
suddenly snatched by a glittering creature, that just
twinkled along the surface, disturbing the shadow and
smoothness, like a flash of fire, under the willow trees,
now and then arrested the eye.
`Do you see
that
star?' said the venerable man?
`How very bright!'
`I have seen that very star in daylight,' said Harold
it is an old acquaintance of mine; at least, so it
appears
,
even in this hemisphere.'
`In day light! where?'
`In my own country. At four o'clock in the
afternoon
,
I have seen the whole sky of this same deep
purple, nay, deeper, almost black, and with all the
evenness
of a midnight skythe sun burning with a
golden
splendour, and a star or two, within its very halo,
distinctly visible.'
`Can it be!how do you account for it?'
`We attribute it there, to the elevation of the land,
but I am inclined to ascribe it to the singular clearness
of the atmosphere. Some of its phenomena are very
striking. For leagues and leagues, nay, from horizon
to horizon, you can see the most delicate smoke. At
first sight, judging from the experience of a more
northern
climate, I have been led to estimate distances as
at home: and have believed, that a few hours'
travelling
would bring us to a smoke, toward which we have
actually travelled for whole days afterward, without
appearing to approach it. You would hardly credit it,
VOL. II. 10
but such is the fact, that a wild buffaloe, or any other
animal, which we have butchered and left bleeding,
would dry up without any symptom of putrescency
giving out no offensive odour, and literally exhaling
their juices, as by a chemical operation.'
`It is very warm then, I suppose.'
`No; not more so, than in more northern climates;
or at least, not so, as to be sensible to us.'
`What a beautiful firmament it must be.'
`Yes; but, like all others, it has its drawback. It is
blinding, in its effect upon the eyes. Many of the
natives
are blind; and, of our party, when I visited it,
many became totally so.'
`Another instance of that equality of distribution
in the gifts, and blessings of heaven, which we have
been speaking of. But you mentioned other
phenomena
.'
`Yes; and I will enumerate some. Our liquors would
dry so fast, that some of our party could scarcely be
persuaded, that others had not robbed them. I
remember
once, when the colour of the sky was particularly
striking, for its exceeding clearness and depth of blue,
that three of us left our encampment, for the purpose of
visiting a huge mass of rocks, that appeared, at the
furthest
,
only a few hours travel from us, and actually
lowering above our heads. We could distinguish the
festoons
of wild, creeping plants upon them: and the
divisions
,
strata, and coloured veins, were distinctly to be
traced; but we travelled a whole day and night, and then
gave up the attempt, unable even to conjecture the
distance
.
It happened, however, soon after, that we visited
part of this same mountain. It was one of a vast
chain. Our company were about eighty hunters, with
their horses, buffaloes, tents, and game. A part of
us ascended the mountain, when we found that the
trailing vines, as we had supposed them to be, were
trees of gigantick dimensions; and that what we
mistook
for veins, were, in reality, immense cavities,
fissures
,
and chasms. That we might the more easily
return
to the spot, whence we departed, we took for our
guide, a glittering white rock, resembling, in its
altitude
and dimensions, a fortress, which stood just above
the heads of our party. We soon lost sight of it,
however
,
and on our return, were first struck, while
looking
for it, with what appeared to be a bright star. We
approached; it grew larger, but not brighter, until we
found it to be the whole rock. In other climates, you
know, an object like this, waxes dimmer and dimmer
as we leave it. This did notit only grew smaller and
smaller, and was as bright when we first saw it, as when
we were nearAh!do you hear nothing?'
`Yes, something from the water, like mournful
musick
.'
Harold trembled`It is very mournful,' said
he`gracious heaven! I have heard that before
that
,
in the very wilderness of AmericaO, I remember it
wellmy father used to sing it to me, in my childhood.
I have never heard it sincemy mother too!perhaps
it is her voicehush!hush!Dost
thou
believe, good
old man, that the disembodied are ever permitted to
revisit the earth for any purpose?'
`Art thou serious?' said his companion, in an
agitated
voice.
`Yea, to the furthest and holiest solemnity of my
thought.'
`Well then, I will utter that to thee, which I never
uttered to any human being before
I do believe it!I
have seen and heard the departed
.'
Harold quaked as if he were communing with some
spiritual one, and saw all the mystery and terrour of
the charnel house, laid slowly open before his eyes.
The musick seemed to approach. A clear and tender
voice accompanied it. `It is of earth!' said Harold,
`but I could almost believe that my own dear mother,
to whom I am sure, my father, when he was happy,
taught that song, was visiting me. O, there are no
associations
of memory so tender, so soothing, so
beautifully
touching, as those of musick. You feel as if her
harp, hung up in the desolate apartments of your heart,
were taken tenderly down, by some loved and departed
spirit, and touched kindly again, with all the inimitable
delicacy of another world, and all the truth of life.'
It
was
a harp! and Harold heard it for the first time.
There was nothing artificial, nothing difficult, even to
his ear, in the serene and thrilling modulations. It died
away, and he stood like one entranced, waiting on tip
toe, to catch the first sound of something heavenly in
its approach. A momentary intermission, and then
followed
a recitative so expressive, so sweet, and so
passionate
withal, that he clasped his hands involuntarily,
and the tears stood in his eyesthe voice rang in his
very heart, like the note of a silver bugle, blown at
midnight, over the dim water.
`Let us go in, Haroldthe night dews are heavy,'
said the old man, taking his arm. `Caroline's voice hath
more witchery, there.'
`Caroline! was it she, then, that passed by me in the
wind!
dear
Caroline!'
They entered, and Caroline timidly gave her hand to
Harold, who, scarcely daring to believe that a form so
frail, a countenance so delicate and meek, could have
poured out such a profusion of sound, with such
compass
,
and power, and yet with such exquisite and
feeling
modulation, threw his arm around her beautiful
waist, and said in a low, agitated voice, `
was
it thy
voice, Caroline?'
She smiled, and put back the dark hair that fell over
his forehead, as he leaned toward her, with his whole
soul breaking out of his eyes. `Yes,
brother
, it was.
Did it reach your ear?' `Yes, and my heartit is there
yet. I hear it, feel it, in all those sweet, impassioned,
enthusiastick undulations, revelling in its caverns!
Come, dear, let me hear it once more.'
She shook her head.
`Nay, Caroline, only once more.'
It was in vain to refuseshe was too gentle for that;
so, putting away his fond arm, and adjusting her
beautiful
hair, which had fallen over her eyes, she began
another song. Her voice trembled at first, a very little,
but soon became steady; while her bosom heaved, and
her tremulous lip betrayed the deep emotion of her
heart. She felt every word, and every note. It was a
simple and melancholy song, and the expression of her
eyes was so mournful and touching, the smooth,
flutelike
tune of her throat so tender and clear, that all
who heard her, held their breath without knowing it.
Harold's `rapt soul was sitting in his eyes;' he dwelt
upon
hers
, and their intensely deep expression of
tenderness
:
their hue had changed, they were almost black,
and when her long sweet toning, which appeared so
natural, and so endless, as if her breath would never
fail her, growing louder and clearer, without effort or
suspension;with her forehead elevated, her eyes
uplifted
,
and her lashes glisteningwhen all this awoke
before him, Harold could have thrown himself upon
her bosom, sobbing with delight, and called her his
own, his only sister.
She arose, and when she met her brother's eye, wet
and gleaming like a dark brilliant, she blushed. It was
now time to separateHarold pressed her pure
forehead
,
and turned to
depart
.
`O, no, Haroldno!'said Caroline. `
That
must
not be. We have arranged all this. Our guardian
here, says that this is your home.'
`Home!' cried Harold, inaudiblythe sound was
so
delightful to himto be at
home
, at last, when he had
looked for it only in the green earth. His heart
breathed
,
as it were, in tears that had flowed from the soft
eyes of beauty. Here was his sistera creature sprung
up, all at once before him, as if by enchantment; a
flower found in a desolate place, by running water
Their friends had gone, gone in silence, and Caroline
and Harold sat, holding each other's hands, and
watching
their carriage, as it rolled away through the dim
avenue, the harness here and there glittering, for a brief
moment, in the moonlight, and the wheels alternately
rattling over the stone bridge, or cutting with a dull,
heavy sound, their path through the fine wet sand.
Caroline was leaning, with a mingled sensation of love
and shame, delight and modesty, upon his shoulder,
her sweet face lifted to heaven, with the dewy traces
of recent weeping yet to be seen, about her smooth
eyes.
`Sleepy? my sister'It was delightful to pronounce
the endearing name. `Caroline, loveart thou sleepy?'
said Harold, softly pressing her to his bosom.
`O, no! or if I were,' said she, meekly, `I could
10*
sleep
here
forever!' turning her face downward, and
dropping her lids with the affectionate delicacy of a
young and innocent creature, who, unaccustomed to
the caresses of a man, is trembling even within the
arms of a brother.
Their cheeks touched; her hair blew over his face
his fingers strayed a moment among the soft tresses,
and he drew her eye-lids again, and again to his lips,
with a feeling of the purest tenderness. Her colour
came, and the poor girl half broke from his arms,
before
she recollected that he was her brother; but when
she did, she replaced herself in the same situation,
with a charming expression of confidence, consummate
confidence.
`How like you are to Oscar!' said Caroline, after
gazing at him, with uncommon steadiness, for a moment.
`You have all but his fiercenesshis implacable
dominion
of eye and foreheadand your mouth, it is a
kinder mouth; and then, you are so much younger
how old are you, brother?'
`Twenty-two, dear.'
`And I only eighteenwhy, really, I think that I
am about as old as you.'
Harold was thoughtful`why, how is this?' said he,
`do you recollect our father?'
`No, I never saw him,' answered Caroline,
trembling
.
`The last time my mother met him, it was
unexpectedly
.
He had been in the east, as she then
supposed
and
he departed immediately after I was born.
We have never heard of him, or from him, since.'
Harold knew not that his father had ever returned,
even for an hour, from America; but now he
recollected
that there was a story among his enemies that he
had died, and was buried; and that two or three
autumns
afterward he reappeared; and was found, sitting
upon his own grave, by some hunters, who had
wandered
and tracked him in the frost and leaves.
`Did'st thou love Oscar? Caroline.'
`Love him! O, that I did. Harold, dear,
dear
Harold
(she
kissed him with a convulsive lip) beware of
his example. O, he was too like thee, I fearand thou
art too like him, I am told.'
`But gogo, now, my beloved brother,' she added,
smiling. `You will want refreshment; and to tell you
the truth, I do think that a few hours repose will not
be amiss for me; and yet I cannot sleepI am too
happy to sleep; and last night, I was too anxious. I
have'nt set down, since day light, expecting my brother,
and have not eaten a mouthfulI could not eat, could
you? my heart was too full. I was too
happy
to eat
too, I believe. So, good night, Harold!'
Saying this, she arose, and, Harold reluctantly
prepared
to obey, as she touched the bell; but she arrested
him, adding with a serious countenance, `stay, dear
brotherthere are some old habits, notions,
repugnances
to be overcome in this familyand the sooner we
begin to overcome them, the better. Will you sleep in
Oscar's room?'
`In Oscar's! my brother's? Certainly, with all my
heart.'
`Thank you, thank you, Harold! That is another
trait of resemblance, so prompt and decisive!' A
silence
of some minutes followed.
`It has never been opened since the eveningnay, I
cannot tell thee when'(her face grew palid) `until
within a few days, except by the servants to dust and
air it. Every thing within it, every thing, I believe, is
exactly as he left it. You will sleep in the same bed
read the same booksby the same lampand,' she
added, cheerfully patting his arm, `by and by, we will
sit and sing together, as he and I used topoor Oscar!
do you sing, Harold?'
`No, dear!'
`No!not sing! why, what do you do with that
voice of yours. It is one of the finest in the world;
Elvira
says it isnay, dont blush, I'm sure 'tis the truth.
So, I shall teach you to sing. Do you play?'
`Yes, the broadsword.'
`Ah, brother!' cried the poor girl, `every word that
you utter, reminds me so of Oscar, that I quake in
imagining some fearful resemblance.
That
was exactly
his manner once, when I heard himit nearly cost him
his life. We were at a table, together. He was only a
boy. A gentleman present, who was certainly not very
scrupulous in his matters of fact, complained, when
pressed to eat of a certain dish, that he could not.'
`Why, said my aunt?'
`I have a blister on my tongue, madam.'
`Perhaps you have been telling a
fib
,' said a little
pert cousin of mine.'
`No,' said Oscar, rivetting his fierce eyes upon the
man's face, and speaking in a deliberate, low voice,
that made every heart thrillno! I
suspect that the
gentleman has been telling the truth
. O, Harold! never
shall I forget the tone in which that was said, the
burning
sarcasm of looknor the scene that followed. The
man was carried home, as we thought, mortally
wounded
,
for he had the audacity to strike Oscar.'
`Strike him!' cried Harold, raising his arm, `and
what did Oscar
then?
'
`Smote him to the heart!' said Caroline, trembling
all over, `as I fear
you
would do!O, Harold!
Harold
I
could not bear to lose
thee!
I loved him with
all his faults, and he was very stern and awful to me at
times. But I loved him, when all else had ceased to
love him; and I will love thee, my brother, wert thou
more terrible than was ever Oscarredderaye,
redder
with the blood of mine own heartof him I so
loved!Ah, mercy! mercy!'
Harold caught her in his armsbore her to the
window
,
where she soon recovered. She then rang the bell,
and, with her own hand, lighted him to his apartment.
Her tread faltered as she enteredand she leant more
heavily upon his arm, and trembled, as he thought. A
superb harp, much larger and more costly than that
below
,
rested in a niche, with a coloured, arching window
near, reaching from the top to the bottom of the wall.
A table, with musick open, lay before it; a candle
partly
burnt down; a flute; a dirk; from which Mary turned
her eyes with a quick shudder, as Harold laid his hands
upon it. A flood of moonlight, pouring through the
white curtains, fell upon the floor, and upon a picture
opposite. Harold paused. A single glance was
sufficient
.
It was Oscar himself; Oscar in his strength and
sublimity; his dark eye searching your heart; his lips,
partly unclosed, as about to speak what his proud nature
scorned to conceal; and his bold front; thick locks;
grandeur of forehead, together with the spirited, firm
and accurate cut of outline, formed altogether an
assemblage
of character, never to be forgotten. The
expression
was collected, thoughtful, wrought with fire,
just as he had seen it in life.
Harold could not forbear looking up to it, and
dwelling
upon the deep composure of its countenance, the far
thought that seemed impatiently working itself upward
from the depth of a mighty heart, and the yearning
eagerness of look, as of one intent upon wonderful
things. `How like his attitude and bearing in life,'
exclaimed
Harold, locking his hands, `so stern, so high,
so cold! rebuking all around him into silence and awe.'
`Once more Caroline, dear Caroline, good night.'
`Good night! good night! Harold.'
Harold threw himself upon a couch; but it was in
vain to think of sleeping. He arose, and set his lamp
in the niche, and his thoughts took a course, in which
they had long been familiar, over the wide Atlantic,
to his Indian girl. `O, Loena!' he said aloud, `would
that thou wast near me! that thou couldst write to me,
or I to thee!' He arose and walked the room, waxing
feverish, as he reflected on the time that must elapse,
in a season of war, before he could know aught of her
destiny. `I will write this moment to De Vaudreuil,'
said he, and seated himself at the table. He attempted
to open the drawer, and at length succeeded, but the
bolts of the lock were rusty from long disuse. He found
what he wanted, some paper, but it was spotted and
discoloured, and soaked, as if some glutinous liquid had
penetrated the wood and stained it, long, and long
before
.
He found some words, faintly traced, as by a
female
hand upon the top of one of the pages. It was as
follows: `
En esto quisiera ser instruida con toda
exactitud
.
Amais todavia a vuestra.E
.'
This was sufficient for Harold; he shrank from a
further
examination of the words, satisfied that they were
the language of love.
He next observed the green cloth that covered the
desk; that too, was stiff and dark, as if saturated with
he shudderedhis brain grew darkperhaps this
was the very room where the murder was perpetrated
it wasit must be soand
that
was the very
dagger
!`yet
why are they here?' said he.
`Blood! blood!' cried Harold, convulsively retreating
from it, fearing even to set his foot upon the floor, as
if it were yet slippery,to lay his hand upon a chair,
lest he might find it adhesive, when he would pluck it
away.
He turned to the window, giddy and sick; the cool
air was delicious. It came, like a blessing, to his
forehead
and lips; but, as he threw aside the heavy white
curtains, to obtain a freer view of the prospect, he
observed
a deep shadow upon them, a shadow which
remained
after he had separated the folds; he laid his
hand upon it, it was harsh and unpleasant to the touch;
he revolted, as his hand came in contact with it, and
then, like one maddening in delirium, impatient to know
the worst at once, he ran to the bed and threw down
the sheets, expecting to find a body bleeding and
wounded
in his very bedhe was beside himself, indeed,
with fear; but he was disappointed. The bed was
untenanted
,
and the linen, white as the driven snow,
unstained
,
unpolluted. `But why are they left thus?' he
cried, `is it to appal me? What fearful crime is this,
whose vestiges beset me? And why am I made to sleep
in the very presence of the murderer, and the murdered?
Is it, that they whom I have slain, may start up in their
winding sheets? He leant his forehead upon his hands,
his temples throbbing with dreadful violence, and his
arteries aching with the heavy current of his blood.
He arose to take down a book, determined to read,
when he recollected the bundle of letters which Elvira
had given him. They were in his baggage, and he soon
tore them open, and began reading; he trembled; a
fierce and apalling intensity increasing, as he proceeded
The manuscripts were numbered, and he was
proceeding
to assort them, when the apparition of Oscar
suddenly
stood before him!the paper fell from his hands
he gasped for breathwhat had disturbed the
dreadful
spirit? Was
he
tresspassing upon his exclusive
dominion
?
He had come too, unannounced, unheralded,
and there he was! Harold attempted to speak, but he
could utter no sound. A cloud passed over the shadow,
and it was gone. Could he have been deceived? Was
it not the very form and attitude of his dead brother?
The light again shone out, and the spectre reappeared
in the same placehe approached it with a leap, and
as
he
thought, passed through it! His blood curdled,
and his knees smote together at first; nor was it until
he had uncovered his eyes, and changed his position,
that he discovered the truthit was his own shadow
upon the wall! The hot blood rushed over his cheeks,
as he made the discovery`accursed effects of
education
,'
he cried, `how terribly have I been unmanned,
again and again, with some such delusion as this; and
yet I have no more command of myself now, than I had
in my childhood, when I used to hear of spectres, and
devils.'
He reseated himself, still trembling, and began to
read. Alas, Alas! it is no wonder that he shook. It was
his own destiny. The hand writing was new to him.
It was a bold, strong, uniform character; and Harold,
who had long observed that all our habits are but an
epitome of our character, felt instantly convinced that
the writer was alike, intellectually bold, and uniform.
He whose character is established, he had observed,
does every thing methodically, and alikehe walks,
and writes, and talks, neither faster nor slower; while he,
who is variable and capricious, writes a variety of
hands, never walks twice alike, and is eternally going
faster or slower in his speech. He opened number 1.
It was a letter of advice, and opinion, and related,
Harold soon found reason for believing, to Oscar. It
described some young man, as compounded of the most
contradictory and heroick qualities;suspicious, yet
full of unexampled confidence at times; generous, and
magnanimous, yet revengeful to an excess; unsparing
and deadly in his hostilities, yet risking his life and
soul for the benefit of his mortal enemy; courting
danger
and difficulty; delighting in contradiction and
paradox
in all sciences, and on all subjects; eloquent,
passionate
,
persevering; superstitious to the last degree,
and subject to such tremendous transports of rage, that
they had finally destroyed him. Allusions were darkly
made to some mysterious crimebut as if it were
perpetrated
in delirium.
He took up another. It was in a female hand,
written
evidently with a perturbed spirit, and probably
copied
,
as it appeared to be a narrative, interrupted and
broken, though joined altogether by the last copier. It
was as follows:
`How still it is! The very winds are lifeless. A
moment
since, and they came over my hot forehead, from
the north, like the breathing of a strong man. The
beating of my temples hath ceased. My arteries too,
are tranquil, now, but very cold and icy. Why is this?
O Nature! Is it sympathy between ye and me, ye
winds! clouds! and thou, sky of the Almighty!
dwelling
of the unapproachablethou! the self-upholden
vault!
`O Nature! my passions awake and are rebellious with
thee; and thou, O moon! who holdest thy continuity of
march, forever and ever, whence is
thy
dominion over
me! With thee, I wax and wane! With thee I conjure
up the elementsholding communion with
spiritualities
,
broad and boundless. With thine,
my
light is
diminished
and shut out, and I am doomed to
accompany
thee, in thine eternal pilgrimage of shadow and
change. My passions slumber or storm with thee!
When thou art upon the great deep, lo! my spirit is
with thee!
` O, why is this! But a little while, and I
was lifted above mortality; for thy winds went by me,
and over me, thou blue heaven! and encompassed me
round about. A cheerful tide, a very wonderful tide,
flowed over my poor withered, desolate heart. It was
refreshed, and filled up, and I was happy. It was
upborne
,
and whirling, and eddying therein.'
`How still it is! Behold yon beautiful assembly of
trees, the waving tresses of yon high battlements,
swinging, all flower and greenness, in the star-light.
The sky, the illimitable, the inaccessible sky! with all the
drifting clouds, hurrying away beneath it, like a
routed
multitude, with banners and smoke; rallying anon,
and parting again, and disappearingwith here and
there, a luminous ridge, as of drifted pearl, washed up
on the sea shoreand there, a vast tent, shattered in
the wind, and covering the blue void with luminous
and flying fragments. And the blue, dim water
yonder
,
all now rolling, and heaving, and murmuring with
inward vitalityeven that is hushed now, into an
awful
repose. The moonlight too, but now trembling with
activity, like a vapour of quicksilver, hath grown
brighter
,
unspeakably brighther, but motionless. O, this is no
natural shiningit is the breath of a spirit! Can it be
her's?no, noit is the cold, still lustre of a northern
sky, in the depth of winternot a tender, warm,
autumnal
light, befitting the seasonno!
`My thoughts toowhere are they? hitherto rioting
and soaring, full of wing and motionaspiring,
gallantly
,
to an equality with the highest and brightest of
yonder high and bright divinities of fire. Stars!I
kneel to you. Ye, that are established round about the
dwelling of my Father, ye cherubimye that tread,
forever
and ever, the fathomless vacancy of heaven. Ye
seraphim!O scorn me notfor lo, I am as one of you.
The divinity is stirring within me, and behold, I mount!
I mount!     O,
my beloved! where art thou? The winds have died
away, and I hear not yet thy foot-step in the air. O
moon!a death-like expression is sitting even in
thy
countenance. Thou art unusually pale. And thou,
dearest
thou,
whom I can see, with thy fair tresses,
floating
like a halo, about thee, thou art dim, and distant to
my weary and disconsolate heart. O shine out! shine
out!     where
am I?what am I?subduedsickeningfainting
clinging to the vile earth for support, and sustenance
yea, to the very rocks, from whose crown I have just
VOL. II. 11
leaped, in exulting derisiontrampled on and spurned.
How still it is!'
Such was the language of this paper. Another
followed
,
marked 3, appearing to have been written by
another
person. It was almost illegible, and after this
fashion
.
`He stood, with his cheek resting upon his hand, and
leaning against a high rock, from which, I verily
believe
,
that he had just leaped. How he escaped, is
unaccountable
to me; for I have known animals to be
dashed
in pieces, by falling from it. His forehead was
gathered
and wrought, and somewhat agitated at times; for,
now and then, there was a hasty quivering over its
mortal paleness, as if it was the surface of some liquid,
inwardly disturbed. Within his sunken, wild, and
singularly
beautiful eyes, there was a sad and settled
expression
,
as of one, originally filled with high thought,
and clothed with prerogativewho had been stricken
from his sphere. As his forehead darkened, his black
eye would shine out, for a moment, and then wane
away, as if it were holding a brief communion, by
glimpses, with some spiritual thing, invisible to the
rest of the world, and passing very near to it. His
thick, shining hair, neglected, and black as jet, gathered,
with the effect of sculpture about his low, pale forehead,
and, as he stood before me, shadowing the upper part
of his remarkable face, gave such bold, and effectual
relief to his spirited features, and such additional
brightness to the thin emaciated hands, which, in the
abstraction of his spirit, as his eyes were devoutly
raised
,
were buried in the thick locks, as to give to his
whole person, so motionless and picturesque, all the
effect
of beautiful sculpture by moonlight. Thus stood
he; and thus looked he, when I first encountered him,
on that memorable evening. Judge of my emotion, my
terrour. I knew his character, his mortal hatred for
me; and I had fallen upon him thus, unexpectedly,
unarmed
,
and upon the brow of a precipice. My knees
knocked together, and I lost my breath entirely. And
yet, there was such a fascination about him that I
could
not leave him, nay, I did not even wish to leave him.
He was very beautiful, thrillingly so. In his
immovable
attitude, in the unostentatious, careless grace, and
waving outline of his personin the singular firmness
and precision of his featuresthe shadows so bold
and the lights so lucid, and yet, of such death-like,
marble whiteness, there was a combination too
unearthly
to be forgotten. And II would as soon have
looked
from the lake of Geneva, up to some inaccessible
height, and expected the genius of statuary herself, to
burst, from the solid rock, upon my vision, as to have
seen him, in such a scene, at such a moment. Such
was my infatuation, too, that, I verily believe, that had
I seen the red clouds rolling under his feet, and the blue
lightnings discharged from his hands, it would not have
augmented my astonishment. He stood so like a being
of another world, half embodied in the moonlight.'
`All around were huge, mis-shapen rocks, bleak
mountains, and precipices; riven, and splintered peaks
hung with funereal verdure, and garlanded with
blasted
underwoodreflected in a deep, fathomless, cold
water. The sky was of a remarkable colourvery
clear, and glittering with a metallick splendour, and a
tinge of crimson, that kept shifting incessantly over it,
like the red light of battle on the steely armour of
charging cavalry:a vault, built of blue satin spar,
illuminated
by coloured vapours, and broken diamonds.
`His form, I had leisure now to study. He took no
notice of me. I wondered at it, for he evidently
saw
me, but as if he saw me not. It was attenuated
grievously
,
by his wandering and confinement. He looked
like one who can see his own heart decaying, dropping
away, piecemeal, before his own eyes. His voice was
musick itself, but a musick so melancholy, of a
sweetness
so broken-hearted, so like the voice of one that is
going alive, trembling, and reluctant to his own coffin
going!in the full possession of every sublime and
towering facultyknowing his destinyknowing that
he
must
diethat there is no health in himno help
for himgoinginto the chamber of death! Gracious
heaven! what a situation for one like himlingering and
decaying; exhausting his spirit in prayer, knowing for
what he was created, and what he
might have been
,
with a few more years, a little patience, a little love,
a little charity and forbearance, a kind heart to beat
with his, to be his heaven and refuge; in the ranks and
on the roll of glory, mingling in the shock of armies,
thundering in the senate chamber, battling for liberty
and renown, side by side, with the youthful and the
great, the covetous of dominion; or standing in the
commission
of the MOST HIGH, and stretching out his hands,
like the apostle, above the altars and the gods of
idolatry
,
which shook, and fell, and crumbled, and
disappeared
before his denunciation; or tuning a loud and
lofty harp, under the visiting of inspiration, in wind
and fire. O think of him! weep for him! pray for him,
as I did, knowing that the hand of death was upon him,
and that he was waning away, like an ethereal presence
before some unholy rite. And such a voice! O I shall
never hear it again. Oscar, mine enemy! I could have
loved thee! I would, had not thy terrible hand cut
asunder the ties that were attaching my spirit to thine.
Methinks I can hear thy voice now, whenever the moon
is at the full, and I am wandering where I last saw
thee! so bewildering, melancholy, sweet, and uncertain,
like the lingering intonations of a broken heart.'
The narrative was here taken up with allusions that
were utterly unintelligible, for a whole page; but these
were succeeded by another hand-writingas follows:
`His sister was sitting by his side; her eyes were
meekly lifted, and rivetted upon his with the most
affectionate
solicitude. A stranger might have suspected
an interest more tender, treacherous, thrilling,
intertwining
,
with a more delicate avidity, with the keenest
tendrils of sensibilitysomewhat, more impassioned
than sisters ever feel for brothers, in the beautiful and
devout earnestness of her watching. It was a sister
studying the deep, deep spirit of her brother, in its
most awful and mysterious abstractioncontemplating
him as a creature of other elements, more sublimated,
more spiritualized, than herself; or, indeed, than any
other being on earth, compounded of dust and ashes.
She was right. He was, although chiefly of baser
materials
,
so mixed up with fire and gold, and glittering
and precious essences, as to be unlike aught of earthly
creation, except its idols. He was a genius; but O,
how unlike them that are so called. He did not affect
to be gloomy, wretched, or stern; no! but with all
things to make him so, he was forever the reverse.
He was a creature of the rarest intellectual combination
made up of properties, active and illimitable;
sensibilities
,
of a touch and tenderness so exquisite, as to
madden in their excitement; an imagination without
limit or shape, beating with vast and articulate
conceptions
;
a heart swelling, when smitten or oppressed,
like a trampled empire, with august and terrible
apparitions
;
with thoughts rising from the dust, and
standing
up, in the plenitude of authority, like monarchs
that have been buried together, with all the trappings
of royalty; and rising at the trumpet of the last day.
In one word,
Oscar was a genius
. The fountains of his
inspiration ran fire, and were to be approached, when
in blast, but at the peril of blindness and destruction.
The promptings of
his
god were for the hallowed and
secret recesses of his heart; a fearful solitude, full
of strange shapes, and echoing only to the thunder;
and illuminated only by the pale lightning. Yes! Oscar
was a genius;
from head to foot, a creature of
desperate
energies, irregular appetite, and sublime
incoherency
feeling
his unquestioned, unquestionable
prerogative
,
and trampling, in the pride of his heart, in
mockery
,
upon the prejudices of men; filled with a devouring
intensity of thought that burned like a furnace,
overflowing
with molten gold, running with lavafervid and
blinding! stationed, in unapproachable supremacy,
occupying
,
as by the mere action of his own will, where
none might dare to gainsay it, the chiefest elevation
among the gifted and endowed, the sons of God! yet
torn, distracted, as by a beleaguering host without,
and a rebellious spirit within, forever battling there
with unappeasable ambition.
`He had already, young as he was, sallied out upon
the highway of nations; tendered
his
contribution to
11*
the crowned and sceptred things of earth, toiled and
battled, and conquered. He had been shipwrecked,
shattered, and thrown, with all the accumulated riches
of his life, his honour, love, hope, ambition, upon an
iron shore. The temple, toward which he had
trodden
in pilgrimage, with bleeding and naked feet,
incessantly
receding as he approached, had, at lastwhen
he thought to set his foot, with the very next step, upon
its glittering, burnished threshold, and lay hold upon
the horns of the altar, smoking with incense, and
resounding
with musick, and hung with garlands of fire
and beauty
vanished
vanished forever! What then?
He awoke from his long and burning trance. He
lifted
his arms to heaven. He invoked the presence of his
beloved. He was in a desertbut she obeyedfor she
loved him. A fountain arose at their feethe stooped
with his parched lipsand it disappeared forever, in the
dry sand! The waters of his heart turned to bitterness.
The fountain of tears and tenderness stagnated on the
spot, and a vapour of repulsion and death arose from
its effervescenceyea, death!
Those handsthose very handsso innocent, pale,
and youthful, and emaciated, they have been reeking
in blood. Yeaand the blood would be upon them yet,
had they not been washed in the rain of heaven. Once
they were red, hot, and smoking; and he flourished
them, in the delirium of his soul, to the skyin the
loud windand over the roaring flood, swearing that,
by no other than the rain drop, and the dew, the
dampness
of twilight, and the mountain mist, and the spray
of the cataract, would he suffer the pollution to be
washed away! And they had done it!heaven had
done it! The rain and the dew had fallen, and the red
stains were effaced, once more, from his transparent
fingers.'
Here was an interruptionsome erasuresfollowed
with occasional remarks in a hand like Elvira's. They
were as follows: `The very character and turn of
thought so peculiarly distinguishing this isolated and
strange being, are expressed here, with astonishing
fidelity. It has all his brokenness, mystery, abruptness
and strength. Indeed, I should believe, were such a
thing possible, that Oscar himself had dictated the
language
,
in which he is described, so deeply imbued is it
with the fierce and preternatural ardour and spirit, that
prevailed in his conversation after he slew .'
A word was here very carefully obliterated, but still
Harold was able to discover that it was a
name
, and if
he were not led wildly astray, it was the name of
Elvira
.
But that could not be.
She
was living.
His agitation prevented him, for some minutes, from
continuing the inquiry; and when he did, he fell upon
the following, in another hand: `A part is here omitted,
my dear, it remains in my possession, however, and,
when necessary, shall be put into your hands. For
myself
,
I am satisfied that he thinks her deadand it
would be well to suffer the room to remain exactly as
it ispreciselywith all its terrible array of furniture
and bloodeven to the spots and stains, where it
spouted
upon the window curtains. I gave immediate
orders
to that effect, under the advice of Doctors S.
and R. who agree that if we have any thing to
hope, it must be from the violent shock that he will
receive when, as we have concerted the plan, we shall
bring him, blindfolded, to the spot of the murder, and
there, at night, in the very room, at the very hour, with
all the furniture in the same situation, by the same
light, unbandage his eyes, and leave him there,
alone!
It
cannot make him worse, and it
may
have some good
effect. It is desperate, I.' The rest was
illegible
;
but in rummaging over the papers, he found a
remarkably
neat manuscript, which he felt, instantly in his
heart, was by Caroline herself. The hand-writing was
very peculiar, firm, upright, and singularly unaffected.
`I shall give it to you precisely as it was written,
long, long after the melancholy event took place. I had
leisure then to dwell upon it, and touch out the parts,
almost as I would an ideal history; for, would you
believe
it? it appears to me
now
, more like a transaction
that has occurred to somebody else, than to myself;
more like something dreamt of, in some frightful
malady
,
than the experience of myself. Much of it is in his
very language. I shall never forget itnay, have I not
good reason, dear?never to forget it.'
`Here!here we are at last, then! Are we not high
enough yet, love? We are above the world. Look
yonder
the
dark spots upon that hill are movinglo, they
are human creatures!upon the moon too! Who knows
but we may appear to them, poor pilgrims! as they do
to us. There!now we are upon the very pinnacle.
How strong the wind is! Mind thy foothold, Caroline
and cling to meif we fallthat we may fall
together
.
What an infinity is above us. And this rock
yea, this is the very rock!how like an altar it is.' His
eyes sparkled strangely, as he said this, and he knelt
down and kissed it. `Stay Carolinethere is another
altara highera holier onebuilt by God's angels,
with their own handsa little higher up. Wilt thou
ascend with me? It is a place of sacrifice. If thy heart
fail thee, abide thou here!' I answered `Yes! I will go
up with thee, go were thou wilt.' `That is an altar,'
he said, pointing upward, to a jutting cliff, `I have
been there, at nightat midnight, holding counsel with
the red stars, clouds, winds! And who came to me,
Caroline
,
who, thinkest thou, came down to me, and
scooped
her hand into the solid rock, and laved my temples
with a water so mortally cold, thatthey have been
aching ever since!' We approached a broad white stone,
leaning like an inclined plane, upon a stratum of
crumbling
slate or pumice; the moon shone upon it, and the
deep sculpture of many a wayward hand, the broken
and blunted lettersdefaced by the elements
appeared
like a rude inscription upon some entrance to the
caverns of the earththe Golgotha of the mountain. I
trembled with a superstitious and unknown terrour.
He sat down.'
`Let us be seated, Caroline. Let us pray. I would
praycanst thou, dear?' A dead silence followed. I
was afraid to interrupt him. He lay with his whole
length upon the stone, leaning upon his elbow, his eyes
fixed upon the distant sky, as if expecting some portent.
It was all of a turbid blue; with dim, sunken gold, here
and there gleaming doubtfully through the clouds. I
movedfor it was damp and chilly, and I was anxious
to return. `Awake! awake!' he cried, springing upon
his feet, and shouting so, that the mountains around,
answered on all sides, `awake! there is a noise in
heaven
!
awake!'
`Awake! awake!' said the echo, so distinctly that I,
who had heard it often in day light, was startled.
`I hear you,' he answered. `Be ye also ready!
rebellious
spirits. Ye are summoned.'
The mountain answered, syllable, by syllable, as with
the voice of a trumpet, in the caverns of the earth,
`
Ye are summoned!
' Why did I shudder. I knew it
was an echo, only an echo. I had heard it a thousand
times, in its most apalling distinctness, and yet I fell
upon my knees, involuntarily, now at the sound, and felt
as if a
was
summoned indeed.
`Carolinesee'st thou that staraway there?' said
he, `nay, not therehigher, higher!all aloneso
beautifully tranquil. Well, (his voice grew deeper and
deeper. It was an articulate breathing, and very
terrible
in its wild, musical solemnity,) well! when last I
saw that star, it was upon the wide ocean. It was very
cold, and I was alone. I saw it, felt it. Its light fell,
like cold rain upon a naked heart. That night I was
shipwrecked! It is the star of my nativity. It appears to
me again! It is the third time.' (When was the
second
,
brother, said I, in a terrified whisper.) `Girl!the
second
was on the 22nd of October.' (I uttered an
involuntary
cry of horrour.) Thou knowest the reason.
That was the night of his guilt. And now I tremble
now, in all my joints, at the thought of it; and still,
such was my infatuation, that I never thought of
myself
,
when he so darkly disclosed his purpose.'
`Caroline,' said he, resuming, `there are strange,
unnatural, incredible experiences in my life, interwoven
with the brief, hurried influences of
that
star. I came
here to-night, knowing that it would appear. I came
to night, to meet it once more. O, how many tender,
dear, weeping recollections come with it! God of
benevolence
!By
the light of that starere it blazed
with pestilence and deathand denunciationere its
colour changedfor once, Caroline, it was the
loveliest
star in heaventhe most delicatethere was once
none of that fiery red in itBy the light of that star,
I lovedby it, I was loved again. I wept under it, and
was blessed. I was the happiest of human creatures!
It turned redand I was wrecked and bloody, ere the
revolution of another moon! O, our father! did I sin
in my idolatry? and was the
idol
to be sacrificed? O,
why was I not commanded to offer up the blind and
impious
idolater?
But noit is impossible. I
worshipped
her, it is truebut in her, I worshipped
thee
.
I saw only thy purity, in her innocent heartthy
benignity
,
in her loving eye. By that star, Caroline,
He
blessed me, and by that Heeven
He
, commanded
beheld, nay assisted in the sacrifice. He was the high
priest. The stars were his Urim and Thummim. By
that star, have I lovedbattledconqueredbeen
driven over the waters, in foam and bloodand drifted
under itthat pale, treacherous, wicked light, a naked
and insensible corse, upon the rocky, and desert
islands
of the sea. I feel thy raying in my very hairand
yet, even yet, my allegiance to thee is unshaken. Still
thou hast dominion over me. Thou art very beautiful,
star of my idolatryand very fatal, yet I do not curse
thee. And why? Only because, with thy dim and quiet
light, thou didst once shine down upon the naked
forehead
of Elvira, when her cheek rested upon mine.
But for
that
that, thou accursed light, I would have
made war upon theewar! perpetual war, till thou or
I were quenched. It was upon this very altar. There
she satthere, she put down her sweet handpoor
Elvira
.
Caroline, do not move, I charge thee, do not. A
strong hand is over thee. It were death to stir.'
`Nay, my brother,' said I, startled at his imperative
manner, and now beginning to fear for
him
, and
lamenting
my own rashness in accompanying so far at
such an hour. `Nay, I cannot, do not mean unkindly.
I would not leave thee. I know the awful structure of
thy thought. Thou art strongvery strong, on all
subjects
but one. On that, I dare not trust thee. Thou art
vitally wrong. Remember thy endowments; whose
steward art thou? the suffering of thy boyhood, Oscar;
the peculiar and mysterious incidents, which to me,
with my susceptibility to thy influence, were only
strange and unaccountable, have been regarded by thee
nay, deny it not, as of a nature not of this world.
This has made thee visionary. Bear with me, Oscar.
It is weaknessnay, it is worse, ten thousand times
worse. It is impiety to believe it. My brother, what
means this emotion? Is there something yet untold
even yet? If there be, speak to me, in mercy. Tell me
the worst at once. Let not my imagination worry
itself
again, in darkness, with the wrestling fiends that
invade her empire.'
Oscar made no reply, but throwing himself upon his
feet, and raising his locked hands to his forehead, he
cried, in a tone of sudden eagerness and solemnity, that
thrilled me to the heart`Come, come, let us begone!
The night air blows too coldly upon thee, my love
Come, come. Nay, Caroline,
dear
. Thy very hair is
wet, thy very garments drenched, in the dew of night.
Cold! cold! and art thou not afraid? How long have we
been here? Is it possiblethree whole hours.'
`Even so,' said I, taking his arm; `but they are
three
such
hours, as I could not pass again.'
`What! not with me, in loneliness and silence. Girl!
they are hours of religious festival, worth a whole life
of less awful, less agitating devotion. I would not
exchange
this temple, this altarsuch scenery, and such
feelings, so melancholy and wrapt, for all that the world
could give!'
`My brother,' said I, `let us begone.'
`How hollow thy voice sounds, Caroline,' said he,
pressing close to me, and speaking in a deep whisper.
`Nay, naynot now I beseech thee!' he cried, in a
tone of expostulation, so wild and unearthly that I shall
never,
never
forget it`not now! not now! I
cannot!
'
This he said, as if to some invisible creature near him.
`Not to-night! Oh no! not to-night!' he repeated, in a
whisper, turning his face as he spoke, as if something
stood at his shoulder `what!
must
it be? O, Caroline!'
He covered his face with his handsfell upon his
knees, caught mine to his lips, and wept upon them,
and sobbed out my name, in a paroxysm of tenderness.
I wondered at his emotion, and would have knelt by
him but he prevented me, and I fell upon his neck.
`Heavenly Father,' said he, raising his dark eyes in
the starlight. `I obey! Carolinelook up! look up!
thy
star is in its wane!'
`I see nothing unusual,' said I`
my
starwhere is
it?'
`What, nothingnothing! look at its sulphurous
hue, its flashingthere! there! does it not sensibly
diminish
there!
what sayest thou now, Caroline?'
`Some cloud hath passed it,' said I, with a faltering
voice, for I was intimidated by his manner, and
affected
by his wildness.
`No, no,' said he, rising`no cloud hath passed it.
It was ever thus with
mine
.'
`My brother! do not look so terribly upon me. I
cannot bear the awful brightness of thine eyes. They
frighten me,' said I, inconceivably terrified, and
endeavouring
to soothe him.
`CarolineCaroline!Caroline!'said he, in a loud
voice`listen!'
`
Caroline!
' echoed back the mountain, in a sepulchral
tone`
listen!
'
`I quaked in every limbI could have covered my
eyes, and leaped down the precipice for relief; but, with
a strong hand Oscar held me, as he uttered, in a
low voice, `Caroline, there is something preternatural
in the darkening of
thy
star to-night. I feel anay,
why tremble?the commission has gone forth. I am
summoned. Thou art summoned. I am commanded;
and I shall obey!'
`
Obey!
' answered the mountain.
`Ha! art thou so near!' cried Oscar`
Lo! I am ready
.'
`
Lo! I am ready!
' answered the mountain, in a voice,
so fearfully near and distinct, that I shrieked aloud!
innumerable shrieks followed! of such appalling and
continued shrillness, as if a congregation of unhappy
spirits had, all at once, uttered their voices in dismay
and horrour.
Oscar relinquished my hand, and fled from me a
few paces. `What!' said he, `art thou too, sold to him!
O Caroline! Caroline!' but he instantly returned, and
of all that followed, I can only remember what I am
now going to describe. For some time he held a
conversation
,
in a loud and authoritative tone, as in
remonstrance
with the airstood, and interrogated the
mountain
,
and when the echo came back to him, he would
reply again and again to it, as to something visible.
All hope forsook me. I had never seen him so far gone.
`The extinction of that star,' said he, in a lower
voice, looking at the flat rock, and speaking as to some
person sitting upon it, `is ominous. Thou art a hard
masteryes! yes! thou canst not terrify me
now
thou
art!
thou
art!
'
`Look brother! look!' said I, willing, terrified as I
was, to divert the dreadful fixedness of his eye to
heaven
`Look!
it is bright again!'
`True,' said he, without lifting his eyes, or turning
his head. `But I care not. It portends no
re-illumination
here
. It is always thus; it foretells some calamity
some! do I not know
what?
Alas, too wellThe
Almighty is upon me. I
must
do it. She shall be saved
I care nothing for myself.
Her hour has come!
'
`
Her hour has come!
' answered the echo, and Oscar
stood upright before me, like a priest about to perform
the rite of sacrifice.
I shook from head to foot; my limbs tottered. A
cold mist arose from my heart, and choked and blinded
me The sweat dropped from my forehead upon my
hands. Even now I can hear his voice, and see him
standing before me, in my sleep; and I awake, night
after night, half dead with terrour. It sounds like the
breathed admonition of some dying man. He looks like
some young martyr, that hath burst his sepulcre, and
reappeared, for a more solemn repetition of his
martyrdom
.
He comes, and looks, as from the charnel
houseand my blood loiters now, even while thinking
of him, in broad day-light, as if he were nearthe
current
thickened and coagulated with his influence.
VOL. II. 12
`Stop, stop!' said he, `I command thee, stop! Look
again to that starwatch itI will watch thine eyes at
the same timeit will change, they will change. I
will
be believed. I will foretel the changes of
both
.
Now lookit waxes dimit vanishesnaynay, do
not shut thy eyes, another will follow it!'
Judge of my astonishment! It was so. The stars
waned, one after the other, dropped, and went out! But
how could he see it? His eyes were rivetted on mine.
How could he foretel it?'
`O, God!' cried Oscar, in that tone of melancholy,
heartfelt tenderness, which I so loved`That pale,
lovely star, then, is blotted out! O, would that some
other hand had quenched it! Night after night, have I
watched it, studied it, wept before it, prayed to it! And
now, O God, misfortune and weariness and
sleeplessness
have made me so wretchedly familiar with its
changes, that I know them, and all its courses, as a
parent the wandering of its little one. O, I feel its
light in my heart; and now that it hath gone out, the
chambers of my soul are dark!'
`Hush!' said he, `there is a cloud passing the moon.'
`No, brothernone, none!' said I.
`There
is!
there
is
I feel it.'
`No, brotherit shines with the most innocent and
spotless lustrea liquid brightness.'
`Nay, look againwe have yet a few minuteslook
steadilyI tell thee girl that, anonthere! there! is not
even her light dim and wavering.'
Whether I was so affected by his disorder, as to be
deceived, I cannot say; much may be justly attributed
to the influence of terrour; and yet, at this moment, my
blood runs cold, as I remember the appearance of the
moon, while he spokeits changes to
me
were like
those of a human face, death-struck.
`It
is
,' I cried, `it
is
heaven and earth!are they
not clouds, brother?'
`Clouds! no. It is ever thus. From my infancy, on
this nightit is my birth night, Caroline.'
`So it is!' I cried, and my heart leaped in my bosom;
I would have kissed him, but he prevented me
repulsed
me!
`Nay, CarolineI cannot endure thy kisses now
O, do not look at me thus! I cannot,
cannot
bear it.
There is a duty to perform, which even now, I am
hardly man enough to think of, but thy kisses would
destroy me utterly. I could not perform it, if thy
mouth had touched mine, to-night. So
he
says.'
`That is my natal star,' he added, suddenly changing
his voice`and this my birth night. On this night,
Caroline, I never knew that star-light cloudy or dim
in heaven. Those intermittent flashes! these changes
do you know, sister, that they are prophetick?'
`How so?'
`They foretel my fortunes for the year. Nay, do not
smile thus. Such a smile is awful in moonlight, on
such an occasion
. My experience is of many years. It
is not of the heart. I never smiled
here
, but tears
followed
tears
of blood! You tremble, Caroline. A smile
here is impious, blasphemouswe are in the presence
of Jehovah, and his angels. A smile is ghastly, when
the countenance contradicts the heartwhen the eyes
wrestle with the lipdo you believe me now?'
`You think that I am mad. Others think so. I am not.
I have been so, but I have recoveredlook at my
forehead
lay
thy hand upon itthere! does that beating,
that sweat and coldness speak plainly?'
`My sister, if I had time, but I have not, I would
tell thee how I purchased this terrible knowledge; why,
in spite of reason, philosophy, reflection, scorn, and
mockery, I have turned, amid all the suffering and
humiliation of life, to this beautiful starand that I
turn to it still, no! to where it
was
, as to the star of
Bethlehem: why, there has been ever, on the night of
my birth, a prophetick delirium in my brainand why,
I am sick with terrour and dismay, if it falter or
wane in its intelligent and lustrous beauty. No! no!
not that way!' (I was gradually winning him toward
the descent) `here is the path
there
the pond, and
yonder the fountain and seat. How this august repose
affects me! The whole world sleeping below me, like
the beings of another planet. The stars hovering around
me and over me; the heavens turning round about us,
over our heads and under our feet; and we, standing as in
the centre of the universe, maintaining our sublime and
solitary sway, over the fish of the sea, and the beast of
the field, and the fowl of the air. Alas, how inefficient!
when all our united force, all our wisdom, and all our
policy, cannot stay or impede the smallest of yonder
lights in its journeying. To be aloneso far above all
the creatures of earthto hold, as it were, a
conversation
with the stars, face to face, in their own audience
chamberto be in the presence of the living GodO,
kneel with me, Caroline!'
These were the symptoms that I looked for. The
paroxysm, I now thought, had passed, and I answered
`willingly, most willingly, chilly and damp as it is,
what a night for contemplation and worship!'
`
Dear
Caroline!' said he, affectionately, touching his
cold cheek to mine. I would have answered, but he
continued, softly`O, do not break this silence.
Remember
,
dear, we are in the
presence
the
unencompassable
throne is before us.'
The silence became painful. `Brother,' said I,
`speak to metouch mecome nearer. I am terrified.
I know not what this means, but I tremble all over.
Let us go downthe eagles launch by us, as they
return
to earth: their highest nest is far below our feet.'
`Not yet! there is a mist rising in the moonlight.
That vault trembles with an approach. Footsteps are
on the air. He cometh! lo, he cometh! O, I had half
forgotten my trial. Lord be merciful to me, and to
her
I will obey. For her sake,
I will now do it
. Nay,
nay, if thine avenger is already at my side, bid him
instruct
me softly, for she is here.'
`Brother, thy voice is frightful. Who is talking with
thee: it has grown very dark since thou left mewhere
art thou? I cannot see thee. I hear other voice than
thine,' said I, and I really believed what I said.
`Caroline,' said he, solemnly, pressing his lips to my
forehead; `Arise! I have a vow to perform.' His look
I could not see, but his tone and attitude were
composed
and firm. `Knowest thou why we have ascended
this mountain?'
`O, yes! to look around usto breathe the very air,
and be wet to the heart, with the very dew of heaven,
in its purity!'
`True, but for other and more terrible purposes.'
`What are they?'
`
For sacrifice!
' said he, in a tone that made my heart
retreat.
`For sacrifice!' echoed I, faintly, but desperately, for
I was choking.
`
For sacrifice!
' answered the spirit of the place,
approaching
.
`Silence, Caroline, and hear me. This night hast
thou gazed with me on the star of my nativity. We
have both,
both
seen it for the
last
time. Thou hast
seen it quenched, utterly quenchedit dropped into
the lake below. It was a portent. Thus am I to perish,
perhaps in that very waterthis knifenay, stand up,
Caroline, there is no help for thee' (I shut my eyes, as
a dark, glimmering flourish passed before them, and
fell at his feetall the horrours of my situation broke,
at once, upon me;) `Nay, come to it boldly, Caroline.
Thou art no dastard. I have seen thee do braver things.
Arise! I say, kneel not to
me
, no!
there
is thy Saviour!
kneel to himbehold him, where he sits, throned in
the bluest sky, beyond the darkness! I can see him
plainly; address thy prayers to Him! He will hear thee,
dear: drooping, drooping still! and I too! where am I?
Does my heart fail me? why these yearnings and
tuggings
?'
`O Caroline, how it bleeds for thee; would I could
strike thee, while thou art insensible; but I must not.
The vow would not be accomplished, the price not paid.'
(He thought me insensible, but I was not, for I heard
it all; his words rang in my ears, and I never forgot
them. It appeared to me that he wept, and that his
dark eyes shot flames into my heart, at the same
moment
.)
`But no, no! I may not. Thou wilt recover:
thou
shalt!
I will not kill thee sleeping. Thy spirit
shall go before thy Saviour, awake, imploringly,
serenely
,
12*
and perfect in its preparation! Awake! my
sister
,
awake! Here on the high mountain top, I call to
thee! Awake! she stirs,this blade hath already drunk
deep of innocent blood; be this mine expiation!'
`My brother! my brother!' I cried, clinging to his
knees; `O spare me! I have trusted thee, I
alone
, of
all the world. I have defended thee, and wept for thee,
with the truest heart; I alone, of all that have known
thee, I
alone
have continued to love thee; and canst
thou kill me!
Canst
thou spill the blood of the only
heart on earth, that does not quake at thy voice, and
hide itself at thy tread? In thy delirium, who hath been
thy companion? In thy sickness, and suffering, who
hath watched and tended thee? In thy nakedness and
desolation, who hath been always near thee? In sorrow,
and guilt and madness, who? When all the world hated
thee, and scorned and mocked at thee, who laid her
head upon thy bosom, and cried herself asleep in thy
arms? When all doubted and dreaded, naked and
helpless
as I was, was not my heart always open to thee,
poor maniac!'
`And can it be! Have I trusted myself to thee, thus
far, in all thy terrible moods; have I wandered with
thee, till now, barefooted, over the precipice and the
torrent, even while that deadly light shone in thine
eyes, and the mortal paleness of thy lip, made thy very
dogs avoid thee, have I? To perish now! How wholly
have I confided in thee, doubting thee not; fearing thee
not; sleeping by thy side, while the point of thy dagger
or thy pistol touched my breast; believing always in
thy love for
me
, and sure of thy restoration! O, have I
endured all this! all! and canst thou, when all is past,
canst thou
kill me!
'
`His tears fell upon my face.'
`My dear,
dear
sister!' he replied, in a trembling
voice, so deeply pathetick and musical that, would you
believe it, I felt, in a measure, reconciled for a moment
to my fate; it was so tender, so loving, so mournful!
that, mistaken he might be, but I was
sure
that if he
killed me, it would be out of his great love to me,
`How I have loved thee, God is my witness! Just so I
loved the angel of my childhood, but I slew
her
. Why?
That her star, once quenched in blood, might burn on,
forever and ever, in heaven, unquenchably. Did I love
thee
, Caroline, less tenderly, less distractedly, with a
less suffocating devotion to thine everlasting happiness,
I would not put thee to sleep with mine own hand. I
could not! I should bid
thee
do it, and if thou wert
told all, thou wouldst obey me, and go, a
self-murderess
,
to the bar of judgment; thy beautiful bosom
lacerated
,
and gushing with the unholy retribution of thine
own hand. O, I would leave thee, my sister, behind
me, did I love thee less. I cannot go alone, alone and
unsupported, before the tribunal of the skies. Thy
innocence
will support me, and, my love,
He
knows, is
the cause of this unnatural crime,
dear
Caroline!'
`O, my brother! my brother! do not kill me! Father
of mercies, restore him! O, withhold his hand! Receive
my spirit! and do not thou require my blood at his dear
hands! attribute not my death to aught but love, and
affection! And O, withhold his weapon from his own
heart!'
`Caroline,' said he, `thou art mistaken. My
appointed
time is come. My commission is expired. I am
reclaimed, repurchased. A good spirit has been with
me, and bought me away forever, for the enemy of
mankind. Before the revolution of another year, I shall
have received my judgment. Can I leave thee? yet do
not believe that I shall lift mine own hand against
mine own life. I am forbidden to spill my blood.
Perhaps
,
I am journeying to morrow to a far country
perhaps I am not forbidden to die,
without
spilling my
blood. Would that I knew it now!O, how readily
would I plunge into that dark water below, with thee
in my arms, dear, just where my star fell, and was
quenched. Prepare thyself; the hour has passed. The
moon shines out, as I was promisedforgive me,
Caroline
;
wilt thou?'
`I do, I
do
forgive thee, I answered, while he
pressed
his lips to my forehead, and shut my eyes, as
the knife gleamed in the star-lightanother moment,
and it had been buried in my heart; but heaven, that
never, never, will abandon one that trusts to it, inspired
me with a sudden thought; I fell upon my face, and
counterfeiting another voice, shouted, as loud as I
could`
forbear!
'
`
Forbear! forbear! forbear!
' echoed the mountain.
The knife fell from his hand; stuck into the earth at
my feet, and quivered. I plucked it out, and hurled it
into the lake. He observed the action, but stood
motionless
,
with his hands extended toward the heaven:
and then, bowed thrice. `Am I to forbear; forever?'
said he, in a low voice.
`
Forbear
, forever,' said the echo, faintly.
`Forever, and ever!' answered I, aloud, with my
hands over my mouth.
`
Forever, and everforever, and ever!
' echoed the
mountain.
Thanks be to God! may I never forget that
moment
.
I was safe. Oscar caught me to his bosom. `I
am absolved,' said he, forever, and ever!'
`
Forever, and ever!
' answered the mountain,
immediately
,
in the very tones of a near human voice,
suppressed
,
and agitatedI confess, that I was startled;
I, who knew the cause; but it seemed that I could
never
become familiar with its variety of voices.
We descendedO, I was the happiest of human
beings
.
The noise of our descent came about us, like
thunder
.
We heard, as we thought, some one following us.
Oscar seated me upon a rock, and stood, for a moment,
watching the sound, like a lion preparing to leap upon
his prey. `I know thee, shape of hell,' he cried; I know
thee, thou accursed one, and I defy thee! baffled,
baffled
!'
`
Baffled! baffled! baffled!
' replied the echo, growing
fainter, and fainter, like the voice of an ascending and
retreating spirit. Oscar clapped his hands, and laughed
in derision. The noise awoke all the caverns and
solitudes
,
it seemed, within the circumference of heaven,
for they rang all about us, with incessant reverberation,
like a rejoicing multitude, for many seconds.
`Caroline, thou blessed one; let us hasten from this
accursed
place. The fiends are rejoicing with me, but I
cannot bear it. I abjure them all. My soul is free! I
forswear the place!'
Is it not extraordinary?this stratagem, directed at
the root of my brother's melody, restored him. He
never
relapsed afterwards. But the cause was as singular;
you have heard it perhaps: He had been out in the
morning: when he returned, the tenants observed a
certain
wildness in his air, and that he passed them
without
seeing them, or even hearing them, when he
addressed
him. What he saw, we know not; but he
never
spoke again for a whole year. The consequence
of
`A heart.'
Such was the manuscript. Harold was amazed at
many resemblances between the feelings of Oscar, as
described, and his own. He was sleepy; but
nevertheless
,
in the distempered ardour of his curiosity, he tore
the other package apart, which was tied with a blue
ribbon, that stuck together, probably with the red
cement
of some breast, that had spouted upon it.
They were letters: and numbered, and dated,
showing
the progress of Oscar's acquaintance with Elvira.
The first was dated, `February, 8th,' and commenced
abruptly, after this fashion. `I have seen her. Is she
beautiful? no. Wonderful?no. What is there then, about
her sweet lips, to remind me of the bright intelligence
that haunted me in my boyhood? Is it that loftiness,
purity, that throned and sceptred something, on her
forehead? I know not. I only know that I tremble
can you believe me? at her approach. I do not speak to
her, I dare not. My voice would be inarticulate, if I
should attempt it. My temples would beat; nay, they
do
beat, at this moment, at the thought of it. Why do
I not arise and startle, and astonish her? She is young,
artless, inexperienced, and thrilling with sensibility.
Where are my powers? vanished! quelled! I cannot
trifle
with her; and you know, Oxford, that she is the
only
woman that I ever knew, whom I could
not
trifle
with. I shall watch her narrowly. She is helpless,
timid
,
and dangerously situated. May I not place her
where she deserves to be? But, there are suspicions in
my mind. I am afraid that her heart is pre-occupied. I
shall see, and if I find it so, farewell, to her, forever.'
March 25thNo! her heart is untouched. I rejoice
that it is so. The conquest of such a woman is no light
triumph. I believe that I shall attempt it. But how? why?
honourably, or may heaven reduce me to ashes, with
the first impure thought that arises in my heart! why?
that I may make her happier. She pretends that she
will never be married. I look her in the face when
she says this, and portray the solitariness of a single
life, particularly to a womanas an unnatural
widowhood
,
and wonder at her composure, so innocent, so
unaffected, as she listens to me. I think that I shall try
hard to change her resolution. We had a conversation
last evening, upon the subject of matrimony. I avoid all
particularity in my approaches, and pay her pretty
cousin
much more attention than her; carefully watching,
and studying her deportment with others. I am sure that
she does not suspect me; nor do I mean that she shall,
till I can see my way clear. But, as I was telling you, we
were chatting, somewhat earnestly upon matters and
things in general, when I purposely, and I think,
adroitly, led the subject of conversation to celibacy.
My remarks had some effect, I am sure. She had
never
thought deeply on the sorrow and desolation of a
single life; but she had spent much time in meditating
upon those of the married. `Surely, said she, `there is
no reason why an old maid may not be cheerful,
kind-hearted
,
and agreeable.' Indeed, there
is
,' said I; `all
these qualities in an old maid, only render her a fitter
subject of derision. If she be kind and agreeable, the
world charge her with attempting to win a husband by
artifice. All that another would do spontaneously, will
be attributed to consummate address in her. If she be
dignified and reserved, she is called stiff and prudish;
if lively and spirited, girlish, and flippant; until all her
pretensions are ridiculed, and all her best actions
misinterpreted
.
This is all true, Oxford, is it not?'
I have frightened her by my temper. You know that
I am not fretful, peevish, or sullen, or cold; but my
silent haughtiness often appears like sullenness; and my
sudden explosions, if not petulance, are worse; or more
terrible. Perhaps the worst of it is, that I appear to
remember wrong, and feel hostility, long after I have
forgotten
and forgiven. For, when once my countenance
is touched with solemnity, I do confess that it is no easy
matter to change it.
I have walked with her, and find her mind what I
looked forchaste, elevated, and singularly
perspicuous
.
She has remarkable self-possession too, I find. I
am compelled to respect her, even more than Iyes,
I may at well say it,
love
her! for I do feel now, that I
am beginning to love her. A strange, pure, tenderness
is swelling out of my heart, like fountains that flow
at the sound of musick, when I hear her voice.
April 1stIs the day auspicious? you are welcome
now, in answer to the inquiries of them that love me,
to say that
I have at length found the woman, whom, if
I can, I will make my wife
.
I am in great doubt. I am far from being confident
that I shall be accepted. Sometimes I fear that I have
deceived myself, and that the brief emotion that I have
sometimes detected, when I was near her, was
altogether
illusory or accidental. Perhaps I have mistaken
friendship for tenderness. I hope not. By heaven, I
would rather die. I know not what will become of me.
This suspense is insupportable. I am assailed on all
sides. Is it honourable to keep her in ignorance of my
designs? Is it safe? were it not wiser and more worthy
of me to try my fate at once? If she say
no
, the sooner
she says it, the better; and I shall not ask her to say
yes
. Enough for me, if she will not refuse me, at once.
I will answer for the rest, if she once let me get a
footing
in her heart! Yes! I know myself too well to think
that I should ever
deserve
to forfeit it. Could she
banish
me then? no, never, never, if she be really worthy
of me.
Midnightdo I love her? yes, I
do;
but it is with a
strange, indefinite, delightful feeling. I have loved
before
.
That love was a
passion
. This is not. This is a
religion
. In the presence of Elvira, I have felt, I know
not what, a kind of purifying and sublimating
intellectual
process going forward, within the chambers of my
soul. What would I do? I know not. Could I make her
happy? I ask myself this question a thousand times in
a day; and I answer as often, yes! yes! I could, if a love,
as pure and deep, as ever occupied the heart of man; a
constancy, as capable of enduring all temptations, and all
trials as ever was, may do it, I
could
make her happy.
Would I part with her? yes, this moment, if parting
with her would make her happier. Nay, Oxford, I
would give her to thee, to any man, whom I thought
worthy of her, without one tear, that she should see, or
one pulsation of my arteries, more or less, that should
ever be known, were I assured that thou or another
could make her happier than I can. Such is my love!
call it not romantick. It is not. It is higher, nobler. I
would pluck her away from the vile rabble that beset
her; I would place her, where they cannot, among the
great. But can I? yea. Thou knowest, Oxford, that I
have that within me which convinces me of my power
to place
whom
I will, almost
where
I will.
April 10thI thank you, Oxford, for your advice.
That, and your solicitude are abundant manifestations
of your good opinion. No, I have not
spoken
falsely. I
have only concealed some circumstances, which, at
some future day, I shall disclose. `Can I make her
happy? am I
sure
of it?' you ask. I see the cause of your
disquietude. You are afraid of my attachment to
I do not trust myself to write her name, lest some
accident
should happen to the letter. But, be you assured,
guilty as I have been there, that I shall never offer my
hand to this woman, till I am
sure
that my heart is utterly
purged of all its impurities, and of all its desires, so far
as she is concerned. I am now about to let her guardian
understand my purpose. The sooner, the better for
him; it will put him upon inquiry, and prevent any
unpleasant
reproaches, hereafter. Farewell, for to-night;
to-morrow, I shall address him on the subject.
It is done. I have explained my views. He does not
object, and of course, I am so far in smooth water. But
have I advanced one jot? I see no encouragement
that would justify me in declaring- for
if
God of
heaven
!
if I should fail, I should go distracted. No, no, I
won't. I will not advance, till I see a hand open to
greet me; let the world say what it will, I can better
bear importunity than humiliationself-humiliation.
`Is she ambitious,' you ask. Yes, but her ambition
is of a more quiet aspect, and temperature than mine.
Her ambition, I think, would be to make
me
, if she
chose me, consummately happy. This would content
her. But, I would have
her
not only
happy
, but
great
.
Yet I think she has the courage, and I know she has
the capacity, to go with me, hand in hand, upon any
pilgrimage. Yes, Oxford, I believe that she would attend
me to the field of battle, though she would turn pale
and sick at the sight of blood: and toil, and die for me;
stand by me in the war; nurse me on the bed of death;
receive my last kiss at the scaffold, or the block; and
withhold her tears, should I be arraigned for rebellion.
O, Elvira, thy proud heart would beat high at the blast
of that trumpet, which I have heard, nightly, for many
yearsbut thou wouldst quake to think of what it
summons
me to, and what I am determined to encounter.
Gracious god!
she loves me
. I cannot believe my
senses
.
Yet I must believe this, for I am told it by one
whom I cannot doubt. `Can I abandon her?' you ask
O, no; hardly, I fear, even if she were unworthy. No, I
should deserve to be burnt by the lightnings of heaven,
could I trifle with, or abandon such a creature. No, if
we ever part,
it shall be her will, not mine
. I would not,
could not, leave her, unless she bad me leave her; and
then, I should obey, merely that she might be the
happier
.
I have made up my mind. She has heard some
unfavourable things of me. I shall tell her the truth.
But how? am I authorised to make myself the subject
VOL. II. 13
of my communications? How know I that she will endure
it? Pshaw! what coquetry. I know that she will listen
to me. I am determined. I have done some things
unworthy
of her; but I will tell her with my own lips,
what they areif she forgive me, well; if not, why
then, farewell.
It is done! thank heaven! it is done. I have revealed
myself, and am not
rejected
. O, how full my heart is!
I cannot talk, I cannot even writemy hand is
unsteady
,
and the letters glimmer like a mist before my eyes
tears! yes, tears are upon the paperit is blistered,
as you see, all over; but they are tears, not of sorrow,
not of humiliation, but of love, and tenderness,
unutterable
farewell,
awhile; when I am more composed,
I shall
When I put myself in her guardian's power, I told
him, that, if he refused me, it was enough. I should
submit. He was the best judge of her happiness, and I
should ask no questions. He might have reasons enough
to determine
him
, without being at liberty to mention
them. And so I told
her
. If she said
no
, she could not
say it too soon; and I should submit, without a
murmur
.
In that case, she was to consult nobody. If
otherwise
,
if she hesitated, for I did not wish her to say
yes
,
until she knew me better, I entreated her to consult
whom she would.
I have disclosed the facts, but
I am afraid that she is deceived. I hope not, for I have
put all the letters into her hand, and asked her in so many
words`Have you any questions to askany? Are all
your fears to this point only, whether I yet
love
or have
loved
that
woman? If they
are
, I can answer you at
once, without trembling. I never did love her. I do
not love her. It was a terrible trial to her, nevertheless.
She was sick with her love and apprehension. I am
now satisfied. She has no more ordeals of that nature
to endure. But one or two remainher constancy under
absence and neglect; and her love, even when she
believes
me yet more violent than I am, in my temper.
Do you blame me? You cannot. How often have you
heard my determination, and approved it, never to
marry
any woman, to whom my whole past life had not
been laid open, nakedly, and without concealment; any
woman who does not know every vicious and evil
propensity
of my nature. True, I may not reveal them all
at once;
that
were too terriblebut
before
I marry, she
shall assuredly think me
worse
than I am. That will
try her love and constancy; will it not?
Her only prayer is
now, that `we may live and die together;' I use her
own words---lie side by side, in the same grave, locked
in each other's arms. But who shall be the survivor?
that
thought makes her tremble.
How provoking, is'nt it Oxford, when a lovely creature
has been silent a long time, and your heart is
overflowing
with sympathy, as you persuade her to lift up
her beautiful eyes once more, which you expect to see
swimming in luminous moisture, to find them perfectly
dry, and wondering at
your
agitation. My advice in
such a case is, that a fellow should slily wet the ends
of his fingers, no matter how, and moisten his lashes
therewithit would be inexpressibly touching, and
might lead to a very tender eclaircissement. But away
with thisI cannot trifle, where she or aught that
concerns
her, is the themeno, there is something of
tenderness
and solemnity, so sanctified and tranquil about
her, that I cannot.
May 2ndWhat a woman she is, Oxford! so pure,
so elevated. Am I worthy of her? Indeed I am
now
, but
I have not always been. Should she know this,
exaggerated
as it will be, under the reproachful testimony
of my own heart? She should; but does she? No, she
does not. I have deceived her, unintentionally, it is
true, and where I wanted her to know the truth, and I
cannot bear to undeceive her. I have let her cheat
herself
,
and can I, ought I, to tear away the delusion;
what good purpose can it answer? I know not, and yet,
one maxim governs me. She
shall be undeceived
before
we are married; so that she may be able to say
then
,
when any babbling gossip shall invade her ears with
some story of me; `
No, I do not believe it, for he never
told me of it!
' That shall be the confidence that my
wife shall feel. Let others shrink, if they will, from it.
I will not. And what is strange, while I
do
this, I do
not ask it; I do not wish it of her!
Of one thing I can assure you, seriously; my temper,
so far as I can judge, is materially improved, kinder,
and less easily agitated. What then should I hope from
a
union
with this woman, if an acquaintance so short as
ours, has already affected so much? Is there aught that
she could not do?
Of the relations and character, standing and
property
of all parties, I have only one or two words to say
to you. I am not mercenary, as you know well, and it
would be idle for me to tell one, who has been my
companion
so long, that wealth and rank, without affection
and talent, are of no value to me. Without the two
former, I can be happy: without the two latter, I should
be miserable. It is true that my limited patrimony
would have to be husbanded in the most frugal manner,
to support us properly; and should any accident, the
death of their natural guardian, throw a certain
helpless
family, to which she is nearly related, upon the
world, I should be their only protector. I have thought
of all thisI have thought on the possibility, nay, the
probability, that she might be visited by another
lingering
and protracted illness, an event that would go
nigh to drive me distracted
now
, were we, or were we
not married: I have reflected, till my eyes overflowed,
on the tenderness of her nature, and the necessity of
unremitting gentleness and indulgence on my part,
amid all the perils of my profession, and all the
uncertainties
of absence. And yet, I am ready to marry her,
not immediately, but after a reasonable time has
elapsed
,
when
she
will be safe in her knowledge of me. I
know her better than she knows me; and were it not
for my wish to have nothing at risk, that can affect
her
,
I would marry her to-morrow.
You are surprised at the suddenness of my
resolution
,
you say. My friend, if you had thought as many
hours
upon this subject, as I have
days
, you would
approve
my determination. I used to think differently,
but I am now convinced that it is the duty of a man to
marry young. Amid many reasons, the following may
be worth your thought for a moment. When we are
young, we more easily assimilate; our sensibilities and
sympathies are more attractive:Our habits and
opinions
less obstinate. But what is of the greatest
importance
,
we have a better chance of educating our
children
,
forming their characters, and directing their
establishment
in the world. My views of this subject,
have become peculiarly solemn of late. I have reflected
till my heart ached, and the life ebbed out of it, on the
dreadful consequences of leaving a youthful woman,
helpless and burdened with young children, upon the
unhallowed mercy, and cold charity of the world. How
often, no matter what may be her situation, how often
is she obliged to prostitute herself, to a second man,
merely for the protection of her babes! She could
endure
the desolation of widowhood, take comfort in her
bereavement, were her children dead and buried, or
were her sons and daughters fashioned and prepared
for conflicting with the ruder elements of society, in
their commotion; but they are young, and helpless, and
while her heart shrinks and withers, at the thought of
permitting the caresses of any other than him, who is in
his grave,
she is obliged to be won
, obliged to have the
solitudes of her affection trodden by an unwelcome,
confident footstep; obliged to give herself another
husband
,
against all the yearning of her heart; all the
revolting
sensations that arise, when memory touches
upon the past, with all its endearmentmerely that her
babes may have a
father
. Is it not shocking! Oxford;
I would rather that my wife should die in my arms,
and that my child should die at her bosom, while I had
life enough to see it! I should know then that they
were translated beyond this damnable cruelty and
temptation
:
13*
no moreI cannot write any moreno widow
of mine shall be resold, no treasury rifled
May 5. She will have to abide that other trial, after
all. I have made up my mind to it, much as I love
her; and I cannot suppress my tears, as I tell you that
if she falter, I will leave her, forever. The promise
was deliberately made. I warned her
then
, of the
consequences
.
I predicted all that has happenedall this
importunity; all this misconstruction; but still she
promised
.
The original question is now merged in
another
.
I care little about
that
, but
this
is of vital
importance
;
no other, indeed, than whether she shall keep
her word, when deliberately pledged. I tremble,
Oxford
:
I tremble for
her
, but I am resolved. You shall
hear the result. It will be determined, before I sleep.
6. Thank God, thank God! my dear friend! I
have prevailed; or rather
she
has prevailed. What an
heroick girl! I love her more than ever. After the trial
was over, I told her what had been my resolution. She
was thunderstruck. But how
could
I marry a woman
whose word, whose resolution, was to be doubted? I
could not. I might have gone crazy, and I am sure that
I should, if we were to be parted by any unworthiness in
her, but I would never have touched her hand again,
had she faltered.
I left her last evening, after a singular conversation,
but a very necessary one. We were speaking of the
innumerable accidents, such as death or sickness,
misrepresentation
,
interference of friends, enemies, that so
often tear asunder hearts that have almost grown
together
.
`It is
possible
,' said I, in conclusion, `dear
Elvira, that
we
may not be married after all.' `Yes,'
she replied, `I think it very probable.' `O, no,' said I,
smiling at her meek acquiescence, `not
probable
, but it
is
possible
. And now, I have a pledge to exchange,
while our thoughts are turned to such an event. We
are both proud, and, a resolution once taken, may be
perpetual. Let us agree not to come to any
determination
respecting each other, if any such event should,
by any possibility, occur, until each has had an
opportunity
of being heard. Let us believe nothing but what
comes from each other. If I do aught unworthy of
you, I will be the first to tell you of it, and throw up
your hand. She agreed to this, cordially and
immediately
.
This led her to inform me that she had been
cautioned against me, with much emphasis; and told
that my views were not serious; that I had trifled with
many women, and would trifle with her. I trembled as
she said this, because I was convinced that, if she had
the slightest suspicion of that sort, she would, to avoid
all risk herself, dismiss me, on the first plausible
pretext
that offered. This is the nature of women; they
become coquettes, lest they should be coquetted.
However
,
I was able to assure her, entirely, on that score.
`
She
had never doubted my sincerity, and probably
never should;' were her words. What could be more
noble and frank? I would detain you longer on this
subject, dear Oxford, but I know the propensity of
lovers
,
and am on my guard against it. Still, however,
there is one circumstance, that I cannot easily resist
the temptation of telling. It is her own character in the
fewest possible words. A very dear friend of hers,
who was entitled to all her love and veneration, one
who was almost a mother to her indeed, in a long
conversation
lately, of which I was the subject, made this
remark among many others: `You must have a great
deal of courage, child, to think of marrying him.'
In her innocence and simplicity, she told me this.
What could I say? Are you prepared to conjecture? I
told her, that
it was true
that the woman who married
me, must have a great deal of courage; and that she,
who gave her the advice, which the remark implied,
was entitled to all her confidence and respect. And
yet, for my magnanimity had carried me quite far
enough
then
, I thought! I begged her to recall, if she
could, any look, or tone, or expression of mine, that
resembled
unkindness to her, during all our love,
beginning
at our earliest acquaintancenay, I told her
that, if by any calamity I should ever
appear
unkind to
her, I felt assured that it would be only
appearance
,
whatever I suffered. I might leave her, I might die,
but I could not wound her, I was sure. But enough of
this: the stuff of your sentimental creatures, I have
always
felt an unconquerable loathing for, and I am not
so blindly infatuated, as to imagine that mine is much
less sickening than that of others. So, farewell, for the
present.
I must continue to keep you informed, I find, under
pretence of relieving your apprehensions concerning
this affair, but in reality, to relieve my own heart. I
am in solitude, and she is the only companion of my
thought. I should scorn to make many persons on this
earth, acquainted with my contemplations on
any
subject
,
and last of all, on
this!
and yet, I find no
enjoyment
so tranquillizing as this of communicating to you,
dear Oxford, all that I think, or feel in relation to
Elvira
.
The time of her most terrible trial approaches. I
cannot but be agitated when I reflect on the possible
consequences. Sometimes my heart upbraids me, for
risking aught, and I am even tempted to forbear, what
I am sure is not an act of cruelty or duty, but rather
one of necessity. You know that I would ask no
sacrifice
that I would not makethat I would put no one
to any trial, which I would not cheerfully endure
myself
.
If she come out bright from
this
ordeal, her
perils in marriage will end, where those of the world
generally begin. The husband, I am sure, will be more
indulgent than the lover. It has always been my
maxim
,
for which, by the way, you are not the only one
who has reproached me, to begin so low, that I cannot
fall, in the estimation of her, whose love I would win.
I would rather never rise, than fallrather never be
loved, than loved and forgotten.
I have put the letters, of which you have so
frequently
spoken, all, all! even yours and Emily's, where
you have treated me with the most severity and
earnestness
,
into her hands. I need not tell you the result.
She loves too much to be easily wrested away. She
was troubled, and sick, but she forgave me. But one
question still presents itself before me; does she yet
suspect the extent of my intimacy with? I know
not. Sometimes I persuade myself that she does, and
that she benignantly shuts her eyes upon all that is
past. But this is only a hope. I am not a coward, you
know, Oxford; I am not disingenuous; and yet, in this
case, I fear to act entirely like a man; and I persuade
myself that it is to avoid shocking her innocent nature.
But tell me; ought I to disclose the whole, in plain
terms? In one of the letters, are these very expressions:
can they be misunderstood? `Do you ever dream of
me? With me, there is scarce a night, but my spirit
sees and converses with yours. I hear you talk; I feel
your touch, and press you to my aching heart; but
when I awake, and find it all illusion, I could almost
weep tears of blood.'
Suppose I should tell her, at once, in so many words,
that I have sinned. Would it not seem a
defiance?
And after all, what signifies the past? Since I have
known
her
, I have never wandered in thought, or word
or deed. This was long before, after I had
seen
her, it
is true, but long before we ever
met;
and of a nature,
so utterly within mine own keeping, that it could never
be known but by my own voluntary confession. What
have I to fear then? you will ask. My friend, I know
not. This woman is not fashioned like other women.
I cannot reason therefore, respecting her, from my
knowledge of them; and I feel an unaccountable alarm
when this thought obtrudes itself upon my
contemplation
.
Returning lately from a walk, during which I had
been so happy, that my eyes glistened, and my heart
heaved with a new feeling, a feeling of kindness and
love to every human being, with a dash of piety that
was not common with me, till of latewe, by some
accident, fell upon a conversation respecting deception.
and I, unthinkingly made this avowal, `that I
could
deceive
any body, if I would.' This was a piece of
unnatural
and childish boasting in me, and I repented, as
soon as it had passed my lips. Not that I had said
what was false, but it was unnecessary; and Elvira had
not then known me sufficiently long, to feel that
confidence
,
which she will feel, one day or other, in my
principles
.
It struck her with unexpected force: I could
perceive it, and though I strove to dissipate the
shadow
that it had thrown upon the brightest spot of her
affections, I am sure that I did not succeed. A most
unwelcome
suspicion, that she strove to quell, with all
her force, but in vain, immediately arose in her
innocent
heart. What a blockhead I was! All her
experience
had been in my favour. She had the most
sublime
and affecting confidence in me, till that moment;
and now, though she loves me perhaps more tenderly
than ever, I am sure, by the trembling of her lips,
and her lamping eyes, that her heart is in a tremour.
I told her that if I deceive her, I deceive myself, and
must therefore be consummately foolish; and that if I
deceive her, she will never be undeceived, unless I
wish to escape from her. How unlucky! every word
that I added, in the way of explanation, only served to
make matters worse, and I left her with a far less
contented
spirit than usual.
Of that vile habit which I have mentioned to you,
she has given her decided opinion at last, in a manner
worthy of her. How singular! that one so pure, so
meek, so sensitive, should have been so little prepared
for the shock that she experienced. I felt that no human
being, but myself, ought to approach her with
familiarity
;
that she, for I was so, should be consecrate to
one alone. The hour was one of the bitterest of my
life, when I saw him touch her cheek. I could have
prevented it, easily, but no! I chose to leave that to
her own discretion. She yielded, in my presence, to
be sure, and in the presence of his own wife; and, had
it not been, that I had never made her acquainted with
my sentiments on that subject, by heaven, I would
have left her on the spot, if every blood vessel of my
body had been reptured by the separation. She
perceived
the effect, and felt it. I was silent: suffocating:
you can imagine the reason, knowing my earlier
history
:
but I was able, at last, to speak a few plain words
to this inestimable creature. They were effectual. Her
resolution was taken, and will be kept. `Why, really,'
said she, I never thought of it, before. He is as a
brother
to me always. `No,' I replied, `you are mistaken,
brothers are not so fond. Besides, such a favour ought
to be considered inestimable. It should be reserved for
one, and one only. The lips of no woman should be
touched, when she loves, but by him she loves. `
Lips!
'
said she, in surprise: was'nt I delighted! Her
lips
were
sacred to me! `I would not thank any woman for
any
favour that another could share in,' said I. `Either it
is an especial, thrilling privilege, or it is not. If it be
not, then these friends, brothers, cousins, uncles, &c.
cannot complain, if it be refused. If it be, then is the
lover, or the husband only, entitled to it. But all this
did not seem to satisfy her that I was reasonable; she
considered my opinion extravagant. One only
argument
remained; `Do as thou wouldst be done by' said
I. `What would be your sensations to behold me
caressing
other women, and clinging to their lips or
cheeks, because they happened to be friends or
relations
?'
This was enough! I felt an involuntary pressure
of my arm; and an inarticulate murmur broke from her
lips, as if her dear heart stopped all at once, at the
thought. So
that
affair is settled, and forever!
You speak harshly, Oxford, but I deserve it. Am I
then the guilty creature that you imagine? No, I am
not so base. This you will acknowledge, one day or
other. At present, I cannot hope it; you are indignant
at the deception that I have practised, and I cannot
blame you: but the time will come, when a more
temperate
judgment will pronounce that I am more
deserving
of your
love and esteem
than ever.
You speak of seduction. Whom have I seduced?
None. Whom of the young, and the innocent, have I
breathed upon, and blasted? What mother have I
plucked
from her children; what wife from her husband?
what child from her parent? None! none! and I thank
my God that I have not. But am I altogether what I
should be? Oh no! in shame and sorrow I confess it,
I am not.
But hear the whole. She was heart sick of late, and
I! I was near to death and distraction. She charged
me with loving  yet, I denied it, and I spoke the
truth. But my heart smote me, as I remembered the
letters which that extraordinary woman had to exhibit
against me. They were ardent, impassioned, burning;
but were they true or false? If true, then I
had
loved
her, and was fickle. If false, then was I capable of the
most cruel deceit. So
you
would reason.
And yet, Oxford, by my hope of heaven, I never
loved that woman; nor did I wish to deceive her,
except
for
her
benefit, here and hereafter. She was very
dear to me, I confess it; and my hand often shook
when I wrote to her, but it was solely because she was
helpless, desolate, and in despair, dependent upon me,
so young and headstrong, for all that made life dear to
her. Thus, without counterfeiting a passion that I did
not feel, I do confess that I wrote more warmly than I
felt, and often so indiscreetly, that I cannot expect my
protestations now, to be taken by any body but you,
when I aver, upon my honour, that I never loved her,
and never meant to deceive her.
You know, Oxford, that I am no libertine; that
sensuality
has no temptation for me; that I scorn the
ribald
profligacy of young men, and that no woman could
ever keep me in thraldom for an hour, unless her very
heart and soul were pure, beyond suspicion. But how
can I convince Elvira of this? Will she believe that I
have never been guilty, as I would not be, for the
world, in weightier matters.
Let me speak boldly then; my sin is venial. It is not
long that I have considered it any
sin
at all. Hitherto
it has been with me rather a question of prudence, than
morality; and when I have yielded, it has been, not
from any constitutional predisposition, not from any
natural tendency to licentiousness, for I loathe and
scorn it all; but merely as a matter of inconsiderateness
or curiosity, as we sometimes drink more wine than we
ought.
But women look upon the affair in a more serious
light. Why? They remember the deadly, corrosive,
and dissolving nature of that poison, with which the
reputation
of
woman
is sprinkled when
she
has erred.
But this is not a fair estimate for
man
. Look into
society
.
What only renders a
man
more an object of
curiosity
and attraction, (it is in vain to deny it; the
faculties
of seduction are courted to their employment,
even by the wise;) is death and horrour to a
woman
.
What gives
him
a passport to celebrity, as a fascinating
creature, whom it is difficult to resist, and in the
society
of whom, it is so miraculous to be chaste, that
women
are impatient to demonstrate it, by putting
themselves
in his way, will blast the life and beauty of a
woman, and wither all the blossom and fruit of her
family
,
poison forever the fountain of her being, and
give her name to the world, as a bye-word and a
reproach
.
Accursed partiality! Why is not the man
execrated
,
trampled on, hated and shunned! and the poor
broken-hearted woman, upon whose head, as she flies
with dishevelled hair, and aching temples, before the
malediction of society, all the vials of heaven's wrath
are successively discharged; desolation, widowhood,
nakedness, shame, sickness, and death, with all the
pangs of the mother, unhusbanded, unshielded,
unsustained
in her agony of humiliation! why is not she
pitied
and prayed for?
If one be married, it is true, that there is a seeming
difference. If the
husband
break his vows, the rich
overflowing of a parent's affection is not poured out,
upon the head of shame and dishonour; the wife is not
abused in her affections, and left to nourish, and weep
VOL. II. 14
and pray over the offspring of perjury and lust. Not
so, if the
wife
be unfaithful. The deluded husband may
toil onward, night and day, in blood and sweat, for the
creatures, whose very breathing is an augmentation of
his dishonour: and the babes of his own blood, the
children
of his own loins, may be defrauded of their
patrimony
by the spurious issue of corruption and shame.
Where people are married, therefore, there is a reason
why the
same
transgression in the woman should be
visited with a more vindictive and terrible punishment,
than that of the man.
But with the unmarried, no such reason exists. Then
why do not the wise and virtuous discountenance the
misdeeds of
men
, in a manner as peremptory, as they
do those of
women?
The errour lies in the constitution
of society, and it is now too late to reform it.
Enough for me, no matter what may be the act in
itself, enough for me, that society has made this sin a
greater crime in woman, than in man. What constitutes
a crime? The transgression of some law. That is
evidently
considered the greater crime, to which the
greater penalty is attached. What is the penalty in this
case? To
woman
, it is reprobation and death. But what
is it to
man?
A subject scarcely of serious
remonstrance
,
in general, and never, of downright exclusion
from society.
Now it matters not what may have been the act, to
which society had affixed this penalty of opprobrium
and dishonour; let it be ever so innocent and natural;
such, if you please, as going abroad without a veil,
(which is the last indecency in Turkey,) and the
woman
,
who
wilfully
violates the law, becomes, thereby
entirely worthy of the punishment. Why? Because she
manifests her disregard for the opinion and interdict
of society: and if this disregard be so contemptuous
and efficient, that it leads her to do what that society
denounces, as shameless and unpardonable, she
thereby
shows a spirit, that must be fatal to all government;
and, on the other hand, if she cannot resist the
temptation
to do what the law forbids, under so tremendous
an injunction, no matter what the prohibited act may
be, she proves
thereby
that she is not to be trusted. In
either case, therefore, she deserves the punishment
which she receives. The penalty is the measure of
guilt.
Now let us apply this. I admit that this sin is, in
itself
,
alike in man and woman, separate I mean, from
the laws of society. But those laws have made it
greater
in her, inconceivably greater: and this they can do.
It is the office of law to define and cause transgression;
for without law, there could be none. A woman,
therefore
,
who transgresses, does so, knowing from her
earliest
infancy, that, from
that
moment she is lost, utterly
lost and forsakenshut out from societybanished
from all heartspursued with execration and
abhorrence
doomed,
in all probability, to wear out her life
in the company of the lewd and the profane; and
dissolve
,
at last, a pestilential and detestable mass of
festering
corruption. This a woman
knows
, when she sins.
Is it then of any consequence what the sin is? Indeed,
it is not. Her guilty disregard to publick opinion, and
her utter inability to resist temptation, are conspicuous
alike, whatever may be the sin, if the
penalty
be the
same.
But is it so with man? What is the penalty for him?
I do not ask what it ought to be, but what it
is
. Is
his
character blasted? No! Do the virtuous shrink from his
countenance, as from pollution? No! Are daughters,
and sisters and wives prohibited to his approach? No!
Are there any confederacies of the pure in heart, to
blast and scathe the villain, if he dare to profane their
abiding places? No! Is the fire side darkened when he
appears? Are the household deities veiled? Do they
quake and crumble, of themselves, when he invades
their sanctuary? Nono! Do mothers avoid him as the
pestilenceand daughters, as one, whose coming is an
unholy portent to their reputation? whose very touch
is unclean? whose thought is so polluted, that she who
is thought
of
, that moment is deflowered and defiled
and may not purify herself, but by prayer and weeping?
as one, before whose voice the intellect sickens, and
shivers with dismayinstinctively shuddering at the
approach of sensuality, as at the touch of rottenness
and death? No!But he is left to infuse his drugs
before
our very eyes, into the wine-press of our joys,
though we know that they are a mortal poison, and we
feel that, when they are thrown in among our myrrh
and frankincense, they blind and deafen the
understanding
and
we see that the golden vessels themselves,
the chalice, and bowl, and censer, of our family worship,
as if conscious of their profanation, darken and weep in
their places, as the thick, hot vapour gathers about
them, and is condensed by their coldness and purity.
Nonothing of this. The most rigid forgive him.
The curses of the father, the brother, the bereaved and
dishonoured mother, are heard only, at intervals, and
faintly, upon his track along the world; and the villain
scarcely remembers the cause, while the tears of her,
whom he has ruined, and abandoned, are yet undried
upon his cheek. And this too, when some lovely and
innocent creature, the child of his old age, has been
polluted upon the bosom of her father, and left, rifled,
slandered, prostrate, distracted, to die, and rot, with the
vilest of creaturesthis! when he has torn some wife
from her lordsome mother from her babesbroken
the heart that doated on himforgetting his own
nuptial
vow, and treading
hers
under his feet, or wasting
himself in the embraces of a harloteven then,
righteous
heaven!
man
is forgiven!
Such is the award of society. And what is the
consequence
?
Our youth learn to regard as trivial, what, in
reality, is a most disgraceful and brutal crime. The
penalty
is nothing, for indulgence in sensuality, and,
therefore, they consider the
crime
as nothing. Mistaken
boys! Is it nothing to poison your own bloodnothing
so to stupify and prostrate all your faculties, that the
face of innocence and love is insupportable to you;
nothing so to debase and darken the immortal purity
of your nature, that the dearest and tenderest of beings;
woman, she who might be your solace and comfort,
here and hereafter, is degraded, in the sacrilegious
ministering of your passions, to a detestable, and
humbling
companionship? Nothing, to persevere in this till
you have lost all reverence for herdishonoured your
mothers and sisters, by the ribald association of your
thought, and learnt the tremendous creed of the
libertine
,
that `every woman is at heart a rake.' Is this
nothing
?
Where is your dream of happiness, in which
woman is not a part? Of glory, where
she
does not sit,
weaving the chaplet, or offering the crown? Of rapture,
where
her
lips, and eyes, are not eternally moving
before
you? and where is there one noble, one exalted, or
one worthy thought, of which woman, in her purity,
and magnificence, in her nakedness and beauty,
unvisited
,
unprofaned, is not the soul, and the idol, the vital
impulse, the religion, and the meaning?
Young man, think of this. It is no light matter to
trample on the delicate flowers that spring up in pure
hearts;no light matter to dash down the beautiful
imagery of our innocent youth, and shiver their
splendours
in the drunken wantonness of boyhoodto
quench all the bright aspirations of divinity, that mount
up from our hearts, when they are first touched with a
live coal from the altar that God has erected to woman
But enoughI have wandered widely, dear Oxford,
but I have felt what I have said; for, to my eyes,
she
was near me, with her look of speechless tenderness,
rivetted upon the characters, as they were tracedit is
her
prompting that I have listened to, and it is
her
parting lips that have been before me all the while
It is not addressed to you,it were an insult to mean
it for a moment; but, after I had begun my own
defence
,
I was carried away by my abhorrence of the
very crime that I was defending. But then, how ends
the argument? As well as I can understand it, thus
Women are wrong, or rather
she
is wrong, if she
regard
my transgression, as equal to the transgression of
a woman; and I fear she will. Because, I think she
will say, `what would
he
say, had I been guilty! As he
14*
would say to me, I should say to him,or, I shall sink
in his respect.' This I am afraid of. She would rather
die, I am sure, than be less reverenced, less loved than
she is now, by me.
The next in order, was a short letter, so very
hurried
,
and broken, that Harold was barely able to
decypher
the following:
O, what a trial! merciful powers! how my heart
quakes at the recollection! I came near losing her
her words are ringing in my ears at this moment. O
bless her! bless her! the sweet, broken, mournful
tenderness
the
tone and look and touch, of her dear
cheek, as she murmured `I
do
forgive you.' O, my
friend, I never shall forget it!
I cannot, even yet. I cannot recal the circumstances
of last night, without shuddering and weeping: but,
she forgave me
. O, she has little else to fear from me.
Her trials are now over. One more, only one more
remains
and
if she prevail again, I am hers forever and
ever. Her constancy, her hopelessness, shall now be
tried. If she fail, thenO, my Maker! let me die
But, if she withstand it, all
She refuses to write me; but the reason is a bad one.
She has seen some unfortunate disclosures in the case
of a dear friend, similarly situated. She fears that we
may
separate. This is bad policy. It puts us upon
thinking of a separation. By risking nought, you do
nothing to attach a heart to you: and the surest way of
breaking off a love affair, depend upon it, is for each
party to proceed as cautiously and discreetly as if each
expected
it. The sure way of making a man dishonest,
I have found, is to show him that you think him so.
Where people love, and love honourably, this is a cold
and disheartening evidence of suspicion, that few
generous
spirits could brook. She ought to write me, but I
shall not insist upon it, for her reasons are certainly
good, and I shall leave all argument to the time when
I am sick and absent, when her letters will be a
consolation
to me. Let her refuse to write me then, if she
can!'
To this succeeded the following, an illegible scrawl:
`Something has happened. Whatever you hear, regard
it not. Remember the pastmy charactermy life
believe nothing against me, until you hear from me, or
see me. Farewell! Farewell.Heaven, in its mercy,
bless you!
May 18Midnight
Farewell, Oxford. I have done with the world!
farewell
.
Before this reaches you, I shall be a dead man.
Elvira and Oscar are asunder forever. She has broken
my heart. The thunder has fallen, at last, and I
think
that I shall be in heaven or hell, before that clock strikes
twoit is now three quarters after one. I am not
determined
for
myself I am, but I am afraid of
her
senses
,
if I should. This is all that deters me
now
, and this
may not long. She is acting from a mistaken principle.
I have done all that I could, but we never meet again.
Oxford, farewell!farewell!farewell!Do justice to
my memoryfarewell!'
There were still many letters and billets and
fragments
of manuscript behind, which Harold carefully
collected and laid aside for future perusal; but in
tumbling
them over, to find some connected detail, of the
melancholy transaction, which, in its indistinctness was
so thrilling, he fell upon a little note, literally glued to
the fragment of another, written with a lead pencil,
evidently in the extremest agitation, upon the leaf of
some book, and soaked with bloodand marked at the
edge with the print of bloody fingers.
`She is dead!deadI have slain herwith these
handsYessay, that I slew her, I! with my own
handsI who so loved her! Oxford, farewell! farewell,
forever! I am going mad. May be, I shall not kill
myself
.
She was faithless. It were childish to die for her
now. I slew her. I slew him. He is weltering at my
side. I can put out my hand, and lay it upon his
mouth. It is covered with blood, froth, clotted, and
gasping. Do you see this print!and this!and
this!
they are hot and smoking from his heart! would I
could write, with the dagger's point. Almighty God!
I drove it through and through him! FarewellI go
this moment. Hark! they are at the door. The fools
the baffled foolsif they had left me alone, another
hour, I should have gone mad, and dashed out mine
own brains, at their bidding. But now, I will escape,
if it be only to show them their weakness. To-morrow
I shall return. To-morrow I will give myself up to
justice, and they shall see, and know, and feel, that it is
I, and not they, who surrender Oscar! Once more,
farewell
!
I do love thee, Oxford; I do indeedbut woe to
thee, if I meet thee before my death. My appetite for
life is a raging fireit will not be quenched or allayed
but in mine own blood, and that of them I most love
now. Am I mad? I hope that I amGod will requite
me cruelly elseyes, yes, I am madI see that,
plainly
.
His blood here,
it
has made me so. My nostrils are
full of itpshaw, it is singularly offensive, is it not?
for the blood of an enemy. Canst thou read this? the
characters smoke as I trace them. I tried a pen, but
the ink was red and thick. I could not bear it. I then
took this pencilbut lo! the characters are clottedno
matterif we must have miracleswhy, the more the
'
The paper was torn here; and Harold, drowsy and
yet unable to compose his agitated mind to sleep, threw
himself back in the sopha, and fell to ruminating. A
strange terrour, like a wintry chill, stole slowly over
him; a something, as if a sea of cold water were rising,
like a tide about him, higher and higher, as he shivered,
to the region of his heart. The nightwhen would it
end! That candle! it was lighted last by the murderer
himself, perhaps, had been bedewed with some drop of
the spirting bloodit now burned bluishly and fitfully;
the lamp was glimmering at his side: the shadow of
the furniture blackened, in wide and waving masses,
over the floor and curtains. Harold let his hand fall
from his foreheadit struck the handle of the dagger.
He started, as if it had fallen upon a coiled serpent,
and, as he did, whether it was the jar of his sudden
motion, or what, he knew not, there awoke a deep,
thrilling
,
and spontaneous vibration of the harp strings,
followed
by a loud crash, as if a heavy hand had that
instant
been taken from them. He turned aside with a
feeling of horrour, that he was unable to suppress,
holding the dagger in his handhis eye rested on it
and, in the momentary delirium that followed, he strove,
as he afterwards, said, to disengage his fingers from it,
but he could not, for some moments!at length, with
a convulsive, desperate effort, he hurled it from him,
and with such force, that it stood quivering in the wall
the light hastily flashed in the action of his armit
struck, point first, as a murderer's knife always will,
and glimmered, with a convulsive tremulous motion, in
the moonlight. Could he be dreaming! was
he
mad
too? He knew notbut, as he stood, overwhelmed with
horrour and dismay, the figure of a man emerged from
the solid wall, walked sternly and leisurely athwart the
chamber, plucked the dagger out, and disappeared!
just as Harold uttered a shriek, leaped forward, and
fell senseless upon his face, as he put his hand upon the
wall, probably to determine if his sight had not
deceived
him.
The whole house was in an uproar; and the servants
came thronging about the door, each afraid to enter,
while the lights glimmered fitfully and dismally within,
making innumerable fantastick shadows, and keeping
them all in incessant motion, until the lovely Caroline
entered in her night dress, her hair flying all loosely
about her, and shrieking `my brother! my brother!'
CHAPTER IV.
Harold
soon recovered his senses, but he was pale,
and sick and speechless; nor was it until three days
had passed, that he had received sufficient strength to
speak calmly on the subject. Caroline, it seemed, had
been awakened by the noise of the harp, and the shriek
and Harold could not bring himself to alarm her with
the rest, until he was satisfied in his own mind. As
soon as he was able, therefore, he went to the room,
and examined the wall. The dagger was indeed gone,
but there was the gash of its point in the wainscot,
showing that it had been thrown by a strong hand.
Desperate with ten thousand wild and fantastick
apprehensions
,
and ashamed to betray the weakness that
shook him, even to the eye of Caroline, he ordered his
baggage to be removed to the room for a permanent
residence.
Night approached, and with it, a preternatural
coldness
.
He arose and approached the harp, for the first
time since that evening, and was struck by the apparent
alteration in its appearance. The cause was soon
visible
the
chords were snappedbroken, every one of
them. Could it have been by the touch of the spectre
that he had seen? A force more than mortal was
certainly
required, and he remembered the deep sullen
reverberation
that startled him, when no human being
was near the instrument, for he had hardly taken his
eye off of it, in his abstraction, for a moment.
In the feelings that followedso awful and yet so
active, that they were remembered with a singular
mixture of pleasurelike danger from which we have
miraculously escaped, Harold flew for relief to the
remaining
letters, that he had left in the deskHe
opened
it, but they were gone! but where? and by whom?
This was another inscrutable mystery; for he knew
that no servant would have dared to enter the
apartment
,
and his sister had accidentally mentioned but an
hour before, that she had not the courage to come into
it alone.
Harold sat down upon the sopha; and as he did, his
hand fell upon a bundlehe took it to the light, in the
sudden hope that it was what he had lost, but it was
not. It was well secured, and appeared to have been
preserved with great care, for it was bound up in
leather
that was literally worn through, and chafed away
at the corners, like a pocket-book that has been long
used.
He opened them, and was not a little surprised to
find most of them in the hand writing of Elvira;
letters
too, with the post mark upon them, and direction.
It was inexplicable.
Among them, three, in hand writings that were new
to him, lay folded together. He opened them, and
found them all directed to Oscar.
The first was from Oxford himself, and by the date
which was partially obliterated, he was able to discover
that it was written about the same time as the last
letter
of Oscar to Oxford. `You are wrong, Oscar, in
expecting that, from this moment I shall abandon you.
That
I do not intend to do. I shall not easily be
compelled
to do so. Could I be easily induced to abandon
you, to disavow your acquaintance, and to stifle and
smother in my heart all interest or concern for you, I
should not have wanted an excuse for doing so. But
while I say that I have not abandoned you, that I do
not intend to abandon you, that I even wish to hold a
place in your heart, in your affections and respect;
and that I would gladly reserve a place in my own for
you, I do not, for I cannot say that I respect, as I have
respected you. What then shall I say? To pour
reproaches
on your head, after you have confessed your
abuse of the best feelings of those you loved best,
would seem like determining to take vengeance on one
who has thrown himself upon my mercy. Not to speak
of your unworthy conduct, however, on the other hand,
would seem like passing as venial, what cannot be
excused
,
what cannot be palliated; what I can never
forget
what
I cannot yet say, and say truly, I forgive.
Should I say what I think of your conduct, should I
call the language which you have held to me in relation
to Miss H. (if that is her name, for I do not pretend
to know what her name is) by its right name, I fear I
should give you occasion to suppose that I am in a
violent
passion, and that I am
angry
with
you
, rather than
ashamed
of your
conduct
. But you have degraded
yourself in my estimation, more than, one month ago,
I'would have thought it possible that you
could
degrade
yourself.
I have waited that, among other things (for I have
had other reasons for my delay in not answering yours
of the ) I might speak upon this subject
temperately
,
and with
all
the kindness that my regard for
you, or for the infirmities of our common nature would
claim. But I fear that I have not yet waited long
enough. I cannot suppress the conflicting emotions
that agitated me when I first read that letter, and which
rise whenever I think of the train of conduct which
that letter disclosesor purports to disclose. Whether
it is a real disclosure of your conduct, with Miss H.
and your friends, or whether it is only a fictitiousa
false slander of yourself, designed to prove to what
depth you could make your friends believe you capable
of sinking, while in fact you have not sunk at allI
confess, I know not.
Are
you trying their credulity in
your confessions of guilt and shame, or
were
you
trying
it, in your reiterated protestations of innocence and
disinterested charity. But stopI cannot go on
whatever
you may suffer from my delay in writing, I
believe
I suffer more in writing. You must wait then, a
little longer.
May  I should be glad to number Mr.
among my friends, and to look forward to passing some
happy hours with him, in his charming family. I do
hope that that is a pleasure still in reserve for me. I
should, I am very free to confess, have looked forward
to such an event with much livelier hope, and with a
feeling partaking more of the character of a
determination
,
were it not that one very interesting point in
the fancy piece, that which YOUR figure would have
occupied, is thrown into so deep a shade; had it not
become sonot merely dark, but gloomy. I do not
believe that what I said of you to him, lowered you in
his estimation. It is true that, before I knew him here,
your own hand had given the deadly stab to your own
reputation. But when I saw him, I did not know that
fact, and I spoke of you, rather as one, whose good
feelings
,
whose chivalrous generosity had led him into
imprudencies
,
imprudencies which age and experience
would lead him afterwards to avoidthan as one who
would deliberately deceive his best friends, that he
might the more shamelessly insult them.
But I find I am using language which you may not
relish; and I'll stop.
This is an unamiable
letter
,
I know. I am aware that you may say `it shall
never be answered.' (Here was a marginal note in
pencil
`and
if I had said so, he knew well, that it never
would have been answered, while the breath was in my
body,') still I hope you will not say so, I hope you
will answer it. I have not forgotten all that you have
done rightly, but misery was never in this world, more
directly the consequences of sin, than your present
sufferings
are of your vices. This, however, I need not
tell youyou must know ityou must feel it. This is
the
eternal
order of things. Yours,
Oxford
.
`What a letter!' cried Harold, as he finished. `I would
go a pilgrimage to see the author of it. How stern and
unforgiving at one moment, and how affectionate at
another! It is the language of a brother.'
The next that he took up was a vile, awkward scrawl,
but the deportment was noble. Upon it, was this
endorsement
.
`This is the only man who treated me as
I deserved when I cast myself at his feet. Had not my
temper been better than they thought it, their
responses
would have made me a devil. They were exactly
calculated to drive me desperate. That I did not
become
so, was only owing to the kind influence of the
woman that I loved, upon my naturally impatient and
terrible disposition.' And this was the letter.
`If my forgiveness for your fault, or my compassion
for what you suffer as its punishment, can give you
ease, be assured of both.'
Vol. II. 15
But neither my pardon nor my sympathy is
bestowed
unconditionally. You have been guiltydeeply guilty,
and you must abide the penalty. I ask for no more
apologies
,
no more disclosures.
My
vengeance is satisfied,
and as far as I am personally concerned, the atonement
is commensurate with the injury. Indeed I have suffered
no injury. I have been deceived; but the deception was
almost momentary.
All that I require, therefore, as a condition of pardon,
is, that you henceforth (for your
own
especial benefit,
not for mine) put yourself entirely under the direction
and controul of your judgment and understanding, (the
head was made for rule,) and if you ever find your
heart
stepping out of its place, interfering with the orders of
its natural and lawful dictator, or murmuring against any
of its wholesome restrictions, that you treat it as a
common
brawler and disturber of the peace, and a traitor and
outlaw, to be hunted and pursued, and tortured with
impunity
,
by any one who will think it of importance
enough to pay him for the pursuit. You will find the
performance
of this condition hard at first, but
time
and
practice
will reconcile you to it; and if they should not,
necessity, from whose law there is no appeal, will
compel
you to it, however repugnant to your wishes.
I repeat that you have my full
and perfect pardon. I have examined your
motive
and
approve it. But unless you could roll back the wheels of
nature, and recall the flight of time, you had no reason
to expect any more favourable result than that which has
happened. Your letter contains many things on which I
could enlarge, if I had time.But I trust that I have
said enough to satisfy you that I am and ever shall be
truly and sincerely your friend. B.
There was a strange, indefinable interest awakened in
Harold's mind by these letters, and he hurried to the
third, with a tremulous hand, in the hope of
understanding
more fully the event alluded to, which seemed so to
have tried the love and respect of Oscar's friends.The
last was in his handan endorsement in pencil caught
his eyePoor Caroline! I ought to have known thee
better. Thou didst love thy brother, and he feels the
hand of the Almighty upon his brow, like another Cain,
for having broken thy heart. Butsleep ondearest,
thy brother will soon mingle his dust with thine, and
then!where is the angel that shall sift out the
unrighteous
for punishment!Then, I shall be spared,
Caroline
,
for thy sake.
The letter ran thus
My brother,I pity you, but blame you, not
for divulging the secret, but for committing an act base
and dishonourable. Had any one else dared to say that
it were possible that you could be guilty of a
base
action
,
I should have contradicted the assertion in the
strongest terms. I should have found it hard to forgive
him, even for thinking it possible; and should have been
eloquent in your defenceyes, eloquent, for I should
have said that your life, so far as I knew, was a surety that
it was
impossible;
and that I would stake my reputation
upon your correctness of behaviour, morality, and purity
of principle. Often and often have people said to me,
your brother has a fine genius, great talents; you ought
to feel proud of him, and I have answeredI do
too
proud
, I fear, not of his talentsbut of his principles. I did
not think that you had no faults, or were not liable to the
infirmities of human nature; O, no!but I did believe,
and have often uttered that belief in the strongest terms,
that you would shrink with almost a female's sensitive
delicacy from vice.For this, I loved and honoured you,
and forgave what else was amiss. But now I am humbled
completelyyet, I forgive you. From me, no one shall
ever know that you have erred, unless he infer it from
my silence. Would that this letter (of May ) had not
been written! I am ready to exclaim one moment; and
the next, I take it and read it again. I would forget the
contents, and awake, as from a dreambut it cannot be.
The words a base and forbidden act are continually
sounding in my ears. What could it be? You ought to
have told the whole, or not to have named it. The
truth
may be a
relief
. There are a thousand conjectures what
it may beand it is possible we may have thought you
guilty of that, which you would even now blush to
commit
.
As for Elvira, she has done right. I honour her for
her decisionshe could do no less, but still, few would
have had strength to do it, as she has. I sympathize with
you sincerelyyou know I do, if I say itfor I always
feel
more than I express. Had I written as my feelings
at first dictated, you would have felt that you had done
wrong. You have
atoned
how?by true repentance? or by
a recompense. Oh! my
still
beloved brother, if you could
but feel that you are an accountable being (although not
in love, nor to any human creature)to Him, who will
convince you that man owes obligations to some one
beside
his fellow mortal, or himself, even
Him
, whom you
so often thank, for not having made you like other men.
As for Elvirayou need not think that she will suffer
from the affection that she still has:no!she will have
much to support her, a consciousness of having acted
rightly. Did she love the face, form, mind, or
beauty of
character
, which ever it wasif it be impaired, her love
will be diminished. She will deeply regret and keenly feel
the disappointment, but will bless her heavenly Father
that she knew it, ere
too late
. If you would spare her
feelingsbe silent: possibly, if your conduct should be
for the future what it ought to be, she will feel that it is
possible for you to be beloved after all. Do not sink
beneath
the blow; but endeavour to acknowledge the
justice
of your punishment. Do not, to revenge yourself
upon her, punish yourself by marrying one unworthy of
you.
To this was wafered the parts of two others letters
as followsBelieve me, I can and do forgive thee,
dear Oscarand I say to thee, as our Saviour said to the
womango thy way, and sin no more: and I love thee
too, with all thy faults. Thou hast often made good
resolutions
but
canst not keep them. They afford me but
very little comfort. The margin of this was entirely
written overwith these wordsThis
is
cruelshe
forgets my character. I never made a resolution in my
life, that I did not keep, as few boys, and fewer men, ever
kept theirs. No!she has wronged meand I cannot
bear it from herthe world I could smile at, but that
she, who has been a mother to methat
she
should doubt
my resolutionsit
is
hard.
The next and and last was rumpled and blistered,
probably
with tearsand ran after this mannerI have
delayed answering your letter, that I might not write in
anger. I forgive you, but I cannot forget immediately,
that the brother of whom I had so often boasted, who
would shield me from indelicacy, as from pestilence;
who would not allow of my reading a book, that had the
slightest impropriety in it, some years ago, would now,
at this age, recommend as a friend, entitled to all
tenderness
,
a woman that he personally knew to be any thing,
but a proper companion for me. I feel so thankful to
our heavenly Father, that we have escaped this
degradation
,
that I will not reproach you for your intention,
so happily frustrated. Had she visited here, and received
the attention that we were willing to pay to a person so
recommended
,
by a brother so beloved, I fear that you had
bitterly repented your deceiving us. I know and feel,
that I never could have had strength to bear the blow.
Any misfortunethe loss of health, any thing but the
loss of a good name, I could bear without repining.
My heart has pleaded for you, to the lastwhen our
suspicions were first aroused, I contended that you
were deceived, or that you thought her amiable and
good, when you first wrote us about her. Your letters
have undeceived usand taught us that perfection is
not to be expected.
Under this was writtenMy sister!farewell,
forever
.Poor
*15
girl!her fears were prophetickThe
sister of Oscar!said Harold, aloudthen was she
mineDear Carolinewould I might know thy fate
before
I sleep:I am impatient for morning.Saying
this, he threw himself upon the couch, but the state of his
mind prohibited all repose. He was fain to arise, and rifle
the bundle of letters, which had hitherto lain untouched,
at his side.They were all in the hand writing of
Elvira
.The
first one that he openedand the first upon
the bundle, began thusI have seen him, dear Mary,
and am exceedingly disappointed. I do not like him,
and am convinced that I never shall. He is too
imperious
and
then, he scarcely bestows a look upon the
rest of mankind. He is very loud and absolute in his
toneand appears to talk, just when he pleases, without
any regard to the comfort of others. It is true that he
talks remarkably wellremarkablybut I cannot endure
his arrogance: and am really ashamed and angry, that
I yielded so far as to see him, particularly after having
excluded myself the whole evening from other visitors.
Still he is a very extraordinary man, and although I
dislike him, and even tremble when he speaks to me, yet
I cannot get him out of my head. I am continually
comparing him with other men of his age; and have
done this so frequently in my meditations, that I am
really vexed with myself. Can he be amiable? The
natural expression of his face appears mildand that
startling, strange, denouncing aspect, which it suddenly
puts on, may, perhaps, be caused by certain mysterious
events, of which I have heard some whispersor
perhaps
may be, what he says is very common, a
habit
now, from mere indulgence in what
was
affectation.
Did you ever observe the sudden change of his voice
now so clear, that your blood thrills at the sound, as at a
near clarionette; and now so deep and awful, that it takes
your breath awayand you require some moments to
recover from its effect; there is an inconceivable
solemnity
in his manner at timesand yet such sudden
transitionsflashes almost of levity, that I am really
perplexed to determine, whether he is the most
changeable
of human beings, and the strangestor only a
consummate
actor. You have remarked the thoughtfulness of
his browthe intolerable brightness of his eyes. But why
need I rail about him to you;I shall never shake your
enthusiasm in his behalfso farewell for to night.
Can he be amiable, I ask again; I believe not. I dread
to have him for an acquaintance. He seemed strangely
indifferent to what agitates the rest of the worldand
so cold and careless in his courtesy, that I should almost
call him ill bred, were it not evidently the effect of his
haughty temper. He cannot conceal his scorn and
contempt
for trivial things. His forehead, particularly when
he is listening intensely, betokens a spirit, that a woman
ought to dread. His manner is not more abrupt and
searching, than his tone and glance. These things, and a
look of fierceness at times, with a sort of intrepid
self-confidence
,
are all that I find remarkable in him.
Neither
his person nor countenance, is striking at first
sight.
But his voice disturbs me yetI can hear it at
midnight
,
when I am all alone. I have heard many voices
that I liked better, in the trifling chit-chat of the day,
and seen many persons who were more fluent and
musical
in their utterancebut never did I hear tones, that
so thrilled through and through menor witness such
deep solemnity of manner, or such impassioned, such
unspeakable
vehemence of language,such fine
adaptedness
of energy and phrase, and tone, and look, and action,
as I have seen in him, even during our short
acquaintance
.
For one moment, his countenance was appalling.
Our attention was rivetted, in spite of ourselvesthere
was a mortal silence in the room, of which not a soul
was sensible, until
he
had done speaking. But he was
accustomed to such thingshe showed no emotion; and
looked as if he would have been more astonished, if we
had not been silent. He must be conscious of his powers
his looks show it. Is he not sarcastickbitter? Do
you not think too, in spite of his disregard for fashion
and ceremony, that a part of his contempt is affected,
and that the singular air of high fashion and dignity, that
is acknowledged to characterise him, is the consequence
of some other feeling than contempt, or hatred of the
graces and gracefulness of life. I suspect that he is
vindictive; something escaped him, whether by accident
or not, I do not pretend to say, because, much as he
appears
the creature of prompt feeling, I do not believe
that we see or hear aught of his first impulses,yet he
turned deadly pale, his lip quivered, and his dark eyes
flashed fire, as some one spoke of another who, it seems,
had wronged him.Another remark I have made, which
of course, you, as one of his admirers, will only laugh
atI do not believe that these sudden explosions of
eloquence
,
are unpremeditated. No!his emphasis, my
dear Mary, appears too resolutetoo strongly and
critically
placedand he is too ready with the best
language
on all occasions, for me to believe that they are
the irregular, and spontaneous eruptions of the heart.
Is he not a great lover of paradox? That you will
not deny. And it is a notion of mine, that we witness
very few scintillations of his brain, that are immediate,
and unthought of before. It appears to me that he does
nothing, and says nothing, even when most unguarded,
without an especial design. I may do him injustice; but
such is my present opinion, for I have observed his
eyes, and they have always appeared, as if searching the
very inward thought of some person present, however
carelessly he might be looking. This is disingenuous in
himbut I cannot help the opinion. I hope that do not
wrong him; but these all appear to me as so many
indicia
of his character, thrown out, by way of feeling his
company. I wish Helen and Olivia were herewe
should soon be able to fathom his character. Does he
sing? They say no. He has certainly a natural and
vigorous
judgment of musickand denounces fearlessly
the fopperies of the Italian and French school. Who are
your masters? he says, French valets and barbersand
Italian lazaronior worse, shattered and tarnished
nobility
.
They are purely national. Of course, they cannot,
and do not tolerate the sweet, simple, touching and
beautiful
melody of Scotland and Ireland. No!they
execrate
it. And youmost unnaturally join in the
execration
.
Be assured that it is weakvery weak to do
so. Our musick, like our dress and manners, is national;
and it would be as absurd for us to adopt the Italian and
French musick, with their affected, artificial fineries and
fopperies, to the exclusion of our own simple musick, as
it would be to abandon our fashion of dress, and adopt
theirs. These are almost his very words. You see
how direct and unshrinking he is. But I like him the
better for that. It has an air of downright reality, and
manhood, that is not common here. I am very anxious
to hear him readif his voice and manner be what you
say they are,
then
we must endeavour to make him sing.
But nowe shall not succeedone of his last remarks,
I recollect, was on this subjectand you will smile when
you know to whom it was addressed, and whenMr.
had just finished his admirable song, your favourite
Salisbury looked him in the faceand told him, in a
deliberate voice, that it was a reproach to him to sing
so well. The poor man blushed, and yet his eyes
sparkled
with pleasure. It was no light matter to receive
such a compliment from this strange creature. Are
you not ashamed, said Philip to Alexander, who had
been playing
divinely
on a flute, at the table are you
not ashamed to play so well.he added, addressing
himself to me, in an under voice.
Thursday
.
Oscar Salisbury is a creature of contradiction. I know
not what to make of him. To day he utters a sentiment
that makes me doubt, either his principle, or his good
opinion of me: and to-morrow I find him
acting
like a
hero. The last time I saw him(by the way he is very
attentive to Harriot, and even kind of latepoor girl,
she has need of itand is welcome to it) he reprobated
the principle of gratitude. I looked at him with surprise.
Why cultivate the sentiment, said heis it not a
burden? Does not this
prove
it? The generous and noble
minded are ever struggling to throw it off. If the feeling
of gratitude be so agreeable, why attempt to discharge
the debt? Noit is notand we are impatient to get
rid of the load of obligation.How strangely plausible
and brief!There appears to me to be some confusion
in the terms used; but I have no patience to reason,
where such a virtue is deliberately outraged. So much
for the sentiment. Now the action that I alluded to, is
thisI am pretty well assured that he has been visited,
at his own lodgings, by a poor, unfortunate girlwho is
extremely beautiful, and distractedly in love with him
that he spared herand that she has since declared the
fact upon her death bedwhat godlike forbearance!
The history is very touching, and when I have told you
all, you will find your favourite, beside all that you have
known of his virtuesdid good by stealth and blushed
to find it fame, many times, when even you knew it
not.
By the way, a wicked experiment was tried upon his
honesty and self command, the other evening, by Harriot.
We had heard that he was once terribly in love with a
woman whom we knew.Harriot introduced her name,
when all eyes were upon him. His countenance never
changedbut a slight, tremulous motion of the lip, and a
sadder tone, when he spoke, betrayed the truth to
me
.
He spoke of her, precisely as if he had no thought worth
concealing from us. He acknowledged that he
had
loved
herand he never stood so high in my estimation, as
when he concluded with a rapid summary of her virtues
and faultsand added in an agitated voice
I am
afraid that she is unhappy now
. Indeed he had good
reason to think so; for we know her history, and if ever
there was a broken hearted woman on earth, she is one
if the world tell truly.
Sunday
.
I have seen him repeatedly since my lastand like
him rather better. He takes more pains to please us
and we are,
therefore
, I suppose, more pleased. Several
of our old beaux have taken the alarmthey come less
frequently nowand are
unspeakably
silent, while he is
here; nay, two of them appear to have forsaken us
entirely
,
and one, I think, in consequence of a rebuke from
Oscar (for so we call him now).
Helen has been here, and we succeeded in making him
read a tragedy to us. Nor was it any very difficult
matter
,
for though he coloured at first, and his voice was
mightily agitated when we first heard him, yet it did not
seem so much from doubt, or diffidence, as from some
secret emotion. Does he pride himself on reading? I
believe that he does. It is certain, that his tones are the
most touching, powerful, and rich that I ever heard, in
passionate
composition. Helen affects to laugh at me. She
says that he reads to
her
without any embarrassment:
but that his perturbation is excessive, when I am listening
to him. I have observed this toobut I do not attribute
it to the same cause that she does. Never did I hear
such delicate, melancholy, and deep modulation of tone
I should half suspect that he was the author of every
thing that he has read to us, by the interest that he
contrives
to give it, did I not
know
better. When he
concluded
,
we were all in tears!But hushI find that I
can talk of nothing else but Salisbury's voiceSo adieu.
Monday
.
What inexhaustible stores of information!Did you
ever hear him open his lips, even to profess his ignorance
of a subject, without imparting some charm to it? We
have been discussing the comparative morality of
Christians
,
Turks, and Jews. He overwhelmed us all, not as
he used to, with magnificent declamation, but with
temperate
argument, facts, and the most beautiful language.
He says the Jews are the most wonderfully constant
people
that walk the earth; that their religion is the most
sublime and awful. What it was with Moses, it is
now
, he
says. The same ritualthe same ceremony, alike august
and imposing. We witness, what they of Israel did.
Ageshave passed awaycenturies after centuries, and
this people, strangers all over the earth, accursed and
scorned alike, by the black man and the white, the
Christian
,
the Infidel, the Mahometan and the Turk
prohibited
from all the offices of humanity and policy
exceptions
to all the rules of forbearance and indulgence
among menblasphemed and trampled on, by all nations
and kindreds and tonguesare yet so constant to their
Godthat their very faces bear witness to their fidelity
and their origin:so heroically and devoutly obedient
to
their
Jehovah, that their very blood and features are
a part of their religionand their countenances are the
very countenances of them that heard the thunderings and
the lightnings of Sinai, when the Everlasting God touched
it, and it smoked. Where is there such another people?
he asked triumphantly. And who could answer him? To
this, succeeded a picture of the TurksTheir religion,
right or wrong, he says,
is
a religion. A Turk believes
in predestinationhence his sincerity is proved every
hour in the day; for he plucks off the festering garments
from a body dissolving with the plague, and puts them
upon himself: he rushes into battle, up to the very
cannon's
mouth, or to a certain martyrdom, because it is
his
religion. Do the Christians this? no. The Turks too,
when at their devotions, which are, at the least, ten times
as frequent as ours, are never to be disturbed. You may
ride over them before they will rise, unless they have
finished their appointed prayer. We call their prophet an
impostorthey call our Christ a prophet. Who of us
shows most of courtesy. Compare our honesty with theirs.
They leave their shops, full of precious merchandize,
open and unguarded, and they are never rifledthey
give untold gold into the hands of strangers, and are
never deceived. Can
we
say this of Christians?Such
is his mannernay, I believe, almost his very words
again; for it appears to me that I cannot forget what I
have once heard him say, if it be said in that one peculiar
voice, which is altogether his own.
Forgive me. Do not rally meI cannot bear it
now.
Your
reproaches are insupportable, for I feel that I
deserve
them. Your prediction is accomplished!Salisbury
O, would that I had never seen him! All my friends
complain of me. And yet, nay, it does not appear to me
that I am so
devoted
to him as they say. Nonoit is
a cruel slander. I am melancholy MaryI cannot write
you a long letteror an intelligible one.
He has said that he once lovedand when he said so,
his eyes convinced me, that he loved yet. When I first
saw him, I had a notion, whence I do not know, that he
was engagedI wish that you could have seen him at the
timethe recollection haunts mehis downcast eyes
the deep, mournful tenderness of his toneO, yes, he,
he must have loved indeed!She is now married, and
there is a story abroadO, I cannot believe itI hope
it is not trueyet why does it concern me? I would
always
respect Salisburynay, whether this story be
true or false, I
must
always respect him. He is so noble,
frank, and generous!
I know not what to think of him even yet. His
talents
are certainly of the highest orderof that, I see the
most unquestionable evidence, in the respect manifested
to him, by men of the greatest reputation, and greatest
wisdomhe sits among them like their equal, and they
listen to him, as to one entitled to commune with them
but he appears to be unsocialabstractedand too
fearfully ambitious for domestick happinessbless me,
where are my thoughts running to!He has the
reputation
of being vainnay, he acknowledges that he is so
but I am afraid, not because he thinks so, but merely
to manifest his disregard for the world. He has been
hardly used, they sayunkindly, cruellybut he never
complains, and some appear to shudder, when they speak
of his hostility and retribution; but I do notI think that
his mortal enemy,
in his power
, would have little to fear.
He is still proud, very proud, and unbending to
strangers
,to
all
, indeed, except the poor and bereaved; but
his manner is tender, less abrupt, and more agreeable of
late, I think. Have you ever remarked how sudden and
Vol. II. 16
bold he is, in his advice;and with what an air of
authority, he often speaks his opinion, even to the aged.
It is wrong, I thinkbut I am led to believe that it
proceeds
from an habitual experience of the world's harsh
judgment, and uncharitable ways. He stands like a
gladiatorexpecting to encounter none but foes
sword and shield.One trait is decidedly prominent
in his character.
He never flatters
, or if he do, he
never appears to flatter. You cannot but believe what
he says, even though it be new to you; for he gives a
reasonand there is always such an air of manhood
and sincerity about him, that you are convinced,
whether
you will or noit would almost seem, but good
night!good night!I could run on forever, but I
forbear
.
Tuesday night
.
People say here, and those too, that know him well
that is, his whole life and historythat he will be a
great man
. But
great men
, are not so easily made, for
he talks as calmly of ten or twenty years application,
night and day, as many would of ten or twenty months,
and yet he denies that there are any great men to be
seen, in this generation. His friends are very confident
that he will be distinguished, but they tremble for him.
You never saw such devoted creatures as they are.
Their attachment is invincible, and not only that, but it
seems more like the friendship that we read of, sublime,
heroick, and steady, than like what we usually experience.
His enemies too, are as unsparing and deadly, we are
told, as his friends are enthusiastick and firm. But they
are sensibly diminishing. We hear him spoken in high
terms of now, by some who have been his enemies
they acknowledge that they have misunderstood his
character
,
and wronged him. You would smile however,
to hear him justify them. He says that those who
know
him, are his friendsBut that his enemies, having no
opportunity of knowing, are obliged to judge of him, as
he appears,haughty, overbearing, and repulsive, or
vindictive; they are right, therefore, he says, in
disliking
him. His enemies used to lie against him once, and
censure him often, without knowing why. And now,
he says, and shows us the proof in some amusing
revolutions
of opinion, that he is praised in the same way,
by those who do not, and cannot know him. Some too,
lie in his favour
now;
but he does not hesitate to expose
them, for it. In short, it is the publick opinion that has
changedand, he predicts that it will continue to change,
making him alternately better, and worse than he is, for
many years. He is prepared for this; and so far as I
can judge, I should think him one whom this change of
opinion would affect, be it better or worse, less than
any other human being that I ever saw. He says that it
is impossible to flatter a man of sense; or rather that a
man cannot long entertain too high an opinion of
himself
;
and I believe this. But he says also, that the world
can
be deceived, and are deceived constantly, respecting
a man's talents: for they, he says, are like wealth.
When is a man's property rightly valued by the world?
never. By himself it may be; and intellectual affluence
is like all other affluence, best known to the possessor.
You might as well expect a man to believe you, if you
told him that he had more money in his pocketas that
he had more brains in his head, than he actually had.
There may be exceptions; but this, he advances, as a
general proposition.
Mary deartell meis my style altered; I am told
that it isnay, that I have caught a portion of his spirit,
and actually use, after him, not only his sentiments, but
his very language, at times. If I doI am unconscious
of it: sorry for it, and would avoid it. Nay  for why
need I conceal itthey do tell me, for it is a fact that
I resemble him in my countenance, as I believe myself,
although I hope not, in the expressionand we have
been repeatedly taken for relationsand once for
brother
and sisterthey do tell me, that I have contracted
one of his worst habitsone that I would, if I might
dare to attempt it, break him ofthat of knitting the
brows, and frowning, as if discontented. In him, it is
probably earnestness or abstraction, but it looks like ill
temper. Ohanother thing has just occurred to me
There is a bitter levity in his manner sometimes, that
terrifies
me. It is a strong word, Mary, but it expresses
no more than I feel. He sneers sometimes at love, and
marriage, in a way that leaves me in doubt whether he
does not regard them as a mockery. I do not like this
it distresses me, because it makes me question his
principleor at least, when he says, with a look that is
common to him, a severe thing on this subject, I am
led to doubt his
sincerity
or his principle. Some one
mentioned the
marriage
of Mr.the other evening.
Poor fellow! said SalisburyI knew himhe was
a very worthy fellow!just in tone and look exactly, as
if it were his
death
. There was no smile upon his face
when he said thisand his voice was deep and
lingering
.
What think you dear, of these symptoms? or have
you never heard and seen him, at such a moment? The
general impression I find is, that he speaks as he feels,
scorning all the tenderness and simplicity of life, as
childish, affected, and mawkish. But Iperhaps I am
deceivedI think that his heart is the abiding place of
the deepest tendernessand that its emotion is like that
of deep waterat the bottomnot to be detected by
the agitation of the surface. Really!I believe that
is
one of his own thoughts. Adieu!
* * * It is time to go to bed,
but I will venture to scribble a postscript. I open it for
that purpose. He has just left us. How very abrupt
he is! He always starts off, as if suddenly offended.
But
he
says it is because he dares not trust himself to
think of itand had rather plunge, at once, than stand
shivering, forever, upon the brink. He takes out his
watch too:if we reproach him, he says that it is the
greatest compliment to usfor it shows that he dare
not trust to his
senses
, in our company. He was
uncommonly
serious to nightand really dignified. We had
a literary man, whom you shall know, when you come
on,of a singularly unpretending, simple and strange
character. A conversation ensued between Oscar and
him; and I felt himOscar, rise every moment in my
estimation. He was calm, collected, and graceful. His
language was that of consummate self possessionI
never respected him so sincerely. Others seem to
stand in awe of him: and they wonder that I do not.
But I do notI cannotto me, he
is
gentleDo not
laugh at me, Mary. I cannot well bear it, of late
whether it be, that I feel conscious of deserving it, or not,
I wo'nt pretend to say, but my spirits are darkened, and
any allusion that would once have been taken kindly,
is apt now to hurt and alarm me. But no more of this
I know your tenderness, and delicacyand am
willing
to tell you all my thoughts. What a
postscript!
And I am not half done.I remember one of his
opinions
,
which Mr.seemed particularly struck with,
and acknowledged, honestly, that it explained a
circumstance
perfectly to his satisfaction, upon which, he
had frequently meditated before, without being able to
account for it. And yet it seems very simple.Is not
that the character of a great mind, though, to make its
demonstrations so clear, that we are led to wonder at their
simplicity? We were speaking of poetry and elocution;
Mr.reiterated the opinion that the Greek and
Roman
school had furnished the greatest that had ever been
or would ever be. My opinion upon that subject,
said Oscar, modestly (I give you nearly his very words
) are somewhat peculiar. Is it not a matter of taste,
and opinion? now it is
my
taste, and
my
opinion that
there have been many as great musicians, orators,
statesmen, warriours, painters and poetsnayeven of
sculptorsand architectsamong the nations of modern
time, as among the ancients. Of warriours and
statesmen
,
said his antagonist, there may have been, but
surely not of poets and orators. And would you
teach, then, said Oscar, that poetry and eloquence
are arts so rude and simple, that they are brought
to perfection, in less time than politicks and war?
They are not
sciences
, said Mr. A. triumphantly, I
*16
thoughtand the testimony of all nations is to this
effectthat poetry and eloquence are the natural growth
of a semi-barbarous peoplethus Ossianand
Homer
.
Oscar turned his eye slowly upon him, and replied
with such effectbut no!I will not attempt to
describe
ityou ought to have seen him.Sir, said
he, have you ever examined that opinion? May it
not have been too hastily taken up? In the first
accounts
that we hear of the East, we find that the
people were abundantly more refined than their
neighbours
.
And yetwhere is there any poetry, like
that of the eastern peoplethe Orientalsat that
time too, so fervidbold and impassioned? Among
savages, I admit, that there is a
kind
of poetry, as there
is a
kind
of eloquence, and a
kind
of architecture. But
why should poetry be rude, and boisterous, any more
than musick? I cannot understand it, and my belief
is, that poetry and eloquence, like all other
intellectual
arts, are to be perfected by the gradual
perfection
of society. And therefore if it can be shown
that musick, painting, architecture, and sculpture (of
the last, it is true, there may be a question) have
improved
,
or could be improved, beyond what they
were, with the Greek and Roman, I will undertake
to show that poetry and eloquence may be so too.
But, you have all the nations of the earth against
you, said Mr. A. Do they not all concur in preferring
Homer and Virgil, to all other poets?
Truebut Virgil was the growth of the Augustan
age; and Cicero, and Demosthenes were no barbarians,
and
that
would seem to affect your doctrine, that
poetry is best in its rudeness. They prefer the
statuary
and architecture of the Greeks and Romans.
But do
you
honestly nowI know that you have
seen the Apollo and Venus,do you believe that they
may not be surpassed? You hesitate. Have you never
seen a sculptured woman, done by some modern, (and
you know that sculpture is neglected more than any
other art) that pleased you better than
the
Venus?
I
have, nay more, I can point out material disproportions
in her form. But may not this be the casenay,
is
it notthat we prefer the models of Greek and Rome,
in all arts and sciences, (and by
we
, I mean all the
moderns) for the same reason that an Englishman
next to them
, prefers those of his own country, and
a Frenchman those of his?
I do not understand you said Mr. A.
I
mean
my dear sir, to lead your attention,
indirectly
,
to my object. An Englishman is prejudiced in
favour of the labours of his own countrymenthe
larger the empire of his country, the wider that
prejudice
will be distributed; now, if you could extend
the dominion of Great Britain over all the world, do
you not believe that, in time, the whole world would
be likely to refer only to British models, as the only
standard of excellence, just as they would to London,
for fashion and pronunciation? Now, suppose that no
other nation had
any
literatureor sciencewould it
not be the natural consequence, after a while, that
what ever was done at London, would be consecrated,
imitated and applauded, all over the world? Here then
is my conclusion.Greece was
as
an universal
monarchy
,
because, as to the nations of the earth, she was
the capital, and metropolis of taste. Then come the
Romans. Their empire
was
universal. They,
reverenced
,
and imitated the Greeks. No other nation did,
or could dispute with them. And in time, whatever
was written at Rome, or applauded at Rome, or
built, or done at Rome, or hallowed by Roman
approbation
,
came to be applauded, and imitated
all over
the world
, wherever the Romans were known or heard
of. The nations of the earth unite, in preferring
Homer
and Virgil, because of this universal dominion, to
which they were once subject. And if Italy should
reconquer the whole world, her poets would be the
standard: if England,hers; if France,hers. And
the reason why no poet, or orator, or painter of
modern
time is regarded,
generally
, as equal to the ancients,
is because, in no modern time, has there been so
extensive
or so
permanent
an empire as the Roman in
exstence
;
but you have always found that, as a kingdom
extended itself, her authorities and opinions, her
favourites
,
in poetry and eloquence, extended their
dominion
with it. Every nation in Europe may have, at
this moment, a greater than Demosthenes, or than
Homer
,
but until that nation extend her dominion, far
and wide, like the Roman, they will not be
universally
esteemed so. Within their own limits they
are
often regarded as superior to all others, and, as their
limits extend, that opinion extends.
But, said I; why do they not, if your argument
be just, why do not the people of each nation,
prefer
their own orators and poets to those, even of Greece
and Rome?
Some of the wiser, or more daring, do so:said
he, but the true reason why it is not universal, is this.
Go into a small town, and you will find that it has its
great manwhom it prefers to all other great men,
except some one, in preferring whom, all the country
concurs. But where is he? at the
capital
of the whole
country. When Rome was at its zenith, she was the
capital of all the worldall the nations of Europe
were then, but as provinces. No competition, of course,
could arise between her great men, and theirs. But
stopI can make this plainerand therefore I will
not finish what I had intended tosuppose Great
Britain should suddenly eclipse all other nationsand
establish at the same time an universal monarchy
suppose that hundreds of years afterwards every one
of her provinces should become a kingdom, in all the
schools of which the
ancient
statues, coins, paintings,
dramas, and architecture &c. &c. &c. of Great Britain
were regarded as models, and examples;now,
cannot
you suppose, that although, in each of these
kingdoms
,
all these arts should be brought to greater
perfection
than their models, yet nevertheless, that they
would not
unite
in acknowledging it. Would not jealousy,
prejudice, and infatuation prevent it? And would not
the natural consequence always be, that, in
each
kingdom
,
the old British model would be preferred, because
all
had preferred it, while its own modern imitations,
would be considered the
next
best? Is not this exactly
the case at present, with respect to Rome! And is it,
therefore, a
conclusive
proof of the superiority of the
Greeks and Romans, that all the natives of the earth
agree in acknowledging it.I say no.
Upon my word!I
have
made a pretty postscript
indeed!another whole sheet. But I
will
stop now
with this one remark,I have not done him justice.
He
was perfectly
clear
, I have not remembered it so
well as I thought that I could.
After my last long, long epistle, which I hope you
have decyphered by this time, I was determined to
indulge you with a respite.still the same theme though
I can neither talk, write, nor think of any thing
else.There appears to me nothing conciliatory about
him. He takes favour as a matter of right; and is
strangely scrupulous in his speech. It seems to
distress
him, to hear a word mis-pronounced; or a phrase
badly constructed. Yet he sometimes errsin
pronunciation
I mean, very rarely in a grammatical sense.
And how he renders his thanks!his countenance
never changes, except to
me
. He is the favourite of
the whole household too: down to the very servants
and children; and yet, there is no soothing, nor
coaxing
in his manner. And here another of his remarks
occurs to meShow him a man in a passion, he says,
and he can always tell what he
has been
. Early habits
are omnipotent. Thus, men swear and talk vulgarly
when in a rage; and they who never
write
provincially,
often
speak
so. Is'nt there much truth in this? I have
applied it frequently since; and not long ago saw a
very great man wipe his nose on his cuff, very
naturally
when
he had lost his
artificial
character, in the heat
of debate. How necessary is self possession, before
such an observer!
This morning, a friend of our uncle's came inand
gave us a good deal of information,
indirectly
,
respecting
Oscar. You know himMr. Ponsonbya very
strong mind, and acquainted with men too, you know.
He says that Oscar Salisbury, is the most extraordinary
man of his age, that he ever met with; I never sat
with him, ten minutes in my life, said he, without
hearing some remark, that proved him to be no common
man. The first time that we ever met, I remember well
that he maintained, against a whole room full, and
successfully too, for I have thought much of it, since,
and all my observation confirms his doctrine, that the
difference of
genius
in men was only a difference in
irritability
!
He, who is born with the most sensibility,
the most delicate nerves, is most liable to be affected
by all outward or inward circumstances. Women, and
infants are an example. He who is most affected in
this way, (I can remember Mr. Ponsonby's language
better than Oscar's I find!)is least able to confine
his attention to one object; what he feels, he feels
keenly
,
exquisitely, thrillingly, but he never explores,
never
ransacks,never meddles with the alchymy of
nature
.
Hence he becomes a wit, a poet, a musician,
a painter, an orator, a statesman or a mathematician,
as he has more or less physical sensibility! How
little sensibility, thought I to myself, must Locke and
Newton have had!and is it not true? If they had
much
, would they ever have pursued their terrible
metaphysicks
,
as they did? Nonever! The more
sensibility
he hasthe more irritable he isand the more
irritable he isthe less patient he isand the less
patient
,
the less likely to be profound.What
immeasurable
letters I write of late. Once, I said that a
letter
ought to be brief, but Oscar says(the deuse take
the man!his name is eternally at the tip of my pen,
I believe)but
he
says that we ought to talk as we
writeand that it would be just as absurd to think it
a merit to say, what we have to say, in the fewest
possible
words, on paperas in conversation: that the
beauty
of both, is the free, natural, and unlaboured
expression
of our thought, without affecting terseness or any
thing else. As well might we talk in epigram, like
the laconic Spartans.A dieu.
Gracious heaven! Mariadearest
it is settled!
I
cannot tell you when, or howI am
so
happy; but he
has acted with the utmost gentleness and delicacy. I
should have written you immediatelybut my
temples
have been throbbing, nay, my very finger ends, for
a whole week:and it is only to-day that I can guide
the pen at all.He has many faultssome that I did
not know of, till he confessed themgreat faultsbut
he is so candid, so resolute, and has already done
so much in the way of reformation, that I have no
fear either for him, or for myself, were they much
more numerous and threatening! Good night!good
night!
My hand is steadier to day; so I have re-opened
your letter, and begun again. I had a terrible dream
last nightyou will laugh when you know what it is,
but really it distressed me exceedinglyand I was half
afraid to meet him this evening again, lest I should find
it confirmed. I was troubled, but he was too
sharpsighted
not to discover italthough I did my best to
conceal it. At length, like a fool, I told himnever
shall I forget his look!I am utterly in your power
use it mercifullykindlydo not destroy me
utterly
he saidand I had once determined
never
to put myself in the power of any other woman
the tears rose in my eyesand his hand shook.
But no
tear
was in hishe never weepshe cannot
weep, I believe. I dreamt that he was holding my
handthat his brow suddenly darkened, and he threw
it from him. Where was my spirit? goneI sat as
if my heart were broke.Nay, worse, Mariawhen
I
awake
, I felt as if I
should
sit so in reality, if he
were so to wrong me. Ohow I am altered, I was
unhappy, till I saw himand never, never did I part
with him so reluctantly. Oif he be to grow to my
heart yet more closely, as I fear he will
fear
, oh no!
as I
hope
he will, I declare Mary, I do believe
that it would kill me to part with him. How I
love
him!yes the word is written, and I wont recall it.
I never could have spoken ithe appears to me too,
to want my lovewho knows but that I may minister
to his greatness, till he may say that, but for me, he
had been less great! I have a strange foreboding too,
that he will want my love still morenay, that it will
yet be his only consolation in this earth. Can it be!
I would almost wish, that it might be so!that he
might be abandoned by all the world, for a time, to
feel how entirely I would give myself up to him.
Poor Oscar!with his spiritso injuredas it has
beenso haughty, and so unpropitiating, he is the
very man to experience the ingratitude of them that
ought to love and reverence him.FarewellI
cannot
write another linemy tears blot the paper.
A vile thought has just
intruded upon me. Assist me to subdue it. I am
afraid that Oscar is a little jealousno, not that
exactlybut there is a spice of haughty jealousy in
his disposition. I dread the consequences. If I
know him, he would show his jealousy, unlike any
other man:it would be, by giving every opportunity
that he could, to his rival, worthy or unworthy. If
worthy, I am
sure
that he would, because he has told me
that he does not consider me bound to him, for one
moment longer than while I prefer him to all the
world. Nayhe will not take an engagementfor
he says that it is folly. Either it binds when affection will
notor it does not. If it doaway with itwho
would let a woman marry him,
because
she was
engaged
?
If it do notthen it is useless.
He is something that unsteadies the mind while
it contemplates him. How he derides, and scorns, all
the ridiculous ceremonies of life! They are tricks, he
says, that patrician fools invent, like escutcheons, to
distinguish their party. And when these are
counterfeited
by the plebians, or imitated, they
manufacture
others, like the Free Masons. He maintains that
our civilities should always be proportioned to our own
estimate of people's value, not to that of the world,
when we meet a person: that, by treating all alike,
our greatest favours lose all value. Is it not so? Is
not
distinction
what we covet? and may not a friend
be as much distinguished by a smile, as by an
embrace
?
assuredly yes.
What amazing candour he has! I believe that I am
now mistress of every event of his past lifeor
every one that he thinks of.His heart lies naked before
me. There is much, particularly one transaction
relating
to that strange woman, of whom I wrote you,
which I could wish had never happened; but no
matter
what
is past must be forgotten. O, Mary, how
I have suffered respecting her!for a long while she
haunted me. I would dream of themsee them
together
she
would break in between usand he would
abandon me! I declare that I was afraid to shut my eyes
at last. Her very name hung, like a dead weight,
upon my hearthis emotiontheir intimacy, which
he acknowledgesher passionate love for him, of
which I have the proofthe peril that he underwent,
for herand I know not whatthe thought of it
made me sick. Yes Mary,can you believe it?at
one time I had no wish to
live
; even yet, he cannot
entirely
assure me, and he half complains of me, that
I will not be comforted; but I know not how it isI
have a superstitious thrilling when I think of her: as
if she were one day to be a curse to mea sickening
apprehension that she is yetYetmerciful Father
yet!
beloved
by Oscar! what he did, was right, he
says, because there was nobody to care for him, and
nobody to suffer, by any misrepresentation of the
intimacy
.
It was long before he knew me, you know, I
suppose. But he says that he would do the same thing
again, under the same circumstances. But then, he
adds, in his own soothing, affectionate way, you know
Elvira, that the
same
circumstances never could occur
again.
Perhaps this is jealousy in me. Oh, I hope not. I
would give up my life to see him happy; but I cannot
bear to think, for a moment, that he loves her, or that
dear Mary, I cannot write it
Vol. II.17
One thing, at least, is certain, although my friends
are very anxious about her, that Oscar will never permit
himself to marry, unless his heart is entirely freeand
then, I am sure, this phantom will pursue me no longer.
His godlike principles will be my protectionwhatever
may happen. Good night!
Monday Night
.
He is too much addicted to argument. He makes me
unhappy by it. How dreadful it is, to hear two persons
wrangling fiercely, and continually, while all the rest are
constrained to be silent. Let me give you another
specimen
of his contradiction. Mr. O was censured
for changing his religion again. It was called a mark of
weaknessand fickleness. It
may
be, said Oscar,
but the weak are obstinateso are the ignorantthe
wise change their opinions often; so do the active and
inquiring; but the obstinate and ignorant
never
do.
Such is his way!
Have you ever heard him speak upon a theme that
was rousing and proportioned to his full powers? He
dwelt upon Shakspeare latelyHis countenance was
pale, deadly pale, when he began(indeed people say
that he is in a consumptionbut he ridicules the thought;
I attribute it to other causes, and entreat him to be more
prudentand go to bed, like our watchmen, betimes
and you know that
they
are distinguished for their orderly
habits) but it was crimson before he concluded, with
the excess of inspiration. I had been listening, for a long
time, to a very common-place eulogy upon the bard,
when I saw Oscar's lip was tremblingI could not
forbear
I
thought that I had more command of myselfbut
so it wasI touched the train, and never did I see a
poor creature so astonished as Doctor Wilson was, (for
it was he, and you know his pompous way; besides I
knew that he disliked Oscar exceedingly, and had spoken
quite disrespectfully of him.) Shakspeare! said
Oscar, who can measure his might? He is a
magician
and
when he puts out his handsthe clouds roll
away from the heavensthe waters tumble into foam
and there comes upward, a subterranean musick, as if
the pillars of the earth were organ pipes, and a great
wind were among them! Now it was impossible
even for me to tell if he were seriousbut he continued,
and I soon found that he
was
so, even to solemnity,
unutterable
solemnity. Shakespeare
is
a magician; I
admit
that. But his time has past. What gives his
licentiousness
,
his absurdity, his obscenity, and horrible
caricaturing
,
effect?What, that ribald, brutal lasciviousness,
which characterises all his portraitures of that most
beautiful and wild passion, love(except in Miranda)
what! but thisthat ever since it was the fashion to idolize
Shakespeare, men of the greatest talents have been
spending
whole lives, in giving effect and significancy to all
that he utteredstudying his words, and dwelling
upon them, and seeking their hidden and mysterious
meaning, and, still oftener,
imagining
what
he
never
thought of, as a sure means of making themselves
conspicuous
.
Take the vilest tragedy that was ever written
let GarrickKembleCooke, and such men, spend
their whole lives, in giving to every word and phrase
significancy
and effect, and, in time, it would be considered
preternatural. There lies the secret. A plain man, who
has never seen one of Shakespeare's tragedies performed,
laughs at our enthusiasm. He considers the whole as a
broad caricature of every passiona caricature done by
a masterby one, at whose touch the solidest and coldest
and darkest material, became illuminated and transparent,
and shot forth flames; but nevertheless, so exaggerated,
(for the mob if you please,) that it
is
a caricature. Take
his Moor and Desdemona. Who, of any feeling, does
not loathe the horrible depravity of Desdemona?it is
brutal lasciviousness!What think
we?
the idea of
our planters cohabiting with a yellow woman is shocking
to usalmost unnaturalbut with a
black!
we should
abhor and detest him. But this is yet worsea woman,
altogether lovely, queenlike, and gentle, loves to death
and distractionwhom?a blackamoor! God!if his
horrible lips should profane her forehead, even upon the
stage, the stomachs of the very mob would revoltand
they would sicken with horrour and execrationhiss
them off the stage.
Look at Romeo and Julietthat scene of
tenderness
,
too, where the lover meets his beloved in moonlight,
and silencewhat does he? Is his language broken
disorderedpassionate? Oh, noBut he makes
love in a set speech, so that it has really been a serious
question, with me, whether it would not be well to
consider
the whole as a
travestie
, like High life below
stairsa valet making love to a lady's woman. You
think this blasphemy. I see you do. But read that
speech again, and tell me if you would not think as I
do, if you heard any mortal man address such stuff
to any woman.
What of Macbeth tooand his witches? O we well
deserve the sneer of that consummate scoffer, who
selects
that
, as the master piece of our greatest
dramatist
.
What of king Richard III.and Lady Anne! Look
at ita womana princessgoing through the
publick
street, with the body of her dead husband,
youthful
and beautifulis arrested by a monster of
deformity
a
fiendreeking hot, from the slaughter of that
husband:he kneels to her,
in the street
, in the
presence
of the corpsein the face of heavenin the very
presence too of the common soldieryand there wins
her to prostitutionpublickly!
publickly!
By theI
wont swearbut if any man
now
, were to produce such
an outrage upon all decency and common sense, as
that, he would be lampooned as an ideot, a madman,
from one end of the country to the other: nay more
I do contend that Shakespeare never wrote a
tragedy
,
no, not one, which if it were to come out
now
,
from any unknown author, would be tolerated for an
hour, a single hourno actor would play itno
printer
publish itand no human being sit out the
reading
of it. Try it yourselfattempt to read itread it
as well as you canand you are wearied to death of
it. It excites no emotion in younor in your hearers.
Duncan is murderedand a terrified attendant comes
in exclaimingyes reallythat he, he himself has just
left the murdered old man, the monarchand that his
silver
skin was laced with his
golden
blood! and so
with every play that he ever wrote. It is full of trash
distortion in language, sentiment, and character.
And yet he, Shakespeare, has been called the high
priest of nature. Nature!O, would you know, if there
be nature in the tremendous offspring of Shakespeare,
go and unveil them to the savagenay, to the refined
and sublimated(if they be not the countrymen of
Shakespeare)and what is their answer? Shakespeare
was wonderfulhe startlesterrifiesand astonishes.
But he is
unnatural
tiresomeand childish; full of
obscure ribaldry, and grotesque caricatures
rhodomontade
and insupportable trick.
He was silent; and we were breathless. Surely, said
I, you are beside yourself. Would you leave nothing
to this Magician? Yeshis wandhis ministering
Ariel, with her delicate spiriting, and his imperial
conceptions of madnessnothing moreand I would
purge him, and his works seven times over, before I
would permit either to become a standard with them that I
love. What was left, would be the purest elementI
do admit,that ever was extracted from mortality. It
would be the
otto of genius
.
I laughedfor who could help it; and he was fain
to accompany me.
What extraordinary self possession he has. The
more that he has to oppose, the more proof he can
throw into action. I never saw one, who so rose with
the occasion, said Mr.after he had done.
A calmer and more temperate discussion followed,
between
him and the professor, whom you so respected,
you know, for his gravity and collectedness. But
even with him, he was at home. The subject was one
that I could not understandvery metaphysicalbut
I observed that the professor treated him with the most
profound respect, and frequently manifested his
astonishment
,
*17
by the most unequivocal tokens. You
know his fine eyesthey actually sparkled with delight
at times, while Oscar was talking to him, in his
earnest
wayin a very low voice.I tried not to listen
but it was in vainI can hear no voice but
his
, and
I am not the only oneothers listen as I do, with
intense
interestand anxiety. He keeps you constantly
agitatedor rather, he can, if he please.
Farewell! dear Mary
Elvira
.
May
A long time has passed, I admit it. O, Mary!
I cannotcannot tell you what I have suffered. I
have been sick, sick unto death. Twice have we been
nigh a separationO Mary! can it be! What would
become of usof me!Indeed, indeed, I know
not. He would bear it better than Ihe is olderhas
had experience before, in this terrible passionand
could turn his attention, immediately, to some object
that would employ all his faculties. But IO, I
could not. The world would be a blank to me. My
heart would stopcrumble, perish in dust and ashes,
I am sure that it would. But nohis passions would
destory
him. He would fall by his own handI know
he would, if he should think me unworthy. I know
not why, dear Mary, but sometimes I think of him,
till I am trembling from head to foot. He is so
ambitious
so
passionate.Indeed, Mary, I have a terrible
feeling of dismay pass over my heart, like a cold
wind, at times. What shall I do? Would he survive
a separation? once, I am sure that he would not; once,
with his pride and revenge, he would have wrought
some tremendous retribution. We have spoken of
the possibilityand shuddered as we spokethat we
might be separated; his voice was hollow with emotion
but very tender and kind. There is no great
difference
in our agesand the probability is, therefore, that
we may die near togetherperhaps, in each others arms
OI would not be the survivor!I
could
not. He
wants me to write to him, if he go to France.I
cannot. You know the reason of my repugnance. But
he approves of my refusal. Yet
that
is in character
there is no selfishness in his lovehe would rather
die, I am sure, than that I should do aught that was
imprudent. It is either consummate generalship, or
consummate love. I have been trying to interest him
in our missionary societybut he puts all that out of
my head at oncein this way. What is your object?
to give the bible to the heathen? The bible is a
code of laws. `Where there is no law, there is no
transgression.'
Without
the bible therefore, they
cannot
sin against it
with
it, they may. Is it wise to
send it among them then? Is there not some fallacy
in this? I fear that there is, and yet I cannot see it
perhaps
,
because it came from
him!
adieuadieu!
May
O, Mary, I am happy beyond expressionhe has
bowed down his whole nature, imperial as it is, to
the touch of gentleness. What a strange being! I
should not be surprised if, from being the haughtiest
and sternest man of his age, he should be the
meekest
and gentlest. I weep when I think of itand he
too,
can
weepI have felt his tears fall upon my hand
I am glad of itit gives me a better opinion of his
heartit is true, that I thought he was strangling, and
II was almost distracted and blind at the time, but
he
wept
, and my hand felt as if it were blistered,
where his hot tears fell.People say that love is blind.
I do not believe it Mary. It is not. Are parents
blind? Nothey see all the faults of their children;
perhaps many, that others do not see, but they see
many virtues that others do not. So with a loverhe
sees all the faults of her that he loves. And why not?
Is he not always on the watchintensely alive and
active
,
with every faculty? and can it be, that the cold,
and careless, and indifferent, shall see our elements
more readily than he, whose eyes are always poring
over them? Would that I could tell you all, dear, but I
cannot; I only pray that when your time comes, you
may meet with some one as gentle (I am sure that you
smile nowbut to me, he
is
gentle) as devoted, and
as tender to you, as Salisbury is to me. I am
becoming
too proud of him, I fearMary, I could take that
man by the hand, though he had not a friend, nor a
guinea in the world, and go out with him, before the
face of all mankind, and crylo! My husband!
A strange incident occurred last night,my cheeks
burn at the thoughtand I am really half ashamed to
relate it; yet this letter was begun, chiefly with the
intention
of telling it. But why should I be ashamed?
it has become a
duty
for me to think of such
endearing
relationshipbut noI cannot go on. My
lips thrilland my veins tingle at the thought.
I have become more
composed
.
I
will
tell it. You heard me mention a beautiful
little boy lately, that Mr. Hammond has adopted. I
was caressing it last night, when your old acquaintance
Sir Harry Mainwaring, came in. He was introduced
to me, and as he bowed, I observed that he called me
madam
. I took no notice of it, however, and he
began romping with William. Oscar sat next to me,
and I was playing with the boy's hair. A sweet
child! said Sir Harry, glancing at Oscarand then
at me you
ought
to be proud of him. Oscar
averted
his head, but not until his dark eyes had flashed
fire into my heart. I thought that I should have sunk upon
the floor. I could not lift my eyes, and the Baronet,
the stupid wretch, persisted in his errour, until
aunt Harriet saw it, and benevolently relieved us.
But O, Mary, what a strange shivering came over me,
as I next met the bright eyes of Oscarand, saw his
lips opening, as he bent toward me, and uttered
some kind remark to reassure me. To be a mother
!Maryof such a cherub as thatto see a father's
heart run over, as he kissed itO, I should be
delirious
at the thought. Farewell!farewell!my
temples ache with the rapid irritation of my bloodI
cannot permit myself to think of such an event. And
all that I say is thisa humble prayerthat if I
am
to be a motherour Father, who is in heaven, will
qualify
me to discharge the ample obligations of one
The next letter that Harold foundwas sealed with
blackhis hand shook as he opened it. There was a
long interval between the dates.Here it is.
It is all over!O, Mary, Mary, he has deceived
me!wewe are parted forever. Oscar, Oscar!
where art thou?where am I?would that I had
never waked!
That womanthat dreadful woman. I had all along
such a prophetick sense of thisand now it has come
at last. O, Mary, dearthe curse
has
fallen. My
heart is dissolving. The preternatural dread that I
felt for herthe horrour that I had of her nameit is
all accounted for
now
. Mary---Mary---would you
believe it---O, I cannot write it. How spotless, how
lofty he appeared. I believed him---and now, oh my
God, my God!---it has come to this---Mary---I will
write itI
will
, though my heart burst.
Oscar was
guilty
ThereI have written itand yet I am
alive. I have written itborne testimony against him
before the throne of heavenand yetI only feel a
sort of tightness over my breastwould that I could weep
I'd give the world to weep. Mary dear, I am very
sickDo you love me yet?will you weep for me.
Do, dear Maryit will make me happy, I am sure
it willthe earth will lie lighter on my heart. Tears!
yes, yesonetwoO, what a relief! only think
Maryguilty after allto have been touched
caressed
doated
onby one, who has been familiar with a
wanton. O, I wish that I
could
laughI trybut I am
frightened at the echoO, why did he tell it, Mary?
I should have been
so
happy else. Did he seek to rid
himself of me? O, Oscar, Oscar! thou little knowest
the heart that thou hast lost!Wilt thou ever find
such another?Nevernever!
But one weeknay not a week(only six days)
hath passed
then
I would have laid down my life that
he was innocentBut nowO Marywould that thou
wast herethat I might go to sleep, forever, upon thy
bosom.But noI am aloneNobody understands my
feeling. My pride is appealed to. Alas!I have no
pride. He is disloyalI am toldTrue, but then it
was
before
he knew meand he tells of it himself. But
six daysand then, O, how his eyes flashedhow his
locked hands shook!how his lips quivered, as he
denounced
one who had been impurenotoriously so
one whom he heard us speak well of. O, why did he
tell!I cannot forgive himhe knows that I cannot. If I
did,
he
would despise me.Farewell! farewell!
I know not what has become of himbut for meI am
the veriest wretch on earth. My God! My God!
why hast thou forsaken me! O, take me awayI
cannot
liveI do not wish to live another hour. Why did
I ever survive my last sickness? O, that I had died!
O, do thou support and sustain me! Strengthen my
heart!And, do thou spare himpoor Oscarmy
heart bleeds for theeO, spare him, Father of Mercies!
spare his senses!
Here ended the catastrophe. Harold could
read no further. He was blinded by his tears. The
mystery was solvedhe shut his eyesand
contemplated
the whole anew. How like his own fate! Oscar,
the proud, the unspeakably proud Oscar, had loved
been loved in return, to madnessto idolatryto
desolation
and death. They had been torn asunderHow,
just as he and Loena had been. Could it behad he
not been reading the history of his own life? Whence
this mysterious resemblance? Could it be, that their
fates were aliketheir destinies alike! Oscar had been
torn away from that heart to which his cleavedand
given to the waveswas it to be
his
fate too? Why left
he his solitudewhy? But to be wrecked and shattered
and driven, intellect and life, forever and ever, before
the tempestuous visitations of heaven!No wonder that
he had slain his fellow men! Nothe wonder
was
that
that he had not made war upon the whole human
family
!
CHAPTER VI.
So
Harold thought. Alas, Harold knew not how
potent
is the rebuke of heaven to the imperious and lofty of
heart.
They
feel. They, although they stand upright,
like the everlasting oak, while the thunder is breaking
above and about them,
they
are quaking, in secrecy, at
the
root
, while the feeble in heart, the willow and the
sapling, are only moved outwardly by the presence of
the Almighty.
The right thought came at last, in the real destiny of
Oscar. Harold saw it, and read, with trembling joints,
like the Babylonish monarch, a preternatural warning, on
the solid wall, before himIt was the fate of himself
the history of his brother. Every limb of his frame
shook: he arose, and attempted to fortify himself by
recalling
the pastand stretching toward the future. But
it was all in vain. There was no pastto him. It had
gone forever. There was no futureit had not arrived.
There was no presentfor while he lifted his foot to
take possession of itit had vanished! The past, with
all its woods, and mountains, and foreststhe war and
the chasethe Indianand the pantherfaded away, as
he looked upon them, like a continent, in the downward
glance of an eagle, in his most perpendicular ascent.
While he clapped his wings over themthey were gone!
They were dust and smoke. And the future thenlike a
world newly opening, with all its proportions, upon some
creature waking, like Eve from the trance, and deep
sleep, of her creationwas too overpowering and
blinding
,
for untried faculties. Cheerfulness was behind
him, like the recollection of our own fireside, when we
are cold, and wet, and weary, and among strangersan
adventure was before him, like the panoplied spectre that
a young knight sees, in his first dreaming, amid piles of
shivered helmets, and battered cuirasses, on the eve of
his first tournament.
But Harold slept at last; and a sweet, refreshing sleep
it was to him; the first for many nights. Nay, he slept so
long, that the sun stood, curbing his red steeds, upon the
very keystone of the zeniththat is, it was about noon,
when Harold arose.
A gentle tap at the door awoke him. He had dreamed,
but a moment before, of the rattling of carriage wheels.
He was terrifiedand, when he looked at his watch,
stared, much as one of the seven sleepers probably would,
in looking at an almanack when
he
awoke.
He found Caroline expecting him in the parlour
My dear brother! said she, the tears starting into her
beautiful eyes, as he caught her hands, and held the dear
little fingers again and again to his lips. She was pale
very paleand had slept littleHarold was speaking of
it when Mr. Hammond himself enteredfollowed by a
man, with whose carriage Harold was exceedingly struck.
He was a tail thin manwith a very dark, melancholy
eye, thick lashes, and black, strong browswith
something
severe, yet not forbidding, in his countenance, and,
on the whole, a physiognomyparticularly when he
talked, for his voice was musick, and his smile warmth
singularly interesting.
It is Oxford, said Caroline, softly,watching the
direction of Harold's eyes.
Is it possible! cried HaroldWell, he is the
very man that I most wished to see, and exactly what I
expected to see. Saying this, he immediately addressed
himself to him, but was thunderstruck at the emotion
that Oxford betrayed, the moment that he distinctly
heard his voice. His dark eyes filledhis lip trembled
and he arose and walked to the window, in silence.
I love that man! said Harold, emphatically.
You will do more, said Mr. Hammond to him, in
reply. You will
venerate
him. Every body
loves
him.
I am glad that you are come, said Caroline, to Mr.
Hammond, I am
so
glad.
Why, dear? said the benevolent old man, is your
new brother inclined to be
very
unruly?
No, but a little tardy, as you see. But(she
hesitated
)
Vol. II. 18
there are many things for him to be informed of
relating to
Mr. Hammond patted her shoulder, as he answered
Yes, child, there are. I'll tell them myselfwe will
take an hour's turn on horsebackperhaps call on Sir
Ralphand,trust the whole affair to me. We shall be
back, I dare say, in season for supperwhatever may
happen.
The horses were now at the door, and Mr. Hammond,
who mounted and sat the saddle like a piece of machinery,
dovetailed and locked to it, could not help exclaiming
Well done! as Harold, laying his hand lightly on the
mane of his horse, threw himself into the seat, without
touching the stirrup; and galloped off, down the green
slope, yielding and swaying to the motion of the animal,
as if the two, horse and rider, were one body, governed
by one will; while the creature struck his iron-bound
hoofs into the flint walk, till the fire flew out as thickly,
as from a blacksmith's forge, and his glistening and
beautiful
tail flourished, like a banner of white combed silk,
behind.
I have taken you out, said Mr. Hammond, that
I may tell you more about your family. With whom
shall I begin? I am ready to answer your questions.
Tell me, I pray you, then, said Harold, with
eagerness
and solemnity, tell me of Oscar. I have read the
letterswhat kind of a boy was he?
From my first recollection of him, said Mr.
Hammond
,
reigning his horse, and adjusting himself in the
stirrups, while he drew off a milk-white glove, and placed
his hand upon the pummel of the saddle, as if preparing
for no light matter, he was remarkable for distinctness
of character. Whatever he did or said, was peculiar,
prompt, and strong. He was passionate and headstrong,
but generous beyond example. He had a heart of
uncommon
sensibility, and a countenance, till it grew dark
with evil passion, of perfect transparency. You could
see his thought, before it was uttered. We were alarmed,
as his character began to emerge, by its magnificent
proportions
.
It was shut, sealed up, and hidden for a long
while; and we even thought him a coward
A
what!
sir
Nay, nayI do not say that he
was
a coward,
but that we thought him so. But he soon undeceived
ushe bore, till he could bear no longerand left his
oppressor
,
weltering in his own blood, in churchat the
communion table. I never forgave him for italthough
he was curelly wronged.
Not yetsirnot even yet?
No!It was unmanlyand terrible. But let us leave
thisin his very childhood, these symptoms appeared.
He was once stabbed in the side, mortally, we thought at
first, but we never knew it, till his shoes were full of
blood, and he fainted away, while he was talking to his
mother. He was scarred all overparticularly about the
templesand every scar was the evidence of some
desperate
adventure, or miraculous escape. I always
predicted
that he would be a distinguished manbut I
always feared that he would not be a good one. He was
another Alcibiadeswith tenfold determination of
character
,
and none of his effeminacy. Every feature of
his mind was strong and decided. But that, which above
all others distinguished him, was his insatiable curiosity
and appetite for the mysterious, and forbidden.
But are not these things common to many, in their
boyhoodand only remembered as emphatick and
peculiar
,
in consequence of unexpected greatness? Do not
all children sometimes do, or utter things, that are
wonderful
?
If they die young, or unknown, at any age
these incidents of promise are forgotten.
Harold!said Mr. HammondYou have
spoken
the very wordsin the very tonethat your brother
would speak, were he here. Every time that you open your
lips, I trembleYou perceive that I am blind of one
eyeand this scar (laying his hand upon his forehead)
is a severe one. I am indebted to your brother for
both.
You!how?
I was the man whom he, a mere boy, struck at the
communion table. You are amazed. Yes, it was
myself
.
I had wronged himand I was much olderit
changed my character; and I can truly say, that I
forgive
him for the blow, and the consequencesbut not
yet, do I pardon his awful violation of the place. Judge
then, if I have not cause to tremble!
Harold was silent with admiration and respect.
Thy brother, continued Mr. Hammond, was not
like other boys. At times nothing could move himhe
would sit, moping, for days and days, under that old
tree, where we turned offHarold remembered itit
was very grand and beautifulat others, nothing could
daunt or intimidate himor quell his activity. For
weeks, he would ramble among the mountainsin storm
and wind; in night, and darkness, and starlight. It was
enough for him, at the age of twelve, to know that there
was something, which no other boy dared to dofor him
to attempt it, at the peril of his bonesand very rarely
did he fail in the attempt. I have known him to
accomplish
that, which would thrill thy blood to hear
mentioned
.
On one occasion, I remember, that he was in pursuit
of some animal that he saw above himthere were two
ways of reaching himone, by descending the cliff on
this side and ascending the othera second to leap into
a chasm, the bottom of which could not be distinctly
seen, and ascend a tottering mass of snow, which was
actually shivering in the wind. Before I could prevent
him, he dashed into the abysswhere there were many
chances to one that the loose snow would swallow him
and before I could recover from the horrour that it caused
me, I heard the report of a musket, and the next
moment
saw the animal, wounded, endeavouring to ascend
by the side of the loose, overhanging mass of snow
Oscar followedand the moment that his feet struck itit
shook and crumbled. I saw his dangerand shouted
He felt it himself at the same moment, and leaped from
his perilous height down upon the very spot where I
stood, just as the mass, detached by his weight, came
thundering by usblinding us with its whirling dust
and jarring the mountain, under our feet, like an
earthquake
.
Another moment, and he would have been buried
hundreds of feet below, in a world of snow, which might
never have melted, in the deep cavity where it fell, till
the last day. But this is only one, among a thousand of
his mad adventures. He belonged to a corps of young
men, at one time, whose practice it was to fire at cards,
held off at arm's length, by each other, and was once shot
through the wrist, in consequence of his taking a distance
that nobody else dared to take.
All this desperate enterprise argued well for his
character
,
if it were profitably directed. It was a spirit
kindled by Heaven, by whom nothing is kindled in vain,
for the noblest purposes; and only wanted feeding and
tending, to become a wonder and a marvel upon earth.
His anger was terrible, but brief, too, as the
lightning
.
And even now, I feel assured, after much
observation
of his character, that most of his petulance and
violence was assumed. At an early period, he became
passionately addicted to reading, and read with a
voracious
and indiscriminate appetite, whatever came in his
way. He was constantly terrifying all that knew him;
not that he showed
much
evil nature, but because he
showed
some
, and we supposed that the worst, in him as
in other men was hidden. But it was not so. He scorned
to conceal any thing. He always put the worst outward.
He grew, at one time, fond of the quiet and inoffensive;
and delighted in taking their part, and fighting their
battles
.
At the same time, he trampled down, in scorn and
insult, the tyrants of society. He never threatenedbut
there were those, before whom brave men had trembled,
that trembled in their turn, when they encountered the
dark eyes of Oscar. He never spared themand they
knew that, while he had life in him, he could not be
brought to spare them. They shook in his presenceas
if a strong shadow had fallen upon their hearts, and
chilled them like a malediction. At last he changed
devoted himself to some secret studytoiled night and
daylived like a hermitsuffered nobody to come near
himand never left his room for years. And when he
came abroad, his manners were hardly of this world.
*18
They belonged to another agehaughty and repulsive
mysterious and forbidding. From his very boyhood, he
had no associatesno playmatesno companions, to talk
with, or walk with. His companions were menand his
amusements were those of a man. This again was
regarded
as a bad symptom. What can he be about? said
one. Is it true that he spends his nights in study?
Doubts went abroad. He was known to be ambitious
but then he was so obscurethat there could be no risk,
men thought, even if he
were
plotting treason. Alas!
they knew not, that when the poison is concocted by such
a hearta drop of it may poison a whole state.
Doubts were abroad, I saidand they, who ought to
have been kind, and charitable, to thy poor brother,
were the most unkind and uncharitable. Butthat is
passedThy brother heeded it not. He cared not
what men thought of him; and went on, doing his
duty, in pride and sullennesslike some one, who
has no feeling of earthno sense of human infirmity,
no dependence upon
time;
but looks to the
future
, and
sets his foot upon it, with the strength and collectedness
of a giantmaking it like the
present
, by his
preternatural
steadiness.
We awoke at last from our trance, we broke in upon
the retirement of Oscar, and dragged him forth to the
light, with all his labours. They were those of a life.
Piles of manuscriptsystemsstudiesinvolving the
most profound abstraction of the spirit, were all found
within his study. He had achieved what would have
been wonderful in any body, during a whole life, with
confirmed habits of studyHe, with no habit of the
sort, had achieved a miraculous labour, and amassed a
treasury of learning.
Butafter allthe one thing needful was wanting
a vital religion. He was carelessimpiousnay,
blasphemous at times. He grew fond of
metaphysicks
,I
trembled for him. But he strode onward,
through all their dimness and obscurity, till there was
no barrier left to himin heaven or earth. He stood
and interrogated the Almighty God, himself, like one
having authority therefor. He went abroad through
spaceand then, because he found no resting place,
like the bird from the ark,
then
only, came he back.
He returned again to his studies; betook himself to
sublimated speculation of a more worldly nature. And
then followed the time, Haroldwhen thy brother was
a more dangerous man to
his
countrythan was ever
Csar or Cataline to his. While we were looking
upon him, as a growing honour to the nation, he lay,
preparing and compounding the elements of a more
bloody, and tremendous revolution to his country, than
ever before shook its foundations. And, feeble as
he wasthe king himself turned pale, upon his throne,
when the plans of Oscar, their extent and secrecy;
and his resources, (for he had managed to embark the
wealth and ability of an empire, in his undertaking),
were laid bare before him. Another step, had sent him
to the scaffold. But this he knewand went
fearlessly
before the privy council, and set them at defiance,
demanding his papers, and mocking and deriding them,
and their master.
He failedwhy?not because of any fault in him;
for this I will say for Oscarthat, what any man
could do, if he thought it worth his ambition to
attempt, he would do, betteralways, where it
depended
upon himself.
A fact, particularly striking in his character, and
recollected
now
, by all that ever saw him, though it was
overlooked then, is this. He seemed to hold an
undisputed
,
indisputable dominion over all that
approached
himyoung or oldwise or simplephlegmatick
or passionate. It was all the same to himhe ruled
them, as with a rod of iron; and they loved and
served
him, like slaves, without knowing it! and they
would fire in the contact with his spirit.
At last he
loved
. Never shall I forget the timeor the woman.
His whole nature changed. Ha! you are paleare
you ill, Harold?
No noproceedI am very wellwas it
Elvira
?
Noit was another. I knew it not for
some time. He was deeply involved in a litigation,
which threatened to deprive him of his patrimony. To
this, I attributed his melancholy. At last, however,
I found out the truth. Oscar had begun to love.
He told me his storywhen I believe that he would not
have told it to his
Maker
. She was young,
fascinating
,
and from all that I could learn, passionately
attached
to Oscar; but, like him, she had no pietyno
feeling of religionnone of obligation or accountability.
I was sorry; but I did not despair. I saw that the
waters might be troubled, in the deep places of Oscar's
soul; and I prayed that the angel of the Lord might
be there for a while. His law suit grew more
threatening
.
He determined to leave her free, unembarrassed,
and ignorant of his love, if he failed.
I met him, soon after his acquaintance with the
lady. He was extremely altered; by his high pale
forehead
his
sunken eyeI should have thought that he
had just risen from a sick bed. His feelings were all
at war within him. He took my hand. A tearthe
first that I had ever seen therestood in his eyeshis
voice trembled. Haroldold as I amI could weep
like a child, at the recollection. With all his faults, thy
brother had the noblest naturewould that he had
trodden
the appointed road!O, he would have been a
godlike creature. But let me returnHe took my
handhis chest heavedand a convulsive shivering
followed, as if his heart were a little rebellious, and he
would rebuke it unto deathone short, quick effort
his voice was like that of one suffocating inwardly
as by the rupture of all his blood vessels.
`Hammond!' said he, pressing my hand, (I can
feel it
now
, as I hope for mercy! O,it is thy hand!
) `Hammond!
she is unworthy
.'
He dropped my hand, and staggered two or three
steps, before he recovered himselfbut when he did,
and turned his dark, melancholy, motionless eyes upon
mehis face was like that of a corpse`It is the
last!' said he,dashing off a tear
it is the last!
and
it
was
the lasthe never shed another tear for her.
I was inconceivably affected. I feared for his
senses. He saw it`O, nono, no!'he said`no!
I am safe. It is all over now, my brain is seared
it is boneall over bone. A whole week has gone
since I suspected her. This morningnot an hour
since, my suspicions became certainty: and now
now!
Hammond we are asunder, forever and ever!'
I fell upon his neck; I knew what he suffered, and
I felt inexpressibly proud of him. To withstand such
a shock would require great power in any; but for one,
organized like Oscar, to bear up against it, was
wonderful
.
He was of a nature to admit when he loved,
the death and darkness of that passion (of love) into
his vitals. But it was his salvationa new impulse
was given to him. He was cast in his law suit, and
ruined. I offered him my home, heart, and purse. He
rejected all but my love; others offered him the same.
But he was not to be moved. `Of what avail is all
that I have learnt,' said he, `all my better experience,
if I am to be helpless and dependant at my age. NoI
would sooner be a burden to the parish, than to them
that love and respect menay of the two, I will steal,
rob, murderbefore I will beg. No,by mine own
hands will I liveor
by mine own hands will I die
. But
come, comewe shall never get along at this rate.
The horses were standing stock still, and Harold,
grasping the hand of Mr. Hammond, was listening with
the most breathless attention.
Harold struck his spurs homeand his horse leaped
off, like an old hunter at the cry of hounds.
Have a little patience! cried Mr. Hammond,
pushing
after him.
Surely, I have as
little
as you could desire,
answered
Harold, as soon as he could get his breath
and yet, I could listen forever, to you, on this
theme.
He left us, continued Mr. Hammond,entered
into foreign service, as a volunteer, and literally fought
his way up, to a considerable command. At this time too,
his talents in diplomacy became singularly conspicuous
he was employed in a difficult negociation abroad, by
our cabinet, which, it is said, he managed like a
statesman
and
we believe this, because he continued to be
a favourite with his king even to his deathand I
have the plan of a campaign now by me, which has
been publickly, upon the floor of parliament, said
to exhibit the proof of consummate generalship, and
acquaintance with the military art. His nature changed
again. He was no longer haughtyhe was only serious.
He was no longer abrupt and passionate, but calm,
dignified, and benignant. Men wondered at itbut I
did not. I knew his habits. The poorer he was,
the prouder. Why? Because if poor, he could not be
magnanimous or polite, or conciliating, or kind,
without
subjecting himself to the reproach of sycophancy,
or something worse. As he became of consequence,
this reason perished. `I have tried many of those
who now follow me,' said he to me, one day, as I
met him at the zenith of his power`but they have
been found wanting. I
could
avenge myself now, for
their neglect, when I was poor and unknownbut I
will not. I forgive them. I am weary at last, of being
feared and hatedI will be
loved
.'
This was the very spirit that I had waited for. His
mind, I saw, was working itself clear. I had seen it in
its commotion, whirling, foaming and thundering; but
now it grew calmer, and smoother, and more beautiful,
after every visitation of the windand widened and
deepened its banks, and shores, and foundations. Heaven
be praised!the reformation had begun, and I looked
forward to the time, when I should see Oscar happy, and
making others happyloving and beloved.
What became of his loved one? said Harold.
She married,and died, but the other day, of a
broken
heart. Oscar was her best friend, on this earth, while
he lived,and when he departed, even her children
themselves, were as shadows to her, whom the reality of
life hath passed. He continued to see her, after her
marriage
:it
was a path of danger, and I warned him of it.
But he heeded me notstrong, in the confidence of his
own rectitude, he continued braving all its perils, and did
his
duty
, in purity and blessedness, without one thought,
word, or deed, I verily believe, that would have sullied
the heart of an immortal spirit.
Harold looked at the old man, whose dark blue eyes
were lighted upand the pupils seemed enlarging, while
he raised his trembling hands to heaven, in the
earnestness
of his asseveration.
O my brother! articulated Harold, would that I
resembled thee
entirely!
What! cried Mr. Hammond, what do I hear!
Young man, you know not what you say. Already your
resemblance is too great. Beware of this spirit. It was
the spirit that destroyed the eldest born of your father
and the first born of the first man. It was born in blood.
Beware of tempting the Almighty. Avoid danger, if thou
wouldst be sure of not falling. It is enough to meet it,
when it cannot be avoided or averted. It is impious to
court it. But to thy brotherLong and long after this
disappointment, I observed a remarkable expression of
mildness and patience in his deportment. It grew more
and more conspicuous, every day.
He was in love again
,
and she, whom he loved, was
then
the kindest and gentlest
of human beings. I sought the cause of this alteration.
He was too noble and frank of heart to deny it. He told
me that he had seen, by chance, an innocent and lofty
creaturewhere she ought not to beannoyed by men
that could not understand her, and dared not love her.
His colour came and went, as he said this; and, for the
first time in his life, when speaking with me, his
eye-lids
dropped and trembled. He affected to speak with
some levity upon the subject, but it only distressed him,
and his spirit arose, and shook herself free, all at once
from the darkness and mystery that incumbered herhe
looked me in the face`Hammond,' said he`I
think
that
woman is worthy of me; if she be, and I
can
win her, I will.'
I made some inquiries, and soon found that he was
the delight and pride of those, whose influence would
probably be decisivebut Oscar scorned to depend upon
any other influence than his ownhe forbad all
interference
and
begged to be left unaided, unprayed for, to
win her or to lose her. His principles were sublime. His
very errours were sublime. He was not the man to
penetrate
into any dwelling, secretly, or doubtfully. He acted
like a man of honourhe applied to men first, and
satisfied
their judgments, and apprised
them
of his
intentions
,
long before he had come to any
determination
respecting
the lady. He was not the man, to win his way first
into the soul of a young, innocent, and warm hearted
girl, as if such a prize were only to be
stolen
and then,
when sure of it, to ask leave, in mockery, to visit it.
No!But he knew that she could not judge of him, but
by an intimacyand that, then it would be too late to
judge
, in all probabilityand that, at first, there were
those about her who could calmly and dispassionately
decide for her, while yet there was no danger to either
not whether she should
love
him or notbut whether he
should be permitted to visit her, with his views and
pretensions
.
He applied to
them
firstand to
her
last
advising
her to believe and listen to their judgmentand
her own feelingat the very time, that he communicated
the heaving of his heart. He soon became the subject
of publick remark. It was evident to all that something
preyed upon his vitals. He wanedand wanedtill his
hue and aspect were cadaverous; and many who knew
not the iron of his constitution, saw in this, rather the
symptom of a mortal disease, in its last ravages, than
the nightly depredations of an unquiet spirit.
Suddenly his countenance changedhis very step. I
asked the reason. For her sake, he had revealed himself,
long before the appointed time. He, in his own manner,
sought not her decided
affirmative
to his suit; for he
knew that their happiness must depend upon no
precipitate
judgmentall he asked wasif he were to be
refused
,
and she already
knew
itto be told so. If
not
refused,
her acceptance was not to be inferred therefrom, but left
to a future acquaintance.
From that moment, he was an altered man. He
became
more humble, quiet and benignant. Indeed, I am
sure, from what I saw of this short acquaintance, that
there was nothing, nothing, within the compass of love and
duty, which Oscar would not have submitted to, while
she permitted him to love and venerate her. All eyes
were upon them. They seemed fitted for each other.
Alike in many thingsin their appearancetaste and
inclinations
not
unlike in temper, training, and
deportment
,
they were fitted for union,
unison
, and
companionship
,
of the most sublimated and enduring nature. Such
was her influence indeedthat Oscar came to be
considered
as a religious man. He had always been so, at the
heartbut now, it was less carefully hidden. He had
been, to my knowledge, always grateful for kindness,
and submissive, yielding, under calamity. I never heard
him repineand I do not believe that any human being
ever heard him utter one word of complaint, under any
trial. Yeasuch was
his
love, and
her
dominion, that I
verily believe her to have been the only living creature,
whom he had known so long, to whom he never did, and
never could, speak
unkindly
.
Butnow comes the catastrophe. I cannot
proceed
wait
a momentlet me recall the distressing
prelude
As he said this, the old man turned aside his horse, for
a moment, and passed the back of his hand over his eyes
and affected to be disturbed by the dustand his voice
quavered when he renewed the tale
She loved him, passionatelypassionately, I am
sure. It was evident to all that saw her. Her looks
her eyesher voicewere all full of the passionate,
eloquent
,
delicate, mysterious significance of love. Every
hour,
she
became more lovely, intelligent, and watchful;
and every hour,
he
became nearer and dearer to her. But
alas poor Oscar!they partedmerciful Heaven!
the dust choaks and blinds melet us turn off to the
green sward
Poor Hammond!they were then upon the wild
heath!where
dust
had never been seen.
They parted forever!with her own hand, she rent
asunder their convulsively intertangled heartstringsthe
Vol. II. 19
crimson filaments of love, that had twined and intertwined,
till every fibre, at the most delicate touchthrilled, and
trembled, and shivered through two hearts, at the same
instant, communicating, with electrick rapidity, every
tremulous pulsation, from one to the other. Yes! with
her own hand, mistaken but heroick woman! she tore
asunder two hearts that had grown together, as she
would have plucked away a cancer, from her bosom, by
the roots.
I saw him. I remembered his first love. But
that
was not like this.
Then
he shed a few tearsI was told;
here
, for a time, he shed none. The edges of his
eye-lid
were like burning wireand the balls throbbed under
their tightness.
Then
, he felt humbled, trampled on,
debased
,
because he had loved one who was
unworthy
one that had fallen, in the trial of love.
Now
he grew
produer and prouder of her who had loved himas her
blows fell the heavierupon his shattered and crumbling
heart. I was with him night and day. A stranger would
have discovered nothing remarkable in his manneran
acquaintance or common friend, nothing more than a
greater seriousness. But II saw his eyes grow dim,
and heard his voice falter, when he was, as others thought,
profoundly occupied in matters, that had no relation to his
suffering. There was no agitationnone outward, I
mean. But his countenanceO, Harold!it was the
settled and deathlike tranquility of one that has no hope:
of one that is dyingand is glad of itwhile other men
are asleep: of one that loves to look upon his own heart
while it is dissolvingto watch the decomposition of its
material, as he would a process of forbidden alchymy
regarding its ashes and death, as the gentlest and most
precious of transmutationits bleeding and tears, as the
true elixir of lifethe essence of immortality.
I strove to awaken him. He was calm, insufferably
calm. For a moment, like on who cannot at once crush
the rebellion of his heart, he would arise, and walk
strongly across his apartment, with folded arms, and
compressed
lips; like one taking command of a mutinous
armyfor two or three timesand then return, with
a sort of stern composure, to his accustomed labour.
He came to my house one day. His eyes were
brighter
than usualhis mouth redder. `I shall return to the
cottage,' said he.
I was sorrythere was a deep brilliancy under his
lashes as he spoke, that troubled me. It was the hue of
a fire, about to break out. I dissuaded him, for a day or
two, during which time, I saw him repeatedly upon his
knees. There grew upon his countenance a more awful
solemnity and fixednessand the last night, that he was
with me, he continued writing, at intervals, till day-light,
and was seen to pace backward and forward, during the
greater part of it. He refused to appear at breakfast
and would not be disturbed, alleging great weariness and
desire of sleep. A few hours after, he sent for meand
said, putting a sealed letter into my handThere
that
contains all that I have to say to
her. It is for her sake
that it is written. I care not what becomes of
me
. But
her happiness is too precious to meand I have made to
it the offering of all my prideallall! It was my duty
to stoop, to court, to solicit her reconsideration of the
affair
not
that I would
persuade
, but convince her. I
scorn to influence her judgment or heart, on a question
so momentous to her happinessbut I have never seen
her since the disclosure, and she
may
think that I was
too proud to see her or soothe her. I was notI loved
herI reverenced her, too much to attempt aught that
might lead her to reproach me, hereafter, if we were
reconciled
.
NoHammond, were I sure that she would take
me to her bosom again, as fondly, as devotedly as ever, I
would not humble myself more than I have. This letter
contains all that I shall ever address to her. Her
happiness
is at stake. If she accept it, she shall be happy. I
can
make her soand I will. If she reject itI shall
not complain. It is her right to judgebut if she reject
it, it is my fear that she will have given the death blow
to her own heart. At present, we are both so situated,
I believe, that either would advance, if
sure
that the
other would accept.
In this letter, I have laid bare my whole life
exposed
all my folliesreasoned with her, as if I were
not concerned in her decisionas if I were her
brother
,
not
her lover. All my aggravated guilt is there
all my exasperated feeling. She thinks me
altogether
darker of principle, and more dangerous of
temper than I am. YetI never deliberately wronged
a human being; and never, even without deliberation,
but I atoned for it afterward. My vengeance has
been only a pious desire of seeing my enemies humbled!
I did not wish to set my foot upon their necksno!
I wanted an opportunity to be magnanimousI
would have raised and embraced thembut for this, I
would have tracked them the world over!merely to
forgive themin my own way. That letter is my
last. If she forgive meshe may name her own
termsI care not what they are. I am, with all my
faults, Hammond, upon my soul, I am worthy of her
and I know not another woman on earth, whom I
think so well fitted to make me happy. If I did
not
think soyou know me well enough to believe me, when
I saythat I not would turn my hand upside down to
change her opinion of me. Nay moreI do feel that
I was never so worthy of the love and veneration too,
of any woman, or any man, as I am at this moment.
If she forgive me, and bless methough she should
require whole years of trial and proof, before she is
mine, I will be all that she requires. If she say
no
why then,
no
it isand we never meet again. I shall
bear it better than she will. I shall have as much
consolation
in reflecting on the past, taking it
all
together,
as she will. I have less sensibility, am older, have
more experience in these maladies of the heartand
can, immediately, turn the course and tide of my spirit
into new channels.
The letter was sent. I was astonished at Oscar's
tranquility.
He told the truth
. He did not deceive
himself. It was
her
happiness, not
his
, that he sought
to insure, by this sacrifice of his master passion.
Having
done his duty, as a man, as a christian, a lover
he was at rest. Never shall I forget the deep and
sweet composure of his manner, at the time. It was so
unlike himthat it seemed little else than a miraculous
quieting of his soul, by the hand of his Makerpressing
upon its tidesand lulling its currents. There were no
intermittent flashesno inquietude, and restlessness of
movement in him, after this. All was calm, collected,
and observant, as of one, who is at peace with all the
world, without, and prepared for every thing
within
.
The answer came the next morning. I remember
that we were sitting near the breakfast tableas it was
handed to Oscar. There was a sprightly, thoughtless
child of mine, sitting by him,a plump little creature
of unmanageable vivacity.
I declare, said she, I wish that you would break
the seal, at onceand not keep fumbling about it, all day
bless me!why,
I
know that writing, I am sureit
is a Lady'sah!
It is, said Oscar, in a faint voicebut his
countenance
altered not.
And whose, man?out with itnot
the
lady, I
hopewould she whistle you back?
Octavia said he, mildly (and he turned his
mournful eyes upon her, with such effect, that hers
instantly
filled.)
It is
the
ladybut I pray youdo not speak of her
irreverently. If you should ever know her, the
recollection
of it, would make your heart ache.
I was utterly dismayed at his calmnessand just
then, I saw his lip turn to ashy palenessand then a
swarthy crimson pass over his forehead, like a flash.
The next moment, I was aware of the resulthe spoke
to me of some indifferent matter, in a tone of levity,
levitybut with the deep, melancholy eyes of one who is
bleeding to deathinwardly.
Whether it was, that Octavia was really light
headed
at the timeor that she was deceived by Oscar's
manner, I know notbut she pushed the arrow
home.
*19
She has
jilted
you, I'll take my bible oath of it
look at your eyeslook! look!
Jilted
me
, said Oscarcatching her manner, with
surprising felicityYou
cannot
believe it possible!
Upon my word, Sir was the reply
that
was
prettily said! O,if you were only my beaulud
lud!if I would not teach you another song!
I mean, said Oscar, more seriously, I mean,
Black Eyes, that a woman of so little principle as a
jilt
, could never deceive me: Do you not know that.
I!I know of no such thing, I promise youwas'nt
there thatthatconfound her long unintelligible
name.
Do you mean the German Lady, said Oscar.
Pray Sirlet me interrupt you one moment, said
Harold, hereI have met that Lady, I am sureyour
description reminds me of her, most forciblybut her
name, if I remember, was not Octavia.
You have! pray where?
On my passage here.
An explanation followed, and Harold found that
Octavia was the sister of that wild, careless creature,
whom he had been so delighted with, on board the ship.
She
had never seen Oscar, had been to Indiaand was
returning in a government vessel, when he met her. Mr.
Hammond then continued
Yesthe German Lady. You talk about
principle
was'nt
she one of your
principal
ladies? and
did'nt she
jilt
you? But I see you wont confess: So
I'll only tell youDo you know that I am ashamed
of you. You have trifled with another fine girl, here,
I suspect. OscarI am but a child, it is truebut if
you haveif you have jilted
her
,O, I dont mind your
terrible looksif you have, mind nowI will quarrel
with you, on the spot. You told me once that you meant
to marry her. Why hav'nt you married her? Why
dont you, at once? You have been of the same mind
a dozen times beforewithin the last dozen months
too, I vowha! ha! ha!there is the Miss A, and
Miss BCDand the whole alphabet besideand
and you have been dying for the whole of them,
within
a year! O, it
is
a shame cousinIs'nt there a good
dozen, nowcome, tell the truth, and shame thebut
you'll excuse meI dont like to be
personal
. Is'nt
there a round dozen?
Nosaid Oscar, in a voice that was irresistibly
touchingand Black Eyes grew instantly seriousnay,
the tears started again, before he had done. No
not quite so many. But(taking her hand)look at
me, OctaviaI loved this girlI tried to make her
love me; I succeeded. I would have married her, in
timebut, much as she loved meshe has cast me off
forever.
Why? Oscar?
Because her principles were alarmed.
Butthis is thepray how many times have you
been turned off
now
, according to the best of your
recollection
?
I hardly know, said Oscar, smiling, at the strange
creature, whose lips were wet with tears, while her eyes
were laughingbut, to my best belief and
understanding
,
I have seen, lately four or five different women
married
,
each of whom I had thought of for a wife!
Did you go to their weddings? You ought to keep on
good terms, coz,for in time, it might be very
convenient
to dine among themafter a few more years, you
might save your board by it, I dare sayby going the
rounds among your rivals. But can they all give
dinners
?It
is dreadful to be cut out by a poorer man!
Not so dreadful as to be cut out by a
fool
.
Take care, said Octaviayou know not whom
you may offendwe dont put up with every thing. And
so they wouldnt any of them have you?
Not one! not one! said Oscar, in a tone
irresistibly
comick. I wondered at his self-command; and
Octavia
clapped her hands with delight.
But come, cousin, said shehow was it? And
what do you think of it?
I think said he, that Heaven has something
particularly
choice in store for me. And she turned me off
because
For what, pray?your modesty?your mild,
amiable
temper. YourO, I am dying to know for what!
Well, thenthat you may not die in your chairI
(And may live to die in my shoes! why dont you say
said Octavia, interrupting him)I will tell you.
I shant believe you, I tell you now. If you were
really turned off, you would not be so willing to own it.
No! you have abandoned
her
.
By Heaven!
cried Oscar, in a voice that went
through and through me
it is false!
The child was terrified
It is false!
he repeated gravelybut firmly and
distinctly
.
She turned
me
off:and that, too, for a fault
which any other woman would have forgiven. And she
never loved me more truly, I am sure, than when she
tore her heart from mine.
That said, Oscar was another man! Never saw I such
a sudden and complete transformation. He, as by the
action of his own powerful volition alone, seemed all at
once, to have reinvested himself in all his prerogatives.
A few moons, said my child, a few moons more,
dear cousin, and all will be right.
Nonever. I have done all that I shall do. I will
notcannot advance another step. She cannot forget
meI have no fear of that:nor do I believe that she
will soon, if ever, love another.
But she may cease to respect you, cousin, and then
her love will die a natural death, you know.
NoI have no fear of that. For a time, just for
the present, under the agitation and distress of her
disappointment
,
I believe that she may try to crush her
respect
for me. But it will arise againwith tenfold
violence
,
when she comes to compare me with other men
and when she reflects on my honourable and sincere
deportment
toward her, during all our eventful intercourse.
These recollections will come home to her heart, in the
solitude of her chamberat midnight. She cannot shut
them out; and she will find
then
, that she has been too
severe for her own happiness. OctaviaI do not
pretend
to prophecybut that woman's pillow will be wet
with tears yet, I am sure, for having done what her heart
is now, in vain, attempting to assure, her,
was her duty
.
She will see other men. She will become intimate with
themand when she least expects it, they will disappoint
her, more cruelly than I ever did. She will compare us
together,
then
and she will find, perhaps, that I told her
the truth, when I said that she would meet few persons
with more good qualities and fewer bad ones, than I had
whom she could love. Nay moreI am sure that her
respect
for me, will continue to augment, until my dying
day
then
, and then only, perhaps, will her judgment be
sufficiently illuminated to do my devotion justice. Then
when
she
looks up for mercyshe may remember me
when
she
asks to be forgivenshe may remember that I
besought her forgivenessand in vain.
I have determined upon making her
venerate me:
and what I have once determined on, if my Maker spare
my life, and health, I already regard as accomplished.
But I thought that you were never bafflednever
disheartened, coz.
I never was. I am not now. If my principles would
let meif I would permit myself to violate a sacred
promise, or to break up the quiet of a familyone of
the happiest families, too, on this earthI would never
rest now, until, by some means or other, I had that
woman in my power. I should succeed at last; for
desperation
and perseverance never failed. But why do I
not attempt it? Why!Because
her
happiness is dearer
to me, than my own; and because I should wrong her,
my Maker, and myself. Nowe are as far apart now,
as we could be, in separate graves. But enoughyou
understand me. And for
her
sake, dear Octavia, if you
hear this affair misrepresentedor
her
censuredor
spoken
of, as one desertedI entreat you to saythat I love
and respect her yetand shall to my last hourthat she
has deliberately turned me offand that we are apart,
not by
my
consentnot in a quarrelbut in consequence
of her deliberate manifestation of high principle.
This was his last conversation with us, on the subject.
A few days after, he embarked for France, and passed
eighteen months on the continent. He came home
wounded, bearing despatches to his king. He was
altered
yet morewas more melancholybut very kind
and solemn in his manner. In short, his deportment
was princely. All hearts beat, at his approach, with
the desire of making him happier. We never
mentioned
Elvira's name to him; yet he sometimes
pronounced
it, in his thrilling way, but without any
apparent
emotion. At length however, he heard that she
was to be marriednay, we had reason to believe that
he had heard of it abroad, and perhaps,
that
had its
influence in bringing him home, so unexpectedly.
I mentioned it to himbut his countenance
immediately
lighted up. He was constantly occupied in
searching
out the history of his successor; and all went well,
until one day, he arrived at the bottom of a transaction,
which showed that successor to be a consummate
villain
.
Oscar assured himself of the factspursued him
through all his hauntsand found him at lastalonein
his chamber.
Young man, said heI have come to see you on
a matter of some moment. Hear me patiently, I will
not be interrupted. I have just left the grave of
Matilda
are
you shocked?I am glad of it. You are a
better man than I thought you. Her mother is at this
moment standing before the bar of Almighty God!I
left her dying!she is denouncing you,
you
Charles
Ortley
you!
as the murderer and seducer of her child!
What say youare you guilty.
I will not be questioned in this way sir. Who are
you?I will call the watch.
The watch!Boy, boyif you but raise your
voice, so that you can be heard in the next room, I'll
blow your brains out on the spot. Sit stilland hear
me out. I shall not harm you, if you dont provoke
me.
You are a young man of uncommon abilities, I am
toldof insinuating mannersplausibleboldand
frank; specious and eloquent.Damnation!I cannot
talk with thee, thou reptilewhere is that puritythat
exquisite innocence now? with theeshe coupled with
thee, thou miserable wretchpolluted and stained, as
thou artwill
she
ever permit thee to approach herha!
ha! ha!O, no.
Ortley was inconceivably terrifiedthe incoherent
manner of Oscar now, was that of a madman:at first
his collectedness was awfuland Ortley shook like a
criminal about to receive judgment.
Shall I interfere? said Oscar, in a low soliloquy
(all which was related to me, by Ortley himself
afterward
)
No
that
would be mistaken. I may not
be believedmay not be thanked. Where are my
proofs?I have none.
I am satisfied
but how can I
satisfy otherswithout a breach of confidence. Shall I
abandon her? nonoI will not stand by, with my
arms folded, and see a woman that I have loved
bound hand and foot, and offered up, a living sacrifice,
before my eyes.no!now look you, SirYou are
pretending to the hand of ElviraAre you not?
By what right, do you dare to question me, in this
imperious way? said Ortley. I shall not answer you,
Sir.
By
this
right, said Oscar, taking out his pistol,
and levelling it.You
shall
answer me sir.
Sir,by your bearing, I am led to believe that you
are Oscar Salisbury. If you areyou cannot be a
coward
for
I have heard one whose opinion, is not to be
disputedbear testimony to your valour. Do you mean
to murder me?If sofire!I shall not flinchor
if you will hand me another pistolI will amuse you
to your heart's content. Are you an assassin or
not?
Oscar was thunderstruck. He thrust his hand
impatiently
into his pocket, in the hope of finding another
pistolbut in vainnot perceiving the possibility of
such a reception, he had come provided with only
one.
Young man,said hebiting his lips, till the
blood spurted forth
I respect you
We shall meet
again. In the mean timethere is my gloveeither
renounce the hand of Elviraor prepare to meet me
to-morrow
,
at day light.
To-morrow
at daylight
and where you please,
Sir! said Ortley, and with such a sneer, that Oscar
hurled his pistol at his headit missed himOrtley
snatched it up and pursued him as he left the room,
and snapped it at his earbut the cold, awful aspect
of Oscar, as he turned upon him, at the same
moment
,
prevented him from renewing the attempt,
and being of a spirit as generous as Oscar's, he flung
the instrument through the windowand returned
sullenly
to his apartmentwhile Oscar pursued his
way, as if powder and ball were harmless things.
Ortley did not meet himwhy, we never knew,
until
after his death, when we had reason to believe that
Elvira had prevented it. And the next time that they met,
was in my presence. I thought well of Ortley, I
confess
.
Oscar entered the room where we all were, a few
days before the time fixed upon, for Elvira's marriage,
without being announced.
I saw him, just as he arrived opposite Elvira, who
was that moment turning to a window, which had
been thrown open, and was preparing to make a sketch
of the landscape. Whether it was his treador his
suppressed breathingor some mysterious sensation that
announced the presence of Oscar, I know notfor I
am sure that she did not
see
himshe turned deadly pale,
and sunk into the window seat.
Oscar trembledand half extended his hand, with
shut eyes,when Ortley dashed between them, and
caught her, as she was falling. What a profanation, for
Oscar!
For a moment I thoughtfor I knew Oscar's
temper
that
Ortley would never rise from his knees again
for the red blood darkened the whole face of Oscar
and he shivered from head to footas he put out his
hands, evidently with the power of sundering them, if
they had been one body. But, at this instant, Elvira
opened her eyescoloured all overand as if really
detected
in guilt, put away her second lover with an air,
that I never saw upon her forehead before. At that
moment I would rather have been in Oscar's, than in
Ortley's place.
Lady Elvira, said Oscarcalmly, haughtilyI
have come here on a matter of grave import. I am
about to leave England, and do not mean to return.
Can I be favoured with a few moments' conversation
not
alone
I do not ask
that
I would submit to the
presence of whom you willexcept that of
He stoppedand she bowedbut merciful heaven!
never shall I forget the paleness of her mouth
and the settled, despairing, meek expression of her
eyes.
Sir, said she
this
gentleman has a
right
to be
presentI cannot see you alone.
O, no, ElviraI shall leave you. NayI insist
upon it said OrtleyI waive the right to be present
at such an interview.
OscarO, he stood at the sound of these words,
and looked, like what he was, a being for great
occasions
upon
his trial. His manner and voice were
solemn
,
deep, respectful, but nothing more, when he
began
;
but as he proceeded, a tone of tenderness
sometimes
escaped him, that thrilled through and through
memy tears fell before I knew itIt was the musick
of a broken hearttouched by memoryin its holiest
place. He stood, I remember, as you stood this
morning
,
when we were about to departwith his hat under
his arm. His attitude was martial and enforcinglike
one familiar with dominion. Are we alone? said he
free from interruption?for only ten minutes?
He put his hand to his foreheadthe sweat stood
thereand Elvira was like one death struck and
bewildered
the
tears were gathering under her waxen
lidstill they looked to me, like the tears of a corpse. I
felt for
him
, but more for
her
.
The trial had only begun; and, although I was sure
that his manhood would carry him through it, yet I feared
much that, when it was all over, like some subtly
organized
Vol. II. 20
machinery, held together by an invisible,
mysterious
poweras by the pressure of outward matterhe
would fall to pieces of himself, like that, the moment that
the pressure was withdrawn. I expected to see him go
through ityet I looked to the morrow, with equal
certainty
,
that he would be delirious. I knew him, and all
his springs, and self-sustaining, hidden and delicate
powers.
You shall not be interrupted, said Ifor just ten
minutes,laying my watch upon the table, and locking
the doorwhatever may be the consequences.
Proceed, sir, said Elvira, in a faint voice;but the
beautiful dignity of her nature was never so conspicuous.
He felt her calm, majestick supremacy: but he stood
before
it, unreproved, unabashed. His manner, like hers,
was full of simplicity and steadiness. And II felt that
it was sublime.
He was no longer the
lover
. She saw
that
. He was
on some visit of
duty
. She trembled. While I was
looking at her, her thin drapery shivered all overher
cheek flushedand her half shut eyes shone dimly
through her tremulous lids, as with some faint, but
inward
recollection, of a nature too tender and mysterious,
for concealment or avowalshe raised them to himand
their very colour changed, as she did so! It was the
deep, strange dye of passion.
I am come, said Oscar, at last, on a matter of
momentous
concern to
you
lady. To yourself, alone, I
would have preferred to make the disclosure, but it is
more proper, perhaps, that I should not. Will you
permit
me to ask you(his voice faltered)Lady Elvira
with the privilege of one who is not entirely forgotten
as a
friend
who is interested, deeply interested in your
happinessand has confidence in your sincerityand
who, if he ask a rude or abrupt question, must be
charitably
supposed to have a good reason for itin one word,
thenare you not soon to be
married?
Elvira bowed.
I thank you, said Oscar. From my soul I thank
you! This is what I expected from
you
. I am now
satisfied
.
Remember my words. Beware of your intended
husband. Be not precipitate. It is enough, I hope, for
me to say, that he is unworthy of you.
Sir!said Elvira, somewhat haughtily.
Yes, ladyI have not forgotten you, nor myself.
You may not believe me now, but when I am gone, you
will. You have no brother, no friend, to inquire into the
mysteries of that man's character. I have been occupied,
day and night, for three months. I am satisfied, in my
own mind, that he is aNo matterI would not
unnecessarily
wound you, Elvi
lady
,I beg your
pardon
.
Where are your proofs? said I.
I have none to offer. But you know me. My
word ought to be taken. I have satisfied my own heart;
and all I ask is, that you take a little more time, before
youI cannot speak itlady, you must not marry
himyou
shall
not. I will strangle him with my own
hands first!NayI am not to avail
myself
of this
adviceyou shall not be thwarted, in any plan of
happiness
by my presence. I shall depart, in another hour,
for the continent. May I ask when the marriage
was
to
have taken place?
I shall deal plainly, fearlessly with you, sir, said
Elvira. We shall be married, I believe, immediately.
Immediately!
echoed heare you so
impatient
?
Elvira coloured to the eyes;and she arose.
One week, said he
only one week
and I will
never trouble you again.
Impossible, said shethe time is fixed.
Well, then, said Oscar
then
I must strike home.
I cannot help it. The fault is not mine. I would spare
youbut I cannot. I would save youand there is only
one way.
Your lover is a married man
.
It is false!on my life and soul, it is falsethou
evil minded man!answered Elvira.
Ladydare you tell Oscar Salisbury
dare
you
after all that you know of himthat what he says is
false!
I am sorryI had hoped other things of the
woman that I oncebut no matterit is time to end
this conference. You will find, in these papers, the
proof
that Ortley is a married manthat he is no other than
Sir Charles Larence himselfand that the woman whom
he betrayed, is now in a madhouseand the poor
innocent
girl, who last doated on him, in her grave. Yes
with her babe at her bosombroken heartedand
dead.
I looked at Elvira. Was she death-struck? She
betrayed
no emotionno distress. Her utter lifelessness
was followed by a hasty quivering of the lip, and she
raised her delicate hand to her foreheadand parted her
damp hairas if the chills of the sepulchre were upon
it;but still she spoke not:she was pale, deathly pale.
A horse dashed by the window!She turned her head,
and shrieked. The next moment the door was burst
open, and Ortley entered the roombut he encountered
the awful rebuke of Oscar, and fell back.
Oscar turned to meAre the ten minutes expired?
said he. No, sir.
You interrupt us, said he, turning to Ortley
Will you leave the room?
Yesif you will accompany me.
With all my heart! was Oscar's reply;but
Elvira
threw herself between them, exclaimingO, no,
no, in mercy! do not go!
Lady, said OscarI am determinedMr.
Ortley
seems to hesitate
he
has his reasons undoubtedly.
I have a duty to performa religious one. It is
possible
that I have done a fellow creature injustice. I shall
not live longand it would be well to make all the
atonement
in my power, while I can.
I was struck with the solemnity of his tone. There
was no passion in it, and Elvira seemed to regard it as
propitious.
Will you walk on the terrace, gentlemen? said I,
thinking the place far enough off for conversation, and so
near that they would not quarrel there.
Both took their hats. Oscar was the first to the
doorhe turned a moment, and I observed the scornful
writhing of his lip, as his eye passed Ortley; and its
blackening, melancholy, effulgent beauty, when it dwelt
upon Elvira. He hesitatedsomething was at his heart
he looked like one that cannot die in peace, till he has
uttered some secret.
Lady! said he, in a low voiceO, I never shall
forget itit was so unearthly, so inward, so touching!
Ladywe never meet again. I shall haunt you no
more. We have been friends. May we not be so yet?
You have done, and I have done, what, perhaps, we may
wish undoneeven in this worldfarewell(he
extended
his handmajesticallybut tenderly)
for the
last time
farewell!
Who could refuse him? She gave him her hand. He
held it for a moment, and looked her in the faceher
eyes filled
Elvira! Elvira
the past is overmay the
future comfort thee!Heaven bless thee!
He was goneand ere the light shone into the door
again, through which he passedElvira was stretched
upon the floor, utterly insensibleand lifeless.
We heard their steps, a few moments afterward, upon
the terrace. Their conversation was loud, at intervals,
and angry, and continued so long, that Elvira recovered,
and went to her room. I remained at the window, ready
to interfere, if occasion required it, and determined not
to permit the marriage, until I was satisfied respecting
Mr. Ortley: for I knew Oscar too well, to believe that
what he said, was said upon slight evidence. I was
startled by a shriekand the next moment, a violent
scuffle, in the room over my headthe very room that
you now occupy. I ran up, and as I entered, I heard
the words
villain! coward!
and saw Oscar dash Ortley
against the wall, as if he were a childthe collar of
Oscar
was torn openand Ortley held a sword, broken at
the hilt, in his handanother lay upon the floor. All this
I remembered afterward, as the first appearance of the
room:just as I approached, Ortley broke loose from
*20
Oscar, caught up the broken bladewhich Oscar wrenched
from him, at the moment that Elvira rushed between
themunhappy woman!Oscar drove it through and
through the side of Ortleyand wounded Elvira herself
they fell together, and their blood mingled. Ortley
never spoke againhe had barely life enough to press his
hands together, and turn his lips toward Elvira, as he
saw her, with her shut eyes, sinking at his side.
The room was immediately cleared. Oscar stood like
one, suddenly turned to stone. Elvira was taken away
and the body of Ortley, with the blood oozing from his
side, and plashing, thickly and heavily, upon the floor,
drop after dropwas laid upon a table, before which
Oscar
stood, with his hands smoking.
He
was motionless
even his eyes were sohis brow was knittedhis arms
foldedand his tremendous countenance, under his
luxuriant
and disordered hair, was unearthlyhe stood like
some minister of the Most Highcommissioned to do
such deeds. Yeathere he stood!speechless
motionless
as
if the blood and horrour about, were
matters
of little moment to him.
I meant to commit him to custody. I motioned to him
to follow me, therefore, as I left the room. But it was
in vainand, as he then stood, I do believe that no
human
force could have moved himbut at the peril of
annihilation. I left him, therefore, doubly locking the
doorand barring every chance of communication
leaving him, face to face, with the dead bodythe floor
stained with blood, that stood upon it in puddlesthe
light scarlet foam whizzing upon the dark surface(as if
blood that was
so
spilt, could not stagnate,) long after it
had settledand the white curtains bleeding, drop after
drop, from the first spurting of the woundwhen Oscar
drew out the broken sword, as Ortley fell.
As I left the room, Oscar took hold of the dead man's
hand, and placed his own palm, bloody as it was, upon
the ghastly eyes before him, as if they were alive
Never shall I forget the expression of his face, as he did
so. It was awful indeed!Yet he did it calmlyvery
calmly.
All that night, he remained alone, in the pale starlight,
sitting by the side of the body, and watching the
horrible
eyesswollen, and blood shot. Not a step was
heard in the apartmentnot a groan. Toward
morning
,
however, I was told that he had struck a light, and
was writing.
In the morning, he was gonehow, or by what means,
we know not. We found the door fastened within, and
I ordered it to be burst openHarold!imagine for
yourself, my horroura lamp was glimmering feebly
from the mantlepieceand we saw a naked man, sitting
upon a white sheetit was soaked through with blood!
and a part of it, stiffened and compressed, adhered to
his side, as if it had been thrust into the woundthe
eyes were open and staringthe lids imprinted with the
touch of bloody fingersand the palepale lipsdrawn
upward from the bare teethOh!!it was horrible.
My brain whirledand it was long before I could go
near enough, to become assured that it was not Oscar
himself! But when I found what it wasthe dead body
so awfully arrayed, as in mockerythen the dreadful
thought flashed itself, all at once, over my brainmy
blood frozemy bones rattledmy very heart seemed
to shrivel and wither, as I looked. I was then sure that
Oscar had gone mad under the trialthat I had
subjected
him to.I!
Was Oscar a shedder of blood? Then what was I?
Had I not wrecked his noble brainforever and ever!
O, Harold, the desolation, the convulsive blackness that
descended upon me, as I thought of it, is
inconceivable
.
I felt as if I were the murdererI alone.
We found these few lines upon the table. Here Mr.
Hammond took out a paper, and read as follows: I
am beyond your reachthe commission is executed. I
have set in judgment upon him. Take himbury him
his soul is now shivering over the green turf, where she
the betrayedthe innocentthe beautifulthe dead
is mouldering. This is written in bloodhis blood
his
bloodhis heart's blood.
They, the innocent, are at rest. The avenger of
blood hath been abroadgo to his presence chamber
there you will find his victim. Give him to the surgeons
the wolvesthe worms. I care not.
Pursue meit is in vain. I go, commissioned by God,
to lay waste and desolate the habitations of men. I have
touched the pestilence, and it awokeI have summoned
the strong wind, and the earthquakeand lo! they are
on the wing!
Is she dead? My hand erred. Poor ElviraI
could weep for
thee
. Thou wast very dear to me. It
was
he
only, that I was to bid to the carousal of the
nightthe festival of the charnel house:not
she
. If
she comeshe comes an unbidden guest. But I will be
by herno skulls shall mock at
her
no bony hand
profane
her lipsno socketless eyesdamnation!the
king of terrours himself shall not approach her! Bid
her be tranquil. I will be there. Stayshe is here
Well. All is settled now. I am ready. She
has left me for a few hours. She does not complain
poor, dear Elvirahow could I help weeping!No, she
says she does not,
cannot
, for she fell by my hand. Was
there ever such love! such consummate love and
tenderness
!
I have watched by the dead body. I was troubled, for
a season, with its ghastly and distorted lineaments. I was
even in doubt, for a moment, whether I was really the
minister of God. I asked myself if he were guilty?
An angelfull of terrible beauty, stood by mearise!
said he, to the dead bodyarise! It obeyed. Unveil
thyself! heart and soul! Stand there naked before me!
The corpse arose, and the clothes fell from it, into dust
and ashes, as you will perceive. I read his heartand
I have left it, that you may read it! Read it, and be
wise.
Did you hear the thunder? Did you tremble? I did
notnothough my hands were smoking with the
sacrifice
no!
Not even when I saw a multitude of pale,
naked menbelike that had been murderedmoving
about in the skyconstantly emerging and disappearing,
in the darknesslike shapes seen in a deep, deep cavern.
No!Not even when I heard the voice of Elvira in the
wind, calling out to me, as she passed. No!not when
the blue lightning hissed by meand I saw the room
swimming in bloodand the whole air was a hot steam
and all about me were shattered hearts, and rivetted
eyesand dishevelled hair. Nay,not even when a
horrible portent thundered by meand the sky, for a
moment, turned redand a great steed dashed over the
firmamentin smoke and flamewith a rider, naked and
shriekingurging him onwardwho was the rider?it
was myself!The reins were loose in his handsand
the blood fell like rain from the flanks of his charger.
But why should I tremble?Am I not the minister of
the Almighty?Am I not!
The dagger I leave upon the table. I pray you, let
it abide there. You had better not touch it. He that
touches, it shall die by it.
It is written
. Bye and bye,
when you least expect me, I shall return.
Such was his letter. It confirmed all my
apprehensions
.
We scoured the whole country, but could hear
no tidings whatever of him. At last he returnedand
his presence was like a clap of thunder. We had not the
strength to lay hands upon him. He went and came,
unmolested
,
like some angel of darkness. But the country,
far and near, was agitated. By some strange fortune he
continued ignorant of Elvira's fate; and, I believe,
thought her dead, to the last hour of his life.
A thousand marvellous stories were invented,
circulated
and believed. Oscar surrendered himself to
justice
,
in silence. He spake notmoved notwhen they
ironed himbut there was an appalling calmness in his
manner, that awed his oppressor.
I went to see him in his dungeon. Do you know,
said he to me, after a silence of a full hourdo you
know that
there
(pointing to a dark part of his cell)
there!
is the dead body of Ortley?
I shuddered.
It is near bed time, said he, in the same tone,
without lifting his eyesHe sleeps with
me
to night.
To-morrow night I sleep with himHe is a cold
bed fellow. Did you ever see him after that night?
Ortley!Ortley!come out into the light!
come!
I trembled in every jointhad the grave opened at my
feet, I should not have been more terrifiednay, while
I looked into the darkness, I almost fancied that I could
see himOrtleyhimself, sitting as I last saw him,
upon a white sheet.
There! continued OscarIs he much altered?
That is just as he appeared to me, the first night. Just
so paleso deadly paleOrtley! this is the
last
night
there, therethat is near enough. There is
something
,
is'nt there, in his dark matted hair, and wild eye
whatgone!gone, so soon!
* * * No matterHe arose
last night,it was the third timehe was sitting there,
just where
you
areha! ha! ha!what! are
you
alarmed!poor foolhe cannot touch
you
. Do you
see that wallthere, where I am pointing? He walked
directly through itand laid himself down therejust
where you saw him when you came in. Ha!what
are you crying about?are you a relation of Ortley's?
his father perhapswell, well, I am sorry for it. He
was a murderer, he stabbed a manwho?why Oscar
Salisburyhear him! the bloody wretchhe is laughing
at us!ha! ha! ha!Do you know his laugh?
That's
he.
And so, and so-I thought that he was alone, and I went
to him. I was mistaken, there was a woman with him.
The blood was crusted upon his sidehis grave clothes
were black with itshe leant over him, and wept. The
blood flowed againand bubbled all round the room,
was that right?I have protested against it. I
called
to the officerI pointed them outI spoke to him
of the impropriety of such thingsthreatened himand
demanded another room. I will not be disturbed in
this way. I cannot sleep. But he is bribedI am sure
of it. Is'nt it shameful:every nightif it were one
night, or two, I should not mind it, but
every night
, to
have him let inand then he comes, and lies down by
meand he is
so
coldindeed it is very disagreeable.
I wish that you would interfer. It would be very kind in
you. They wo'nt heed meand a little mercy of this
sort, that I may have one night's sleepbefore I die. But
he won't lie downif he would only lie down, I could
bear it betterbut there he comes, andall naked as he
iscold as death, toohe sits up in the bed all night
long, and looks me, all the while, in the face.Indeed it
is hard to bear.
Whatha!Begone Sir!this is a publick prison
this is my apartment!I will not be intruded upon
!what, were you not decently buried?There's
money
for youbegone!
It was midnight, black, thick midnight, when he
first came inI awoke and found him sitting by my
sideit was very darkbutand I shut my eyesbut
I could see him nevertheless, through my eyelids and
fingers. Naydont go yet. Elvira will be here at
twelve. Did you ever see Elvira, she is very
beautiful
paleremarkably
palebut oh, such eyes!
who is that sobbing!OrtleyElviraappear!
Hark!that is sheI know her step.
I was overcomeI fell upon my face. He lifted me
upappeared bewildered, and the first thing that I
recollect
was, that his face was close to mine, and he was
feeling it, with an air of strange perplexity. Begone,
said he, at lastbegone!(in a voice of thunder)
I know you! You are Oscar. Begone this instant, or I
will tear thee limb from limbBegone!
What could I do? I left him. His trial came on.
He was arraigned in spite of all my interference, and
his madness, his incurable madness was mistaken for
melancholy. He pleaded guilty, in a gentle, firm
voice. And he would have been condemned; an
everlasting
reproach to our laws, and to humanity,
notwithstanding
my testimony, for I was the only one that had
seen him at night, and he was rational at all other hours,
and on all other subjects but these.
The jury found him guilty. He made no defence.
He was brought up for judgment. We were awestruck
by the dark sublimity of his countenance.
Stop! said he, to the judge, with an air of
authority
,
as he began to sentence him. Stop! my time is
not yet come. I retract my plea. The charge is
murder
.
I deny it. I am not guilty. I am willing to die, I
desire to die. I care not how, nor whenthe sooner
the betterfor I am weary of living. ButI will not
die as a murderer. I slew himI confess thatbut
why?at the command of the Everlasting God!You
are terrifiedyou quake upon the benchI do not
wonder
at itlight your candlesbar your doorsand sit
here till midnight, if you dare.
He shall stand before
you
he!and bear testimony to my innocence. Look
at me!see these handsthese fettersif I but touch
them, they crumble and dissolve in vapourthere!
where are they now!do you doubt me now! Am I
not free now! Who hath done this?the Almighty.
Man!man!I tell thee, that there are other hands
at work in the darkness. Woe to thee, and to all that
lay theirs upon me or mine!
What could be done? He was silent. And the court
remanded him to prison; but not to the same; their
humanity
appointed to him a more light and pleasant
apartment. Yet, he grew worsedailyhourly worse.
At last, a fire broke out in the prison, andhe saved a
woman's life, instinctivelyand the torch of reason
touched
by humanity, blazed up all at once, with a sudden and
beautiful lustre. I saw himhe had been reduced to a
skeleton. The sunken eye, the bony cheek and forehead
the blueish lipthe hoarse, unusual, inarticulate
utterance
,
and the difficult breathing, with the foam that
collected
on his lips, which he had not the strength to wipe
off, all showed that he was near his dissolution. I
took his handand, fearful of distressing him, was silent.
Hammond said heI am glad that you are come. I
am goinggoing, all dead here! (he added, raising his
feeble
hands, with a patient, slow motion, singularly
expressive
of a mortal decay about the region of vitalityand
passing them over his chest)
all dead
all dead
here!
I wondered at his composure. In time, however, the
weakest become familiar with death; and learn to
contemplate
his tremendous features unmoved. And why
not? The strongit is
they
, who are likely to die hard.
They know it. Their thread of life is
broken
that of
the weak
untwisted
. But the weak are not such men as
Oscarso impatientsoaringheroick and terrible
no!and I wondered at his meekness, tranquillity, and
steadiness. What was the cause?
He had made his peace
with God!
His eyes showed it;his soullike a
forgiven
spiritpurified and weeping, was in them. He
was willing to diewilling to livehad no hopeand
believed that every breathing of his heart was numbered.
I was inexpressibly affected. I wept and prayed
with him, midnight came. He desired to be raised in
the bedhe was suffocatingand the thick phlegm upon
his mouth was only to be wiped away by the hand of
another
.
He had not the strength to lift his own. I heard
a sudden, increasing, dry, convulsive rattleand then all
was silent, and his eyes were fixed.
Judge of my feelingI was alone. It was
midnight
.
At this instant, thought Ihis spirit is standing
before the judgment seat, and lo, I am the only witness.
But now, he was hereand
now
where is he?
HaroldI have been in many trying situations
many of peril and death; but never was I so completely
overcome, so utterly dismayed and prostrate, as at that
moment; nothing could have affected me more, I am sure
except my own arraignment, at the last day.
Vol. II. 21
I thought that it was all over with himand was just
leaving the room, when I fancied that I saw a slight
motion of the linen, over his chest, in the pale light. I
was not deceived. He was in a trance. He recovered
yeaafter all this, he recovered. He came abroad
demanded another trialand was triumphantly acquitted.
The Court was crouded beyond example. His
deportment
was noble and affecting. His voice was thrilling
and solemn. There was not a dry eye about him. His
alone, was sadcalmand deeply beautiful.
`I thank the court,' said he. `Gentlemen of the jury,
I thank you. To my counsel too, I owe much
acknowledgment
,
and to the audience for their sympathy and
indulgence
.
But, I am not satisfied. The verdict was
wrongthe evidence wrong. I was the aggressor; not a
murderer, it is very true, but the first blow was mine.
He attempted to stab me. Such is the fact. I deserved
some punishmentperhaps a worse than that appointed
for manslaughter. I have received itand withstood it.
My lords, I have been closeted every nightin
imagination
with
the dead bodybut I am getting
unintelligible
'
The Court shed tears
The attention of Harold was here suddenly arrested
by a shot, which wounded Mr. Hammond's horseand,
the next moment, three ruffians dashed through the hedge,
and planted themselves before Haroldbut Mr.
Hammond
,
carried off by the wounded horse, which he was
unable to arrest, was instantly beyond their reach. A
blunderbuss was levelled, and discharged after himbut
Harold had the satisfaction to see that it was without any
effect
The foremost presented a pistolDeliver! Sir,
said he, and the others prepared to second his demand.
Stop Sir! said Harold: and put his hand very
leisurely
into his bosom. One of the robbers saw the
motion
,
and would have brought him down with his pistol
on the spot, had not his companion, struck with the
singular
steadiness of Harold's youthful countenance,
interfered
at the instant.
Young men, he continued, your object is money.
I have but a trifle, and before I give up that, I will state
the case to you. It may save bloodshed. All my money
is ten guineas. Now, I will not part with one sixpence in
this way, while there is breath in my body.
Damn himdown with him! answered one.
No, no!Tomno, no, he's gamegive him fair
play, said another.
Harold continued, unmovedready to dismount, at a
moment's warning, and preparing for a mortal conflict, as
he went onIf you rob me, you must kill meand
I will promise you to take, at least, one of your number
along with medo your best. In that case you will lose
one life, and commit a murder for ten guineas. Can
you afford to do this! Are you prepared to take your
chance?
I am
. BesidesI ought to inform you, that
if you kill me, you will as surely be hanged, all that
survive
,
as you are now standing
there;
and if you attempt
it, and do
not
kill me, I will never restnever!till I
have brought you to justice.
As he uttered these wordshe stood suddenly upon
his feet, before them! with a pistol in his handand his
horse was thundering along the high road.
The fellow with the pistol was so startled, that it went
off on the spot, without injury or aim.
Harold smiled. You see, said he, in what an
unprofitable affair you have engaged. My horse will
alarm the whole country the way that he has goneand my
friend, the other way. Before you could bless yourself,
you perceive, that I could have stretched one of you at
my feetand then, I am pretty sure, that I should have
given a good account of one, if not of both the other
two, before mortal aid could interfere. But I forebore.
You are all youngall!and I pity you. What say
you? Will you have the money?
Go to the devil with your money!said the first
ruffian, laughing in spite of himself, and turning to go
off.
Give him a slug, Bobone, Bobjust to remember
you bysaid the other.
Curse me, if I do, said Bobhe's no chicken. I
like himthough, blast my eyes, if I feel safe with him
let us be off.
My honest fellowsaid the first, amazed at
Harold's
composure, you must be damned poorwill a
few guineas be of any service to you? By your
appearance
,
you seem to be a
gentleman
but then, damme,
gentlemen
don't play such games. Are you mada little
or may beI beg your pardonmay be, you follow the
road yourself? Give us your hand.
Begone! said Haroldsternly.
I'll tell you what it is, Mr.said the robber, (
leisurely
knocking the powder into the pan, and looking at
the flint)you had better give fair words. My notion
is, that you are a play actoror a little damaged in the
upper storywhat say you?but if I thought that you
really knew better, and meant to be saucycurse me, if
I would'nt slash your weazen for you, before you could
say Jack Robinson.
Doif you are disposed,was Harold's reply.
Come along! cried his companiondamn the
fellow
he
is some poetcome alongand leave him to
his rehearsals!
The man staredBy the Lord, you are right, Billy,
said he, I never thought of
that!
So, sirMr. Poet
I wish you a pleasant walk, after your horseGood
morning
,
sir!
Harold could not, for his soul, help laughing: there
was somewhat so irresistibly droll in the profound bow,
with which the fellow, after staring at him for a second
or two, took his leave.
They disappeared across the country, and Harold
pursued
his way with his pistol in his hand, till, in the mere
listlessness of his mind, he happened to look into the pan
there was no powder in it! He examined itit was
not loaded! Gracious Heaven! What an escape! Thus
is it with genuine courage. The stoutest heart is
intimidated
,
when, in its guilt, it encounters a man in the full
possession of his faculties.
He was aroused from the revery, by hearing the hoofs
of a horse, approaching at full speed. He looked about,
and had the pleasure of seeing his own, with a peasant
upon it, armed;as he approached, he presented his
pistol to Haroldand it was some minutes before each
was satisfied that the other was not a highwayman. At
last, however, they succeeded in explaining themselves;
and Harold mounted, and continued walking on until
they heard the quick report of fire arms, at a great
distance
,
in the direction which Mr. Hammond had
fled
in,
as Harold thought, with much joy, yet some little
indignation
,
for he did not then know that the horse was
wounded. Harold threw away his pistolcaught that
of the farmer out of his hand, and put his horse to full
speed, telling him to follow as he could. At the very
next turn he encountered a carriage and fourbut one
of the leaders was wounded, and fell just as Harold
appeared
:he
heard a continual shriek, and seeing a man,
at a distance, engaged with two others, he rode to his
relief
.
As he approached, he was recognisedand all
hands turned upon himhe brought one man downbut
his horse felland had he not caught the sword that was
raised to thrust him through, while he was entangled in
the stirrupsand the ruffian was afraid to approach too
near the struggling horsewith his hand, at the expense
of being cut through sinew and bone almosthe would
have been killed upon the spot. But the sword once in
his hand, even by the blade, it was
his
forever!he tore
it away, and giving the wretches no time to load their
pistols, he dealt about his blows, with such effect, that he
stretched a second at his feet, in the twinkling of an eye
the other flung his broken rapier at Harold's head,
with a hearty curse, for a
poet
, and scampered over the
fields. Harold attempted to pursue himbut he was too
weakhe was woundedand yet he had never felt the
*21
weapon, nor knew when or how it happened. He fainted
and when he came to his senses, all traces of the past
were obliterated. He was in a strange roomand the
voice of a child only was heard, whispering its musick,
in a tone that thrilled into his heart, on the far side of the
room.
Harold drew the curtains, gently, and just so as to peep
through. Where was he? The room was beautifully
neatdecorated with exquisite little paintings, and full
of fragrant plants, and sweet flowers.
Another! and another! said some female in a
faint voiceas if in prayer. He looked out through the
curtains, in another direction, and saw Caroline, with her
hands raisedand her fine eyes, full of solemnity and
tenderness, lifted with a disconsolate, and yet touching,
expression to Heaven. Yes! there she was, in all her
innocence and loveliness! She arose, and he fell back
upon his pillow, and shut his eyes, willing to enjoy a
little
longer, the luxury of his situation.
She approacheddrew the curtainand leaned over
him. He felt her gentle breath stirring his hairher
patient
,
soft, delicate hand, touching, quietly and tenderly,
along his brow
so
caressingly
so
affectionatelythat
he caught it to his lips!
Caroline almost shriekedbut she had just command
enough of herself to suppress the cry, and a sweet,
terrified
murmur of mingled agitation and delight, only
escaped
her. She saw his eyeshe opened them with a
smile
Dear,
dear
Carolinesaid Harold; and Caroline,
already overcome with her emotion, then lost all
command
of herself, and fell upon his bosom, and sobbed
aloud.
This was the second time that Harold had been called
upon, for all that was touching and thankful in his
nature
the
second time, that his hot forehead, and dry
lips had been ministered to, by that creature, so
tenderly
fashioned and fitted by our Father, in mercy to our
infirmities
,
for
our
consolation in a cold world:the second
time, that gentle eyes and affectionate lips had been
near him, when he was alone;so patiently waiting on
himso affectionately soothing him;that the very
touch of her dear hand was a relief to his aching temples
and her tears, when they fell, like the dew from an
angel's
wing upon a sore and agitated heart, were
soothing
and healthful to him. O woman!it is only at
that
hour, when the cold world rolls away from uswhen
the golden pageantry of life wanes and darkenswhen
a desolation is about us, and they that have loved us
love us no morewhen Sorrow is at her incantations,
and Melancholy is already chisselling an epitaph for our
broken heartO, it is only
then
that woman is truly
known!
That
is her hour of lightwhen all the world
is dark to us.
That
is her time of gentleness and tears,
when we are forgotten by all else, and the rude sound
of the world's hilarity breaks through the shut curtains
of our bedand rings about our darkened chamber, like
unhallowed mockery. It is
then
, that her soft foot falls,
like the innocent tread of a naked angel; it is then
that all sound from her lipsand all motion from her
beauty, is melody, tender, mournful and weepingO
woman! rather than not know and experience thy
consummate
value, in the tender offices of the sick chamber,
rather than never see thee, about it, like a spirit on
tiptoe, bearing health in thy delicate hand, and
compassion
in thy pure eyesI would consent to inhabit and
dwell, forever and ever, within the chambers of pestilence
and death! I would, indeed!
And do you know me, Haroldmy brother!
Know
thee
love!O Caroline! wert thou near my ashes, they
would testify their sensibility to thy presence, I am
sure!wert thou to pass near them, though the green
turf oppessed me, there would be a commotion beneath
it!In my dreaming dear, my heart hath kept time to
thy voice, involuntarily, like our fingers to sweet
musick
!
Know thee
my sisterO yesthy timid mouth has
been near me, I am sure, during my delirium, for I feel
pleasantly about the lips and eyelidsthy bashful
cherishing
I have feltand thy lovely arm hath embraced
me, I am sure, Caroline, while all my senses, but the
sense of
thee
, had departed, for I feel happy, so happy,
that I cannot express what I feel, about the region of the
heart.
Know thee
, Caroline!
thee!
whom to hold
affinity
with, is to be nearer heaven
thee!
my blood's
idol!
thee!
for whom any martyrdom were sweet!O
Caroline, I have felt thy presence insinuating itself like
a subtle fluid, while I slept, into all the unlighted,
unheathful
,
and unholy chambers of my soullike some
blessed spirit, that bears light, and air, and incense, in
her look and breathingbefore whom Impurity veils her
formand Voluptuousness prostrates herself,
supplicating
to be annihilated or redeemed, as she passes by the
place of their dwelling.
Caroline wept with delight and tendernessand was
only recalled to herself, by a little creature, that plucked
impatiently at her frock
Mamma is come! said the child, in accents, that sent
the blood, with the velocity of light, through all his
arteries
.
It was Leopold!
My child! Harold faintly articulated, as he put out
his then wasted arms to embrace him
my child!
Leopold leaped into themand Harold, hearing some
movement near, had just turned his eyes in the direction,
when the boy whispered softly in his earYou are
Mr. Salisbury now, you knowI must not call you
pa
no moreno moreI dont love itdo you?I wish
she would let me call you pa.
A presence that he knew, here put forth her hand, with
a melancholy smile and sore confusionthe deep
concern
of her eyes trembling, in their depth, as to arrest the
prattlerbut he eluded her touch, and crept under the
bed clothes, laughing aloudand talking as fast as he
could talk, all the while.
Caroline was inconceivably distressedwas it that she
had any, the slightest suspicion of the fact?It were
difficult to tell. But her agitation became extreme, when
Leopold, peeped out, and promised to be a good boy,
only on one conditionthat he might call papahis
pa
and why not? said he, he is my panurse says
he isand Miss Caroline says I am his picture
is
I
his
picture
, ma?
Harold was obliged to interfere
Leopold!
said
he, in a voice, at which, the moment it was heard, the
little fellow looked up in his face a moment, with eyes
running over, to see if he were in earnestand then
crept to his bosomburried his little face, and sobbed
aloud.
But nothing would doHe was not to be trusted;
and the amazing resemblance between Harold and the
boy was becoming every day more and more alarming.
Lady Elvira was like a guilty thing, and had, till the
sickness
of Harold was extreme, kept the child
away
, and
only then took him with her, as she came herself to
reside
with Caroline, because she apprehended no
indiscretion
in Harold, and was known to be so passionately
fond of the boy, that if she left him behind, it would
appear more extraordinary than if she brought him.
Leopold was taken away. It was fatal to himhe
pined and wastedand when Harold next saw him, he
was so pale, so thin, and his innocent eyes were so
hidden
,
under their meek waxen lids, that he shuddered, and
the tears fell upon his little mouth, while he clung to
him, as if his heart were breaking.
He was upon his mother's lapand as Harold leaned
down to embrace him, his cheek touched her hand.
The touch was like electricity: he lifted his eyes, and
saw hers so deeply, passionately, darkly expressive of
her thought, that he blushed and trembled like a young
girl. But Leopold was deadly sickhe had some
symptoms
of a disorder that they knew too little of, to be
alarmed aboutthe
croup
.
The boy was well, and in remarkable spirits, save that
he looked thin and pale, at sunset the evening before;
but he was
now
so altered for the worse, that they were
terrified. Harold loved the boydoated on it. Elvira
too, she was distractedly fond of itbut, their suffering
was not yet at an end. Leopold grew worsehis mother
could no longer support his weight, and he was put to
bed. Harold approached, softly, a moment after, that
he might be near the helpless, endearing little creature;
but was shocked at the change in his countenance. Was
it death struck!Merciful Heaven!can a cold be
so perilous? And now came the bitterest thoughtthe
physician was again sent forDid you give him the
powders? said he, anxiously, as his eye fell upon the
child's faceNosirsaid Elvira, watching him,
while he removed the lamp, with a trembling hand, as if to
see if the death-like hue were not owing to thatwe did
not think it necessarywe were unwilling to distress him
What! cried the good man, in evident terrourwhile
his eyes grew dimYou have
not
Lady(his voice
falteredhe could not proceed)and Elvira's attention
was called off to the child, who exclaimed in a broken
voice, while his little blue lips trembled with a faint
smile
O, ma!my ma!I
do
love you, ma!I can't see
you, ma!where are you?O, how dark it grows.
This was too much. The appearance of the physician
his tearshis voiceall was explained nowit flashed like
a thunderbolt upon her brainshe fell upon her knees and
wrung her handsO, my God! my God! I have
murdered
my child!O save him, save him!Merciful
God!and swooned upon the spot.
Harold staggered to her assistancebut he had only
the strength to raise her drooping head upon his knees
while the hoarse breathing of the child, became every
moment, more distressingly audible. But why prolong
the detail!The babe died!died before his eyes!
Ye that have had childrenye that have seen the dear,
helpless, beautiful expression of their dying eyesto
your memory I leave it!I cannot go onI cannot!
His sweet, violet pupils, dewy and dim
there
they are
yet!O, my child! my child!
CHAPTER VII.
Men
are most anxious to appear what they are not.
We care little for what we have; but we are covetous of
all else. Thus, we learn to affect that which we are most
desirous of being: and affectation soon becomes habit.
But when the trick is discovered, ashamed of our own
folly, we affect to be unaffected, and live and die in a
state of perpetual vascillation, between what we are, and
what we would be.
Thus a man of sound judgment, without one grain of
imagination, shall dabble in poetry, to the neglect of all
useful science. And the man of imagination, without
one ounce of practical good sense, will be breaking his
neck after the mathematicks. A chicken-spirited, mild,
amiable man, will sometimes affect to be very implacable
and bloodthirsty; while he who really
hath
a devil, will
affect kindness and benignity. An impudent dog will
remember, and dwell with emphasis, upon the proof of
his modesty and backwardness; while he who is really
bashful, is forever telling you how fearless and saucy he
has been, on this and that occasion. Thus, our whole
lives are spent; and it is a good rule of judgment to set
that man down for not being, at heart, that which he
appears
most desirous of being thought.
So with our heroWhile he was wild, as the unharnessed
colt of the desert, he was perpetually struggling with
himself
,
and concealing it. But now, as his disposition
softened
,
and newer, milder and more beautiful visions passed
before him; his chief occupation lay, in persuading
himself
,
(and others indirectly,) that he was the same
unbroken
,
irresistible and triumphant savage that he had once
been. Nay, he succeeded in vindicating himself,
to
himself
,
from the alleged degeneracy that his conscience
sometimes charged him with.
I have come, said Mr. Hammond, entering the room
one morning briskly, to inform you that you can now
write directly to M. De Vandreuil, at Parishe is
there!
Harold turned paleA French nobleman, the lover of
the lady whom you so gallantly protected the other day
(alluding to the robbery) is going to France immediately
and will undertake to deliver any thing you please, into
the hands of the Count himself.
God bless him for it!said Harold, shivering from
head to footIt is
so
longGracious HeavenI
know not what to think or sayyesI will write.
His eyes filledhe embraced Mr. Hammondhe
wrung his handhe appeared for a moment delirious
to the utter astonishment of the good manwith the
effect
of this intelligence.
He ran to his chamberfell upon his kneessoftened
with recent calamitythe tenderness of the past rose like
a fountain in his heart, and bubbled through all his veins.
He saw the green leaves dancing again over his head
and the transparent water rushing away, beneath his feet,
and the beautiful dark, shady wilderness all about him.
Oh, Loena! Loena! he criedthou unspeakably
dear one!I shallI shall!I shall be near thee
again!hear the wild musick of thy voiceand then
Oh lay me in my grave! I shall have lived long enough!
VOL. II. 22
After pacing his chamber till his agitation had, in a
great measure, subsided, he began a letter to
De
Vaudreuil
,
in the following words:
My Benefactor!
I have this moment heard that you are in Paris;
and am all in a trepidation with the thought. What
shall I say to you,
you
who were my first and best friend?
Shall I come and throw myself into your arms, at
once, and there tell you, my father! for so you have
commanded me to call you, all that has happened to
me? But I cannotthere is a reasonor at least, I
hope that there
is
, and believe that there
is
if I did not,
I should go distractedwhich forbids my visiting you,
before I hear from you. You have, undoubtedly,
heard of my capture; and you have had the charity, I
am sure, to believe that I have written you a hundred
letters since. But they could not reach youthey
have all gone to Quebec, as they could, by cartels, &c.
&c.
But that you may know all that I have experienced,
and who I am, and what, I am about to repeat the
whole story again.'
(Here he recapitulated all his adventuresand then
continued as follows:)
`Are you not gratified, my dear count, my father!
Yes, you are. I see your eyes glisten as you read it.
Ifthere is a dreadful subject for me to approach
can you not imagine all that I would say? Ifoh,
no, I cannot suppose such a thingshe
is
alive, she
is!
I am sure of itGive her the enclosed
do
, my
dear count.
`Can she write yet?poor Loeno, I cannot write
her name. Remember me, affectionately, to my lady
and the whole familytell them that a son and a
brother
,
who is not entirely unworthy of their love, will
never forget them. Let them use
their
influence that
she
may write me. I so long to look upon some of
her
thought, traced with a beating heartbut I cannot go
on
`If she cannot write yetwhy then, I hardly know
what to say about the enclosed. I would not have any
mortal eye see it except hersno, not even yours. So
whether she can read it or not,
now
, give it to her,
and let her keep it until she can. In that case, you
will not forget to inform me of every thing. Heaven
bless you! I would write more, but I cannot, for I
remember that the sooner
this
is on its way, the sooner
I shall receive an answer.'
The enclosure was expressed in this manner:
`Dear Loena(but these words were badly erased,
and the letter began again)`I would not again
intrude
upon your presence, dearest of women, if I did
not feel that, with all my faults, I am not so utterly
unworthy of you, as you have believed. Loena,
dear
Loena, have you forgotten me? If you havethere is
only one course left for both of usit is for you to tell
me so, and for me to tear your image from my heart.
I have loved you, Loena, God knows how passionately,
how truly; and I love you yetYea, I shall love you
forever and ever. Can you return my love? I ask you
a plain question. This is no matter for circumlocution.
Will you, can you, forgive and bless me? If yes
behold me at your side, ready to prove, by a life of
sincerity and devotion, how unspeakably dear you are
to me. If you cannot, I pray you, do not conceal it,
do not deceive yourself, or me. It is the last favour
that I may ever ask of you, and I ask it by the memory
of our former loveby our agony and tears, that you
would deal plainly with me. Loena, I am entitled to
that
, at least. I know not what new laws of etiquette
or decorum you may have learned, since we last parted
but, be they what they may, yours
was
a heart that
needed them not; and I do trust that you will,
whatever
they may say, inform me in so many wordsthat I
have nothing to hope
or, that
I am forgiven
.
`In the meantime, farewell! Do not rashly resolve.
I am better, and wiser, than when we parted, and, I
do believe, am capable of making you happy. My
prayer
is that
you
may believe it. If you do, we shall be
happy; but if you do not, it will be your duty to say
that you do not, plainly and directly, for by your
silence
,
I shall infer that you have forgiven me. If your
letter be
no
, I shall never trouble you more. Once
more farewell! I tremble in writing the word; it
may be that I shall never write it again; I hope so,
and yet, I cannot lay down my pen. Yet it must be,
and I entreat you to remember that
this decision of
yours will be final
.
Farewell! farewell!'
This letter completed, Harold descended to the
parlour, where he found the young nobleman himself;
his features were uncommonly expressive and
handsome
,
and Harold could not forbear disclosing the
ground of his anxiety. The Frenchman embraced
him, and, with tears of thankfulness, poured out his
gratitude to Harold, for having saved the life of his
dear, dear miss Anna. It was some minutes before
Harold was able to comprehend the meaning of these
transports; but, at length, with the assistance of Mr.
Hammond, he discovered that he had, in the late affair
with the highwaymen, probably, saved the life of a
very beautiful and intelligent girl, whose friends were
ready to die for him in return. This young
Frenchman
,
with that readiness, so characteristick of his age
and country, seemed instantly to comprehend the
subject
of Harold's distress; and after half an hour's
conversation
,
privately with him, departed.
That day three weeks he returned. And the sum of
his information was thisthat De Vaudreuil was dead
his family scatteredsome dead, some married,
some in Quebec, he having encountered the displeasure
of his sovereign, and fallen in a duel at the same time.
Of Loena he could only learn that, a young, and
singularly
beautiful Spanish girl, or Italian as she was
thought that had been educated in the count's family,
had run off with a young officer named
`Lightning blast him!' cried Harold, when he heard
his name, `by the living God, I will never rest till I
find him! I will hunt him to the ends of the earth!
See if he escape me again! Why did I spare him
before
?
Why not pursue him, and rend his heart out?
This comes of my clemency. And sheshe the
faithless
!
the wanton! O, Loena, Loenafarewell! farewell
forever. I could have borne all but thisto find thee
worthless
thee!
where I had given up my heart
but farewell! farewell!I am blinded, and sick with
the thought
thee!
'
The young Frenchman respected his transports, and
left him. And Harold, poor Harold, was desolate,
heartbroken indeed. This
was
a calamity, so
unforeseen
,
so unintelligible, that
she
should have been
seduced
by one so utterly worthless; one too who had
wrestled with her, even at noon day, for her innocence.
Could it be! could it! that she could be won, or
violated
by him! Enough; there was only one route now
for Haroldthrough the storm and darkness forever.
CHAPTER VIII.
We
have now come to a new and trying period in
the life of poor Harold. Two whole years have passed
away, since we left him, plunged amid the foam and
darkness of life's ocean, without one star to shine upon
him, as, shipwrecked and shattered in heart, he drifted
upon his tempestuous way. Two years have gone,
since we left him, leaning upon his hands, the blood of
his whole body rushing to his brainthe atmosphere
darkening about him, and within him, and his broad
eyelids shivering and shutting incessantly, over his
mournful eyes, with the excess of his passion. He
went abroad, after the shock, but it was like an
enchanter
;
the world was a blank to him, covering the
mysterious and hidden dominions where his spirit
revelled
.
He breathed upon it, and it was, as if he had
breathed upon a white canvass, and straightway the
colour and shape of beauty had arisen, in the vapour
of his breath, and passed away again, when that
vapour
passed away. Many lovely and sweet things,
with music, and lustre, and fragrance about them,
hovered
over the void into which he looked, and haunted
him,
at a distance
. But they would never permit him
22*
to approach. If he did, they shut their bright wings,
hushed their chanting, and vanished.
The strong man had become weak, yet he was
formidable
,
even in his weakness. The creature of
vicissitude
,
for two years, he upheld himself alone, amid
the shattered relicks of all that he had leaned upon,
and all that he had loved on earth:trembling and
aching
with sensibility, his heart, for two years, had been
gradually encrusting itself in a panoply of living
adamant
,
of tears and blood:from the crown of his head,
now
, even to the sole of his foot, is he invulnerable!
His bosom, once the abiding place of ambition; the
heart whereon she sat forever, in travail, with
portentous
dreaming, that heart was now darkened, and quiet,
the sanctuary of pure thought and melancholy
recollection
.
The angel of its innermost chamber is now a
slumbering child, innocent, and beautiful, as the
hallowed
light of his own dear eyes. Yes, and the red
arm, the ensanguined forehead, and the lofty eye of
the young savagethe unsparing and deadly
harnessing
of his spirit have all passed away. He is a man
now, and a christian. Calamity hath tamed him. His
proud heart hath been smitten, and the waters of it,
like the innermost light of a broken crystal, rushed
out and sparkled, with a mournful sound, at the touch
that shattered it.
He is nowalas! what is he? A sweet solemnity is
upon his front; his eyes are full of dark, deep, settled
concernan awful, and abiding steadiness and
self-possession
are his, now, as of one familiar with holy,
and high thought. The burning pathway of passion
and excess upon his countenance, hath been
obliterated
by
whom?by a gentle, and weeping spirit!
one, that stole upon him in his solitude, and with her
soft fingers retraced the map of his heart, blotting out
the volcano, and illuminating the lonely, and dark
place; peopling the solitude, and refreshing the
desert
.
A timid mouth went over his contracted brow,
and touched, just touched, his writhing lips, and lo!
they relaxed, and smiled, and straightway, were
benignant
and merciful.
He is out upon the hills again, the everlasting hills!
and lo! the wilderness beneath his feet. The clouds are
in commotion, burning with crimson, and gold, and
sapphire; and the far thunder is rolling about, like
innumerable
drums, through all the circumference of
heaven! Hark! the steadfast hills are quaking to the
tread of HIS angels! that subterranean echo is the loud
presence of the Deity! The clouds are drifting with
intelligence and aim! They assemble, and roll upward,
barrier over barrier, bridges and arches over flaming
voids, like a range of magnificent mountains, parting
asunder, all at oncewith their rocks, and turrets, and
battlements, and precipices, and caverns, and mines,
and torrents, all disclosed!with all their majestick
population
sitting, and walking about, unconcerned
the cabalistick writing of the divinity, glittering in
metallick veins and spots, like the stars of heaven, in
deep water; the whole concave above, blue, and
boundless
,
opening like a moonlit cavern.The architecture
of heaven, and all her pillars and constellations
shattered
,
and lying about, like coloured crystal in disorder,
and magnificent spectres striding hither, and thither,
over the fragments; and the clouds parting, like hills,
with harnessed giants standing in the passes! such is
the aspect of heaven, at this moment!
Harold is in America!at home
! The wide
Atlantick
is rolling between him, and all his family, and
kindred. He is a sceptred hermit. He hath arrived,
buckled anew his sword upon his thigh, and gone out
to battle, as the Lord's anointed, for the red men of
America. He has resworn allegiance to her greatness,
and lo! he is now standing up, above the wilderness,
under the pictured and animated dome of the temple,
that God hath built, for the free in heart; like some
high priest, about to offer his sacrifice, to the
Everlasting
,
and Unchangeable.Every tie of
his heart is ruptured. His sister hath gone, blighted,
and profaned, to her grave, and blood hath been spilt
thereonblood for tearsdrop for drop! Elvira, too
she hath knelt to him, and was scorned! He leaped
into
his chariot, and flung the loose reins upon the wind,
as
she
, the apparition of beauty, and power, broke out,
like a vision, upon his benighted way. Did he pause? No!
The Indian girl, too, O, where was she? helpless,
broken-hearted
,
and dying! Over the wide world had he
wandered for her, over sea and land, over heaven and
earth, in prayer, and in pilgrimagein vain! in vain!
Ah, what accumulated, what consummate treachery
and love must she have experienced; the pure and
proud of heart, the innocent, the lofty!
`Once more, O, our father!' cried Harold, kneeling
down, as he stood, barefooted, and bareheaded, where
he had first met her`once more! if it be
thy
will
and she yet love me, wretched and desolate as she is
O, let me lean once more upon her bosom! once more
hear her innocent, quick breathing! once more behold
the deep languishing of her eyes, through their
beautiful
fringeand then, O, I care not how soon I am
bidden
to lie down, and die.' Man, man! while thou
wast in battle and bloodshed, traversing deserts, she,
whom thou didst so love, was crying for thee!
Harold threw himself upon the rock, and slept, for
the overwatching of his heart could not be appeased by
prayer.
He dreamt. But still, he was in the wilderness
naked feet were forever passing about him, and dim
eyes incessantly glancing under his lashes. And when
he stirred, there were voices about himthe wind was
harmonious, and pleasant to his lips. A rapt abstraction
of the spirit stole over him. He plunged into the
mysterious
depths of his own heart, and put all the
elements
thereof in commotion, and brought up the
sunken
and dimmed pearls and precious things, that
Memory
had thrown overboard, in the shipwreck of his
senses
.
He was astonished and confounded at their
aspect
;
the inexhaustible and wasted riches of his own
nature, upon which Imagination and Enchantment had
engraven the sweetest incidents of his life. He
attempted
to read the characters, but straightway they turned
to weeping eyes, and parting lips, and trembling white
eyelids, coming, and going, with sweet musical cadence,
and pauses of enraptured solemnity, and tenderness
Then brake out upon him, all at once, like a troop of
naked, and rejoicing children, all the forbidden and
delicate recollections of his loverevisiting the
haunted
chambers of his imaginationand then, O, the
thrilling and delirious fever of such dreams! a sweet
face would float by him, in the blue airwane, and
reappear, her meek eyes changing their colour, as they
passed himher soft breath, and rapturous pulsation,
so audible!
These were his dreams! these! what wonder if he
were wasted to a skeleton? An august spirit sat
enthroned
within his heart, and when her dominions were
too fiercely agitated by the rebellion of his thought, she
arose, and waved her arm, and all again was peaceful.
Out of these trials, there grew an undissembling and
obedient submission to his Maker, and Harold took
counsel of his meditations, and chose a new faith. In
that faith he trod. No obstacle could daunt him; no
force could move him; no calamity, no humiliation, no
suffering, no menace, could intimidate, or dishearten
him. Only one thing could disturb him,
now
. It was
the name of Loena: at that name, his heart shook in
his bosom.
`What shall I do?' said Harold, as he awoke, on that
very spot where he had first loveda spot, that he had
now visited, as something hallowed, and religious. His
hands were locked, and the sweat stood upon his lip
`O, woman,' he continued, `even in the solitude, the
silent place, yea, even at the home of the altar, the
purity of your hearts may be violated, polluted, by the
breathing of man!' The thought was suffocation! `
That
reptile, too, O, that the daughter of Logan should so
fall! what shall I do? what
can
I do? The world is all
weariness to me. Ah, if I could find but one, only one
kind heart to turn to, at this moment, I might
gracious
heaven! what art thou?'
A woman was kneeling at his feet, barefooted, like
himself, bleeding, her hair falling over her face, and her
forehead bowed to the very earth!
Harold shivered, with dismay.
The apparition raised her head, and Harold covered
his face with his hands.
`What art thou?' he said, in a hollow voice; `whence?
O, Harold, Harold, wilt thou not look upon me?'
`Merciful heaven!' he cried, staggering toward
her, `where am I? what art thou? I fear to touch thee!
and yet, thy voice is the voice of one that I have loved.'
`O, bless thee! bless thee! Haroldbarefooted and
alone, Haroldmy master, and my lord! barefooted
and alone, have I followed thee! Thou didst spurn me,
but I have forgiven thee. Thy proud foot was upon
my neck, but I have forgotten it. Thou didst scorn me,
and yet Harold, behold me at thy feet! I have
followed
thee, day after day, night after night, asking only to
see thee once more, dear, and die at thy knees!
Harold
,
thou wilt not spurn me again! I cannot leave thee,
dearI
cannot
make me, thou man of sorrow, make
me, thy handmaid! O, Harold, thou art very dear to
me; wilt thou not let me die at thy feet!'
What
could
he do? be fell upon her bosom, and wept
whence came she? from the skies? the clouds? had
she emerged suddenly, from the blue water below, or
had the mountain given her up? Harold was
bewildered
but
his prayerthe first that had ever come truly
from the deepest place of his heart, had been answered
on the spot! He had prayed for one true heart, and lo!
it was at his side. He had wished for one that loved
him. Here was that oneand O, with what truth and
sublimity of devotion, did she love him!
She had listened to his delirium and marvelled not
to his chiding, and murmured not; to her, he was all in
all, and she, the proudest woman of England, casting
aside her rank and authority, lay prostrate, timid,
breathless, bowed down, unconditionally, upon the
bosom of the Indian boy, under the awful influence
of love!
Lady Elvira, (it was she,) had returned to America,
under the condition of her husband's will. Harold
knew not that she was there, and in his wandering he
had never heard her name pronounced, thinking of her
only as he last saw her, broken hearted, and majestick
in her mournful sweetness. And now, to find her here,
at his side, so suddenly, so unexpectedly! it was
portentous
.
How happened it? Let only the loving and the
loved imagine; them only that haunt the spot forever
and ever, sleeping and waking, where their young
hearts were first propitiated, had first palpitated
together
,
hallowing every mossy seat, every broken rock,
every stump, every fountain, every shadowy place,
great tree, and sober wood, with every hue of heaven
and earth, with the sanctifying remembrances of
affection
.
O, for the ruptured heart, how melancholy, yet
how sweet, to travel o'er again, the green road of its
first love, to sit again where
she
sat, to lean where
she
leant, and listen where
she
first learnt to throw down
her timid eyelidsHarold the idolater, the
profoundest
too, of Love, almighty Love, had been lingering
awhile, about all this precious scenery, with ten
thousand
wild, thrilling, mournful emotions; treading, at
midnight, the high hill where he had first met Elvira,
even while thinking only of Loena, so strangely
capricious
and unaccountable is the loyalty of the heart.
But no matter; there is a treacherous, a subduing
tenderness
,
in revisiting scenery so embalmed by our dear
memory; and we are happy to tread it again, even
with a
stranger
.
So felt Harold, so Elvira. But the surprise was
altogether his.
She
had seen him before, heard of
him, and ordered her presence to be scrupulously kept
a secret in America. But at last, in the distracted and
sublime veneration of her heart, the unspeakable
confidence
of a haughty and loving woman, hunting her
love even in the solitary place, without fear, or doubt,
or apprehension, she had trodden in his footsteps,
overtaken him, knelt, wept, and prayed to him.
They descended, and were soon within a place of
much peril.
`What can we do?' cried Harold. `Thou art mine,
lady, my first loveno, no, forgive me, forgive me,
dear Elvira, not my
first
love.'
They were close together; no living soul near them,
in the very room, too, where Harold had stolen upon
her slumbers; whereoh shame on him!
`Nay, my beloved,' he continued, as she sat by
him, and leant upon his shoulder, `nay, nay, do not
tremble; I cannot bear thy tears, they make me doubt
thy forgiveness, love. Thy pallid face, thy tremulous
lip, thy hidden eyes, oh, do not break my heart, Elvira,
look up, look up, dear, once more.'
`I cannot; ah, Harold,' murmured Elvira, in a voice
scarcely audible.
Harold pressed her beautiful hand to his lips, wrung
out the rain from her redundant tresses, and drew her,
cold and shivering as she was, to his heart, as her
home, her fire side, forever and ever.
`And can it be, Horold,' she whispered, or rather
murmured in his bosom, `that thou too, hast loved
anotherthatoh, I cannot speak it.'
There was a thrilling, tender plaintiveness,
something
so desolate, mournful, and beseeching in the
sweet cadence of her voice, so melancholy, so faint,
that Harold put his lips to her forehead, in silence,
and let their tears mingle on their cheeks. He could
not answer; how could he? The truth, and nought but
the truth could he tell; it would be death, he was sure,
to the broken in heart, whose dear, dear, voice he had
just heard, like one that whispers in her sleep, while
her arteries are palpitating. Should he deceive her?
He coloured, forehead, face, and eyes, at the bare
thought. `No! no!' he cried, aloud, `I will perish first,
myself, yea, see her perish first.'
He held her yet closer to his bosom, she scarcely
breathed, and he was like one suffocating, in the bitter
and terrible trial. Her heart had never doubted, never,
except for a moment, and
that
had been forgotten, that
Harold's love for
her
was his first love. And as she
thought
what
that first love, in such a nature
must
be,
so passionate, so unreserved, so delicate, yet so
enduring
;
it had been the keenest luxury of consolation to
her afflicted and broken spirit, in her bereavement and
desolation, to have inspired itBut
Harold held her hands pressed convulsively to his
heart; this was the very room; that, the very window
through which he, the spoiler, camethat perhaps
the
`Oh, Elvira,' said he, in a voice inarticulate with
emotion, the dim moonlight about them, her wet hair
parted upon her pale forehead, and her cold cheek
resting, like marble, against his mouth, `oh speak to me,
banish me, trample on me, kill me, but speak to me,
Elvira, mother of Leopold.'
At the sound of that name, she uttered a faint cry,
and attempted to break from his encircling arms; but
no, no mortal force could have plucked them asunder,
without his consent.
`Oh Elvira, my beloved, listen to me, I cannot
deceive
thee. I may be pronouncing mine own death, I
may
, but I love thee too tenderly, too devotedly, to
deceive thee.
I have loved anotherI love that other
yet
. There, thou art free
now
, forever free, if thou
wilt not forgive me.'
His arms dropped lifelessly at his side, a brief
tremour
followed, as she haughtily put forth her hand,
and turned away her eyes, but his were upon her, and
he saw her countenance fall, and the tears upon her
lip like rain; and he felt that she had forgiven him.
`Oh bless thee! bless thee, love!' he cried, straining
her again and again to his heart, as she leant over him,
and, timidly, put her soft mouth to his eyelids. The
struggle was fearful indeed. His chest heaved, and
his breath rattled, like blood falling upon a marble
pavement
,
as he awaited her forgiveness. His manly frame
was convulsed, the sweat fell from the ends of his
fingers, and the hot tears bubbled under his lashes.
She thought he was suffocating
he was
it was a
mortal
struggle, and another minute he would have been
dying at her feet, with his heart burst. What could
she do? She was a womanshe forgot her own
sorrow
drew
him to her lonely heart, pressed his cheek
to hers, and whispered, in the tenderest musick, `
I do
forgive thee, I do
.'
VOL. II. 23
At the touch, Harold shivered from head to foot,
with delight. All the earthiness of his heart was
instantly
precipitated, and the purer part went up to
heaven, sublimated, and etherealised, in prayer.
He sat down, and, with his arm around her waist,
her head upon his shoulder, and her hands in his,
recapitulated
all the adventures of his boyhood. Elvira
fainted.
What troubled the lady? Was there a more
glowing
distinctness of passion in his manner, when he spoke
of the Indian girl, than when he addressed himself to
her?
What shook her so? Was it jealousy? Why did
her heart fail her, when she attempted to speak?
She desired to be, but trembled so that she could
not be, very minute in her questions. She would have
known something more than Harold had told, yet she
dared not ask him. What was it? Whence was that
delicate perception, which, like another sense, looked
through all his looks and words, and ached over a
more mysterious meaning. He had loved another. He
had loved
her
. But how had he profited of his love?
Oh Harold, where was the holiness of thy flame, when
thou didst quench it in passion? `Had heit might
bethe rifler'but no, no, she would not think of it.
The thought was hateful.
They were silent, and their silence was devotion.
Their hearts were too full to utter a word. The
palpitation
of hers had subsided, and, by her breathing,
Harold thought that
she
was asleep. How delightful the
thought! What a moment for the devout and loving!
He feared to move or breathe, and when her gentle
hand, as he unwillingly released it, fell down, in its
sweet lifelessness, and she raised her head and
murmured
,
poor Harold was really the happiest creature
on earth.
`Where am I,' said she, `oh! Harold dear! is it
thou?
I have been dream
thinking
of thee, and I was
afraid to open my eyes, lest it might be a delusion.'
`And couldst thou sleep, so quietly, in my arms,
dear, if I were not now worthier than I have been?'
`I could sleep there forever, worthy or unworthy,
I had almost said, dear Haroldbut no, only while
thou wast what thou art.'
They had watched so long of late, and Elvira was
so full of purity and confidence, being too, in her own
house now, of which she was the undisputed mistress
this chamber so communicating with that, where
Harold had formerly slept, that he could escape at
any moment; and he, too, was so happy, and so weary
with
his happiness, that before they knew it, they were
sleeping again, both together, in the moonlight folded
in each other's armsit was but for a moment, with
Elvira; for the instinctive delicacy of her mind forsook
her not, even in slumber, and she gently disengaged
her arm, and was on the point of pressing her lips to
his forehead, and leaving him, while he slept, when,
just as they approached, she was struck with a ghastly
paleness in his face, and a quick convulsion of his
features
,
as they darkened with the agitation of his
thought; and she paused, and her eyes filled, as he
continued talking in a low, deep, passionate voice, as
to some loved one
`Yes, yes,' said he, `believe me, I do forgive thee.
I do not even charge thee with my death, love. I
murder thee! I! I deceive thee! I talk unkindly to thee!
I! Mistaken girl! I have loved thee; I still love thee;
I shall love thee forever. I am weeping, not for
myself
,
death has no terrours for me; nay, I do not repine
that I am dying by thy hand, loveI weep only for
thee
, for the time will come when thou wilt think of
me, of my love, and faith, and tenderness; and then,
oh, thou wilt weep such tears as I am now shedding.
No, my still beloved one, I am not angry with thee;
by these tears, these kisses, I do forgive and bless
thee'
Here Harold awoke, and seeing a woman, meekly
leaning over him, it seemed that he took her for the
creature of whom he had been dreaming, for he
continued
his incoherent murmuring, until she broke from his
grasp, at the sound of a nameit was not hers, it was
Loena's!
He outreached his arms to her, as she fled`what,
art thou not Loena? Oh, I am sick at heart; thou art
not the murderessstay, dearest, stay, Loena would
have killed me, but thou, thou wilt not desert me,
wilt thou, dear?'
Elvira returned, listened to his disturbed dream,
blessed him with her gentle lips, and departed.
CHAPTER IX.
`What shall we do,
now?
' said lady Elvira, to
Harold
,
as they sat, leaning in the starlight, against an
old, and decayed oak, that outspread its wilderness of
branches over a bed of spotted rocks, that glittered in
the thin water, as it rattled by them, and sprinkled the
rich and variegated moss with a profusion of fine drops,
like seed pearl, or crystal dust. It was their
favourite
retreat of late. From it, they were now accustomed
to see the lordly sun descend from his chariot, and
trample over the hills, while the whole concave of
heaven
was flashing and changing with the irradiation
that issued from his garniture. `What shall we do?
This life is not worthy of us. Where is our ambition?
thine, and mine?Ah, do not look so sadly, Harold.
It is not utterly extinct. Thy path is not yet over the
bleak and iron precipices of lifebut thy stature is too
lofty, and thy stride too far, for the plains. It hath not
perishedhath it?'
`No, Elvira, no! it hath not, cannot perish!' said
Harold
,
pressing his hands to his heart, with strong
emphasis
`But
our Ambitionno, not
ours
, but
mine
, has
been a wasting, and discontented spirit. I should
tremble
to see
her
resuscitated.'
`So should I, Harold. But there is something to be
done, here, is there not?'
`Yes, much, much. A world is opening before us:
and might I be permitted to avail myself of its
mysterious
and wonderful resourcesthen, Elvira, then
(his eyes lighted, and he stood suddenly upon his feet)
then! God himself, only, could shorten my arm, or limit
my dominion.'
Elvira caught the lustre of his eyes, and reflected it,
like a panoply of steelshe turned, and gazed upon
him with rapturous astonishment. His fine face was all
on firehis broad forehead, so spacious, so sublime
and his parted lips were full of gallant intensity.
`What wouldst thou, Harold?' asked she,
tremblingly
,
with her beautiful arm reposing on his shoulder, and
her hand locked in his, and holding back her luxuriant
brown hair, her eyes shining in their moisture, the
moisture of an overflowing heart, sending up its
exhalations
to heavenand eyelids quivering, like white
blossom-leaves, in the starlight`what wouldst thou,
Harold?'
`Indeed, I know not what. All about the future is
vague and indistinct; but this I do feel, (turning about
with energy, and facing her, like a prince; with a look,
that spoke volumes)
this!
that I should be, if I might,
something worthy of
thee!
or
perish
nay, love, tears!
yet, who would not weep? I, even I, who never weep
but in suffocation, never in paineven I could fall
upon thy bosom, at this moment, and weep, aloud.
For thou, Elvira, even thouwast the first, strong,
generous
impulse of my nature. Thy hand was the first that
awoke, and stirred up the embers of my heart. It was
a solitude, a cold hearth stone, till I saw thee. My
first passion had blazed brightly, but there was no
warmth in itat thy voice, my mind, a desert till then,
swarmed with a gigantick, and kingly population. Nay,
do not doubt meeven she whom I first lovedshe,
who would have sold me, but the other night, to
bondage
and deatheven she, at the moment of my first
thrilling, and passionate love, when my veins tingled,
my temples throbbed, and the blood gusned from my
nostrils, at the sound of her voiceeven she could not
awaken me as thou didst. But I disturb thee love; why so
melancholy? surely
thou
wouldst not covet such a passion,
so unreasonable, so merely constitutional!O, Elvira,
thy deep breathing, the lifeless slumbering of thy hand
in mine, betoken a strange answer to my supplication.
Art thou unhappy? have I done aught to offend thee?
23*
I have. Thou art weary of
her
name. I do not blame
thee, thou majestick creature. Nay, do not tremble so.
Do not doubt me. Be assured, love, that it is better
for me to speak of the past, though I speak of it in
convulsion
;
no matter at what expense of agony and
terrour
,
than to shut up the poison and death, in the
darkness
,
and solitude, and loneliness of my heart. The
silent
,
secret, settled brooding of the spirit,
that
may be
fatal.
This
is not. No remedy can reach the hidden
wound; to be touched, the sore heart must be
unclothed
.
Then do not doubt me; have I not told my love,
openly, freely.'
`They love, oh, Harold, Harold, I cannot bear it. To
hear thee tell of love to another, is insupportable. My
heart sickens at the thought.'
`Nay, why that look of terrour? what seest thou?'
`Oscar! oh, it is Oscar, himself,' she exclaimed,
throwing herself upon his bosom.
`Elvira!' said Harold, in dismay`what ails thee?'
She bowed her head upon his hands, kissed them, and
wept upon them. Had he understood her?
his
agony
was now like hers. She had loved Oscar: thought of
him, even in
his
arms! It
was
a pang, a bolt of
lightning
;
it seared his heart, and blinded him, as it hissed
through the blood of his overloaded brain. He was
speechless.
There was a silencea breathless, melancholy, and
almost resentful silence, followed, boding much evil to
their haughty, and still trembling hearts. Harold was
the first to break it. They were approaching the house;
a few paces more, and they would have passed the
thresholda few paces, and they might have gone too
far for reconciliation; they would be observed, and
every moment of delay would be a new impediment,
hindering each, from advancing first.
Harold gasped for breath. `Elvira,' said he,
pressing
the hand, which had hung coldly in his, for many
minutes`can it be? must our acquaintance end
here?
'
She trembled, attempted to reply; but her voice
failed
her for she was as proud as he, and felt as
sensibly
,
the peril of such a silence, at such a moment, and
she leant a little more heavily, for a single moment,
upon his arm.
He understood it! involuntary, as it seemed, for what
will not the heart that truly loves, understand? He
understood
it, as pardon, and light, and life, and
reconciliation
.
`Heaven bless thee,' he cried, and fell upon
her neck, and gently touched it with his lips.
`One moment, dear Elvira,' he added, detaining
her near the entrance, `let us bewarethere are some
themes, some! that are treacherous, desperate. Let
us not rashly take offence; let us be patient, forgiving.
O, Elvira, we shall have much to forget, thou
especially
,
above all(her countenance was here turned
toward
him, full of noble, and tender expression; and
her eyes overflowed, and her lips murmured like some
fountain, hastily gushing out, in harmony and light)
above all! let us swear, here, in the sight of heaven,
with the recollection of the last few moments upon our
hearts, let us swear to be
patient
, not to resolve,
precipitately
,
not to believe hastily, whatever may
happen
thou
hast loved before?'
`And thou!'
`Yes, I admit it. Our experience is alike. Why
shouldst thou tremble for me? I do not for thee. I do
not feel my heart sink within me, at the mention of
his
name, though I confess'
`Truebut
he
is dead.'
`And how knowest thou, that
she
is not?'
`O, I know she is not!'She checked herself
suddenly
,
as she said this, but Harold did not appear to
observe it, or if he did, the troubled shadow upon his
forehead, probably arose at the mention of her name.'
`Beside,' said Elvira, reproachfully, `Ye are not
faithful in love, as we are.'
`O, believe me! we
are
, indeed we are! we feel with
a masculine steadiness, and strength, in our brain,
artery
,
forever and ever.'
`I hope not.'
Harold paused, and looked down. `Yes, it
is
true,'
he added, `I shall feel a vital tenderness for
her
, to
my last hourso helpless, so impassioned, so
dependent
as she was on me, for her whole happiness. Yet,
my love for thee is a much grander feeling. I have
never felt aught that resembled it, before: so exalted,
so pure, so respectful, yet so tender and thrilling. And
love, dear woman, like friendship, may differ in
degrees
,
and quality.'
Elvira sighed.
`My own experience proves this to me. Why that
sigh? do I not love thee, as tenderly, as devotedly, as
thou lovest me? and why shouldst thou feel a more
agitating
emotion, at hearing the name ofof
Loena
, than I
do, at the name of Oscarmerciful powers! that cry!
Is
his
name so terrible yet?`Elvira!' (his voice grew
solemn, awfully solemn) `
beware!
'a moment's
silence
followed, which was interrupted, by a sudden
alteration
of his whole countenance, as if some uninvited,
strange thought, had suddenly flashed into his mind,
and he continued, in a suffocating, earnest tone.
`O, Elvira, hear meam Ihear meI will kneel
to thee! I
do
, behold me here. Let me die here, die at
thy feet; but oh, speak the truthO, speak it I
conjure
thee, by all that we have suffered, or hoped! by all
that we have felt, or feigned! by our hopes of
happiness
here, and mercy hereafter! O, speak the truth,
tell me, am I beloved, for mine own sake, or O, is it
is it only for my resemblance to my poor brother!
O, speak to me, thy tears are blistering, they fall upon
my forehead, like a rain of firethy
tenderness
for
him'
`For thine own sake, and
thine
, alone, beloved of
my soul,' said Elvira, sobbing against his cheek. `
Now
,
I love thee, for thine own sake; at first, I did not. At
first, I loved thee, without knowing it, for thy
resemblance
to him, the lord, the sceptred one of my broken
heart; but as I came to know thee better, and found in
thee all his heroick greatness, with other, and more
awful virtues, O, I could not but love thee, then, for
thine own sake, alone!tenderness for Oscar!
tenderness
!
O, no believe me, I never felt aught that
resembled
it, till I encountered thee. Why, Harold, at the
very sound of thy voice, thy tread, I could fall flat upon
my face, and weep for joy, sometimesa delicious and
strange languor comes over my hearta kind ofa
something, that I cannot express, makes me so
humble
,
so thankful, when I am near thee! Ah, I am then too
happy! I tremble for myself, when I am aloneI look
for some calamity to follow; nay, I
expect
it.'
`It is wise, Elvira,' said Harold, tenderly, `we
must expect itbe prepared for itchangesuffering
death!'
Such was the nature of all their conversation,
evening
,
after evening, until Harold, who had been
sending
his emissaries all over the continent of America,
to obtain accurate information respecting the number,
disposition, and resources of the red men, received
enough to authorise his revisiting some of the deep
solitudes
that he had haunted in his youth.
`I cannot rest,' said he, one morning to Elvira, as
he sat with her hands held to his heart, `I cannot rest.
The god of my fathers, the red Logan is upon me! I
must redress the wrongs of his childrenI
must
. I
must learn their fate.'
A few tears, a few expostulations, a parting kiss, and
Harold slung his rifle, selected his dogs, the fiercest
and strongest of the breed, and with one servant
successively
visited the Canadian Indians, the Penobscots,
the Five Nations, and the southern Creeks and
Cherokees
.
Wherever he went, he was hailed with enthusiasm;
he sought for the vestiges of his kindred. There was
not a trace leftsome said they had amalgamated with
a tribe of the Iroquoisothers that they had gone to
the western worldand others that they had passed
that, to the land of souls, and that they had been
seen
,
running their wild horses over the steel pavement of
heaven. Everywhereyes,
everywhere
, he found the
Indian trampled upon, derided, mocked at, scorned,
and cheated. His great heart arose within him.
Should he build up a coalition, a confederacy? Might
he not erect an empire of his own, and roll back, upon
the whites, the flood of encroachment, with which they
had swept away the red nations of America? Night
and day he fevered with this thought. Night and
day, was he haunted by wild beasts, and spectres, with
crowns upon their heads. He could not sleep; he had
no appetite, and was wasted to a shadow, before he
brought his menacing and ambitious spirit to confess
that war was no longer a profession worthy of the good
man; and least of all, such a war.
This was his determination. Was there then no
remedy for the red menno punishment for their
oppressors, no employment for his power? Although
he might not lay waste and scatter the habitations of
the white, was there nothing to be done?
He returned to Elvira. Weeks of enjoyment, and
confidence, passed away, but his countenance was still
thoughtful, and even stern at timesyea, wrathful.
She was leaning upon his shoulder, one day, and her
beautiful arm encircled his neck, negligently, but
affectionately
;
he had been silent for many minutes.
`I must goI
will!
' said he.
`Well, then,
go
,' said she, smiling, `if you
must
and
will
.'
Harold put his hand to his forehead, `he did not
understand her,' he said,`not from thee, lovenot
from thee.'
`And whither, then?'
`To
England!
Aye, woman of my heart, to England,
brave old England,' pressing his lip to her snowy
forehead
,
while the scarlet flew over it, like a flash of fire.
`To England! how? when? for what?' said Elvira,
turning deadly pale.
`Immediately; in the first ship, to get law and right
for my derided countrymen.'
`But how?'
`By shaming to scorn the ministry, the plantation
committees, and the council board. Gracious heaven!
how blind and deaf they are!here have they
parcelled
out an empire, and given kingdoms to the petty,
depredating pedlars of the countryloosened a set of
hell hounds, hungry and fleet, among the naked
population
of a continent, to lay waste, and spoil. It shall
not be, Elvira,
it shall not be!
One effort, and we shall
be happy. That effort be mine. Yea, love,
thou and I
will then be happy
.'
She understood him. This was the first time that
he had ever audibly alluded to
that
event, and she
thrilled and shivered from head to foot, as he did so
now.
Harold was rapid in resolve, but more rapid in
execution
.
His materials were ready. In two weeks from
that day, he was under sail, with Elvira, from America
preparing his proofs to confound the ministry. He
soon arrived, and strong in the consciousness of his
power and honesty, he carried his remonstrances
directly
to the Premier, (the greatest that Britain ever
saw in her cabinet.) `The question shall be taken up,'
said the Premier, returning the papers, with an eye of
strong anxiety and respect, `in due season. We shall
want your assistance. You will take care not to be out
of the way. Leave your address, and we will send for
you.'
The Premier was as good as his word. Notice was
given in the house, the very next evening, that a
parlimentary
investigation would be moved on the
following
Monday.
The motion, at first, appeared to excite little or no
attention; but, as it came to be considered, in all its
consequences, and relations, the genius of the British
constitution herself was invoked, and arose with a
disturbed
and darkened countenance. Confederacies were
formed, council engaged, and most of the chartered
communities of the empire were agitated. Even the
East India Company participated in the general
sensation
,
and manifested their solicitude by vehement
efforts to suppress the inquiry, probably as a precedent,
by which they might be reached, at some future day,
if it were not protested against, in its very conception,
or strangled in its birth.
The momentous day came, and after a desultory
debate, a formal motion was made to appoint a
committee
from the house to inquire into, and report upon
the manner of treating and trading with the North
American Indians, by the British colonial
governments
,
&c. &c. &c.
Harold was in a fever. The house of lords had been
two days vehemently occupied, when Harold, who had
regularly taken his seat in the gallery, began to be
pointed out, and talked of with eagerness, enthusiasm,
and extravagance. On the third evening he had
scarcely
taken his seat, when he was called out by the
serjeant
at arms to attend the house, in a committee of
the whole. He trembled from head to foot; all eyes
were upon him; and when he descended, it was with a
desperate courage, that blinded and stupified him for
some minutes.
Behold him now. He is standing near the great
table
.
The lord Chancellor is before him. The judges
of England are about himher greatest men before
and behind him. He dares not lift up his eyes. There is,
at first, a continual hum of bustling eagerness and
preparation
,
followed, at length, by a more appalling
silence
.
It grows dark about him. His lips and throat are
parched; he sees nothing, hears nothing but a confused
ringing in his ears.
`Young man,' said somebody near him, `remember
your dutyyourself.'
Harold trembled the more, for as he turned the flash
of his eye in the direction whence the voice proceeded,
he was unable to detect the speaker. There was a mist,
a darkness before him, and the ermine that he saw was
like a white vapour, moving in the wind; the very
atmosphere
appeared full of faces. He was ready to sink
down upon the the floor.
`Harold! Harold! Harold! was distinctly breathed
in his ear again. He turned, and the wildness of his
eye, and fixedness of his look, in the mortal silence of
the place, as it wandered over the countenances near
him, and then turned away, sicker, and sicker at heart,
gave a more noble and interesting, though deathlike
expression to his countenance. There was a general,
and delighted murmur of encouragement.
`
Son of Logan!
' said the voice aloud, as if passing
over him in the air.
`Powers of heaven!' cried Harold, his great spirit
breaking out, all at once, at the sound, as if he were
suddenly transported to the wildernessas if, at that
instant, he stood before, no ermine and coronets, but
naked men, under no dome but the dome of heaven,
lighted by stars and council fires.
The change was instantly greeted as portentous. To
the looks of compassionate solicitude, doubtfulness,
dismay, and trembling expectation, there instantly
succeeded
an animated and confident expression of hope,
in the whole house.
Harold's arms were folded. He spoke! the sound of
his own voice would have frightened him the moment
before, or even a moment laterhe spoke! exactly at
the extremest moment of his power and
self-possession
.
`Englishmen,' said he, `my lords, why am I
summoned
to your bar? arrayed against all this
formidable
accumulation of power and magnificence. Would
you oppress me? would you intimidate me? I was born
an American, of an Indian: an Englishman was my
father, a daughter of Logan my mother.
`I have been told, nay, you have all been told, that I
appear as the advocate, the champion, of Indian rights.
I am not. God is their advocate, their champion. God
himself, with whom my countrymen, the red men of
America, hold their communion in the deep solitudes of
another world.
`These forms, shame on themI have submitted to
them, my lords, that I might be heard, not for my own
sake, for I have no interest apart from my countrymen,
but for them. And therefore have I stooped to appear
before you, not in my true character, one of the
oppressed
bowing before his oppressors, and praying that
a whole people may be heard at this barno!but
merely and only, for so your ceremonies have
prescribed
,
as the friend of one poor creature, one that is
helpless, friendless, and naked; one whom you, yes,
you
, my lordsfor your ministers have done it, and
you are answerable for ithave stripped of his
possessions
.
Do you ask who this is? It is Logan, Logan
himself! my ancestor.
VOL. II. 24
`The petitioner, my lords, with his whole family, is
in his grave. But their spirits are here, here, at my
side! At this moment, Logan himself is whispering in
my earsmy voice flows only at his prompting. He
comes before you, over the Atlantick; stands before
you, in the shape and presence of his child,
outstretches
his arms, and proclaims aloud the wrong and
suffering
that you have afflicted him with. He was a
monarch
.
You have shattered his crown, mocked at his
calamities, and trampled him in the dust. He was a
father. You have left him desolate and alone. He was
an ally. You have degraded him to slavery; and the
wages of his devotion to you, have been scorn, and
oppression
,
and misery.
`His dominion was an empire. It was given to him
by Almighty God. He held it by no earthly tenure,
no vassalage, no feud, no mediate nor intermediate
sovereign, lord or man. How have you reverenced his
title? You have spoiled him of his inheritance,
butchered
his family, and banished him beyond the
mountains
.
`Yet this, even
this
, is not all, my lords.
`The time has now come, when you, as the supreme
tribunal of this empire,
shall
learn the truth of the red
men. Oh, you know not what we have suffered.
Outrage
and derision have been measured out to us, till
we have learned to turn sick with hatred and abhorrence,
at the very name or approach of a white man.
We are numerous, warlike, generous
faithful!
Oh!
yes, strange as it may sound,
faithful
, accustomed as
you are to hearing all that is perfidious, and
treacherous
,
associated with the name of the Indian, still
faithful
unto death
. I know what I am saying, my lords; I
am not beside myself. I know what I owe to the
dignity
of this house; and I am not desperate enough to
provoke its power; but I say to you that the red men
of America are, and ever have been, and always will
be,
faithful
to them that are faithful.
`My lords, you have been abused, shamefully abused.
You have been cheated and played with. It is time
that you awakeI have come prepared to disabuse
youThe proofs are in my handthese documents
will prove to you that your patience, and magnanimity,
have been set at nought, blinded, and sacrificed, by
your rabble authorities in America.
`Remember, I pray you, my lords, that here, in the face
of this awful assembly, unused as I am to such a presence,
inexperienced as I am, I am prepared to encounter the
wrath of all that shall dare to contradict me. Hear me, my
lords, hear me calling on the Judge of the quick and
the dead, to record my testimony, and smite me with
his heaviest hand, here! to dust and ashes upon the
spot, if I err, or prevaricateand now behold me: I
lay down my hands upon this gospel, and swear in his
presence, and before you, that there never has been a
fair treaty violated by the red men of America! Are
you amazed? Treaties! gracious heaven! what treaties
were they? One party took, and the other yielded.
One struck and the other stood still. Kingdoms and
states and empires were bartered for baubles; and
peace lasted only till these territories were taken
possession
of, and the white spoiler saw that there was
something yet left, beyond, to the red men of
America
.
And yet, even these treaties were kept by the
Indians
.
`Sometimes, it is true, my lords, the Indian, who had
been drugged with your infernal poisons, and made
drunk by stratagem, would awake in delirium, from the
infatuation into which you had beguiled him; and then,
like the wild beast in the net, he would rend, tear the
meshes with which he had been encompassed. Was
this wonderful? Is it wonderful, that men who went to
sleep, with whole provinces in their grasp, and awoke,
without land enough of their own, to bury their
abused
children in, should be wrathful and vindictive?'
`No!they were cheated in their treaties. The
l
aw
of nations permitted them to break and scatter the
parchment
,
that imprisoned them. When their treaties were
fair and honest, the red men always kept them. Do ye
as much? Is it not, my lords, is it not a part of your
political religion, creedthat a treaty imposed upon a
nation, by power, terrour, or fraudin cruelty or
wickedness
,
is no longer binding upon that nation, than
while they are unable to break it.'
`You keep
your
treaties, when fair and honest. So
do we. You break them that are questionable. We do
not. You disdain and scatter all fetters, that are
unworthily
rivetted upon you.
So do we!
In what
particular
then, are we worse than you? Nay, are we so
bad? The men of North America adhere to treaties,
that the people of Europe would burst asunder, in
wrath and ruin, the first moment of their power.'
`But
facts
, facts, are called for. You shall have
them. Look at William Penn. Were his treaties fair?
Were they ever broken? No! Was the Indian faith
ever doubted or denied in that province? No, no! The
very women and children slept quietly, with their doors
open; and my brethren, the red men, coming in, and
going out of their habitations, at all hours of the night!
So much for
that
government.
`Turn your eyes eastward. Look into the doings of
New Plymouth, and the Providence plantations.
Their
history is the same. Look to
their
treaties. All that
your lordships would not blush to acknowledge your
countrymen as parties to, all!without any exception,
were religiously observed by the red men. I appeal to
their history. Their history? God of heaven! From
whom have we the history of Indian wrongs, and
Indian
outrages? From the wronged, and abused, and
insulted
!oh,
nono! but from the insulters, the
oppressors
,
the spoilers themselves! O, that some Indian
had arisen, to record the doings of the pious and
benignant
!
What a bloody and perfidious tragedy it would
have been!for even now, my lords, even
now
I say it
because I know itwith my own eyes and ears, have
I seen and heard what I say; because I have journeyed
from the Atlantic to the Pacificfrom the north to the
south, exploring the character, history, and sufferings
of my poor brethren; even
now
, are your doings as
wise and merciful!'
`Look to your own histories. Even to them do I
appeal; to them, the records of the zealot, the
persecutor
,
and the fanatick, the interested, and profligate.
Look at them! and lo!
there
are records of such doing,
such barbarity perpetrated upon us!
there
are voices
that ought to shake the genius of your empire, were
she slumbering within the ashes of its ruin; like the
sound of the last trumpet, ringing abroad through all
heaven and earth, the empty skies, and the
subterraneous
solitudes of this globeand awaken her in fear
and trembling.'
`But the treaties. Do the French ever complain that
the Indians break their treaties with them? No, never.
They
are magnanimous and wise. Will you go with
me, awhile to the southto the Carolinas? So truly
were all the treaties, that bear the common marks of
decency, observed by the Indians there, that not one
instance of violation on their part, can be found. Nay,
so well is this known by the white settlers, and so
confidently
trusted to by them, that, when a treaty is made
with the Indians, it is only necessary to publish it abroad
by proclamation, and the very frontier lands, those that
touch upon the Indian possessions, are instantly
swarming
with an awakened, unarmed, yet secure population
of young whites. Read it to one of the whites, and
according
as the terms are, he will abandon his lands; or
go to his tillage, with his rifle slung and cocked; or
ramble about, with no other arms than his implements
of husbandry.'
`If the treaty be not more reproachful, more
humiliating
,
more outrageous, than was ever imposed upon
conquered rebels, living among the nations of Europe,
your Indian allies in America will keep it, as the faith
of their fathers. But there are none such of late. All
the treaties of purchase, are treaties of abandonment,
and surrender; like these made by the abject
to
, not
with
, those who have held their hand in the extremity
of their provocation, and refrained from annihilating
them, even in the excess and rashness of their power.'
`Thus much, my lords, for treaties. There are yet
other subjects, upon which you are mightily abused.
Would you know the Indian
character?
You talk of
your Spartans, your Greeksyou are surprised, my
lords, but Indian as I am, I am familiar with the deeds
24*
of the Spartan and Roman; and I have read thereof,
till my blood thrilled. Why? By heaven, I thought that I
was reading the history of my own people. As I
passed
along, generation after generation of their history,
there was not a great act, no, not one, which I could
not have paralleled in the history of my own little
tribe. Were the Spartans fiercer in combat? more
deadly
,
no! were they more adroit, subtile? persevering?
immoveable, taciturn? noare we more effeminate,
luxurious? nowas
their
chastity like ours? their
self-denial
,
their fortitude? It will not be pretended. Was it
ever heard that an Indian offered violence to a woman?
never! that he ever cried out, though his vitals were
broiling at the stake, though he were blinded and
choked
by the vapour of his own blood, as it fell, mingling
with his sweat, and hissed upon the living coals that
encompassed him? no, never!were they cunning,
cautious
in war? so are we. Is it a reproach to
us?
then
is it to yourselves. The Indian holds it a mortal
reproach
to be taken alive in battle, or even to fall
and so should you. Ye are inconsistent. They are not.
They would capture without losing a man, if they
could, and so would you. What is your art of war?
your most consummate generalship? what! but the
perfected
,
scientifick stratagem of the Indian? Is it not
the essence of all military knowledge, to do your
enemy
the greatest injury, with the least injury to
yourself
?
It is; yet the red man is called a coward, and the
white, a general! What has given Hannibal his name?
Was he more wary, fuller of resources, more
indestructible
,
or vigilant, that the commonest Indian? no! why
is Xenephon remembered? for his retreat! why? such a
retreat has nothing wonderful in it, except in the
strength of them that retreated, to the Indian ear. Our
parties, ours! penetrate for hundreds of miles, into the
very heart of an enemy's country, and return, often
and often, encumbered with spoil, without the loss of
a man.'
`But, let us speak of their religion. It is said, that
they have none. No religion! the red man of North
America, no religion! Almighty God!
Thou
, whom the
Indian babe contemplates in his cradle of interwoven
tree branches, swinging in the hurricane
Thou
!
whose thunders and voices are his familiar musick,
from his earliest hour
Thou
! whom he has listened
to, through all his childhood, while thy ten thousand
chariots rattled over the rocky mountain tops that
surround
him
Thou
! whom he pursues, and worships,
at all seasonsin winter, and summer; in day, and
night; in the caverns of the earth, or upon the rude
water
;
in blood and sweat, with the truest veneration; a
veneration that can only be felt in
his
temples, that
shame to darkness the most gorgeous of yours, with a
simplicity and nakedness of heart, like that of our first
parent
,
when he stood first under thy blue sky, and
chanted
with the rejoicing elements
Thou
, alone, shalt
judge if the great heart of the Indian does not
palpitate
more loudly in
his
devotion, amid the awful
silence
of
his
sanctuary, than any heart among the
habitations
of the white men! wilt thou not judge us!'
`No religion! behold yon patriarch upon his face!
There hath he been ever since the sun went down.
Look at yon warriour, stretching his glossy limbs in the
shadow of yon rifted oak, teaching his naked boy how
to feather his arrow and barb his javelin. He is a
father
.
Is
he
not religious? lo! he is teaching his child to
defend his inheritance. He is training him in the first
lesson of patriotism, and is not patriotism, religion?'
`Would you hear of individual acts of heroism?
Hearken to me. I have seen a nation sitting in
council
such
was their pride and grandeur of spirit, when
their liberties were in periland calmly deliberating
whether they should put all their women and children
to death! yea, and I have known the proposition
rejected
by only two votes!
[1]
[1]
This is a fact. General Coffee relates it in one of his official
letters, during the last war between the Americans and British.
Can ye parallel that? the men
of Jerusalem did it, but what other people ever
conceived
a thought so terrible, so sublime, so surpassing
all that Athens thought of, when she fled, with her
very gates, and embarked upon the water?'
`Look through our whole history. Take the
malignant
and scornful misrepresentation of our enemies,
who
dared
not tell the
truth
, and you will find
heroick
examples, of every virtue, nay the most heroick
love, fortitude, bravery, perseverance, chastity, and all
others. There are Pocahontas, Alexander, Logan,
Philip of Mount Hope, Opechancanough, and a host
of others. Ransack the golden archives of historytear
out every bright and burning page, and I will pledge
myself
to produce, from the testimony of our enemies, who
knew not even our language, and we were a little people,
and but little known, and for a few yearsan army of
blazing parallels, martyrs, heroes, orators, and kings.'
`But why pursue the theme of their greatness. Our
fathers, where are they? turn your eyes to the south
where are our people? rolled back, nation upon nation,
people upon people, from ocean to ocean, from river
to river, from forest to forest, from the Atlantick
through the wilderness, over the mountains, into the
Pacifick! Look at the map! where once their
possessions
were from the rising of the sun, even to the
going down of the same, where there was no outline,
no barrier, no boundary, you may now trace, with
your fingers, all that remain to them. They are cooped
up in a corner, a mere corner of the world, that they
once inhabited! My lords! I am authorised to say,
and I do say it, with a knowledge of the fact, that of
twenty-eight
Indian tribes that inhabited South
Carolina
,
in 1670, when it began to be settled by the
whites, twenty-six have entirely disappeared.'
[2]
[2]
See Ramsay's South Carolina, 1 vol. 197.
`Do you not tremble? will you not weep? have you
no compassion for such men, nor for their descendants,
so wasted, so scattered! Think of your treatment to
themyes,
yours!
know ye, ye sceptred, and crowned
princes of the land; ye ermined men, that occupy the
high places of power and glory in the dominion of your
countrymen, as a dominion of the righteousknow ye,
that the free-born savage of America, the unfettered
roving
creature of a continent, is often hunted down, mana
cled, bound hand and foot, and
sold to slavery
, under your
authorities. My lords, I do aver, that native Indians
have been kidnapped by men of high rank, in your
province
of South Carolina, and sent to the West Indies,
and
sold as slaves!
Yes, wars are provoked, and
bounties
are offered for the capture of Indians, and whole
cargoes are shipped to your plantations.
[3]
[3]
Even this is a fact. The history of South Carolina will show it.
Yes, wars,
wars, are excited between us, that you may purchase
the prisoners on each side.'
See Ramsay's South Carolina.
`You complain of
our
scalping. You threaten
us
with the malediction of your God for it. Will you
believe
me, my lords? I declare it of my own knowledge,
that there is not a single province, not one, among all
your North American possessions, where the white
government
has not offered a reward for scalpsThe
holy
charitable, and gentle fathers of New Plymouth, not
excepted.'
`But let me dwell a moment longer upon features
of individual greatnessyou will forgive my desultory
rambling, my lords, I hope, and attribute it to its true
cause, inexperience in these matters, and unsubdued
feeling. I have not yet learnt to be calm, or stormy,
after the rules of Quintilian. Have you forgotten the
Virginia princess, a creature moulded in loveliness,
flashing from head to foot, with the irradiations of
Divinity
beautiful,
even in her complexion, like the
Moorish girl, or the young Spaniardof surpassing
grace, and majesty; so devoted, so tender, so
passionately
tender! need I repeat her story? when the bravest
of your name, he, who among adventurers was the
chief; among knights, the loftiest, and among the
romantick
and chivalrous, the first, and foremost; she
was his preserver!'
`Have you heard of Philip, Philip of Mount
Hope? By the eternal majesty of heaven! Greece,
and her Philip of Macedon, with all his intrigue, are
less terrible, less wonderful in history, than are Philip
of Mount Hope, and
his
confederacy! For thirteen
years, the Indian Philip held all the jarring spirits,
and warring materials of the north, in a coalition, that
laughed to scorn all the strength and subtility, all the
intrigue and suspicion of his encompassing enemies!
He amalgamated whole tribes, bound together mortal
and hereditary foes, the timid and haughty, the
wavering
and arrogant; yea, built up to himself an
empire
,
almost of elements, more conflicting and
volcanick
,
than were ever assembled before, by the might or
wisdom of men. And they obeyed him; they! for
thirteen
years of darkness and temptation. For thirteen
years, that man continued at his work, day and night,
augmenting his power in silence, and concocting his
tremendous drugs in darkness, and they who begirt
him, round about, who looked upon him as their
prisoner
,
vassal, slavewhen they awoke, and saw the
chain of annihiliation contracting about them, like a
tremendous serpent, knew not where to touch a single
link or coil, with any hope of escape! Ruin and death
had enmeshed them, while they watched like armed
sentinels over naked men! For thirteen years, did Philip
of Mount Hope play this game. Did he of Macedon
do as much? no, no, he could not have done it, he was
not the man to do itNot the statesman, the captain,
nor the politician, to do it! The Indian Philip was the
more wily, indefatigable, resolute, and unappeasable
of the two. I appeal again to history. Your whole
population
were within a few hours of being exterminated,
and how were they saved? Great God!
you
talk of
treachery!
you
talk of faith in war!
you
, ye men of
Plymouth! O, shame on your memories! ye cruel,
cowardly
assassins! Ye were Philip's murderers, not his
conquerors! You bought his blood, the blood of a
monarch
;
set his confidential friend, his minister, to the
work of death, yea, and boasted of it when it was
done! What Indian ever did this? what barbarian,
whose name has not been left weltering and accursed,
in the blood that he had so basely purchased!'
`Would ye have another instance, another, of your
damnable perfidy? My lords, my lords, let me mention
one more, one only, for my heart is bursting!'
`Some of your whites, in their wantonness, were
robbed of their horses, by some of the western Indians.
A quarrel ensued, and some whites were killed.
Governor
Littleton of South Carolina, demanded the
murderers. The Indians treated his demand
respectfully
.
They called a council. They selected
thirty-two
chiefs from among them, of the best blood, and
bravest name, in their nation, and sent them all, as
ambassadors
, mark me, as
ambassadors
, to the
governor
,
to remonstrate, and conclude some treaty,
promising
to deliver the murderers, when they were known,
and caught. And this was all that they could do. These
ambassadors were thrown into prison. Their
countrymen
heard of it, and their proud hearts boiled over at
the indignity. They entered the territory of the whites
for vengeance. What then? these thirty-two
ambassadors
,
coming under the holiest sanction of religion and
law, the law of nations, were imprisoned in a room not
large enough for six persons;
[4]
[4]
See Ramsay.
and then, for this was not
enough, it seemedit was afterwards ordered that
they should be ironed hand and foot, aye, ironed! The
attempt was made, and he who first proffered the
manacles
,
was struck dead at the feet of the Indian. This
was the signal for massacre! the whole garrison fell
upon them, unarmed, and defenceless as they were,
and butchered the whole thirty-two, and threw them
out, to welter and bleed, like carrion, under the beak of
the vulture.'
`There was another affair too, in Pennsylvania,
where a body of helpless Indians, who had given
themselves up to the faith of the government, were
broken in upon at night, even in their place of refuge,
the common jail, and butchered, every living creature,
in cold blood.'
`But I cannot go on. My heart is too fullO, my
lords, believe me. You know us not. You are profoundly
ignorant of our qualities. We are powerful and warlike,
stern, vindictive and implacable, where it is a virtue;
but kind and generous, and devoted to excess, where it
is wise to be so.
`My lords, I tremble for you! You have made us
desperate. Twice, nay three times, have we associated
in a coalition so tremendous, as to involve every living
creature of the whites, in its contemplated work of
wrath; and thrice, almost by a miracle, have you
escaped
,
when our plans were matured, and all the
dangers
of preparation were passed.
`This day, my lords, I have heard language in this
house,thatoh, if I were but one of you for a few
hours, I would lift up my voice like the thunder of
my native hills, and pray you to forbearthis day
have I heard such language, such consummate
misrepresentation
of our rights and history, nay of our very
geography, that I should have been moved to pity and
scorn, were it not that my tears blinded me. Our
continent
has been cut up into islands by one of your
members, and whole provinces converted into lakes
and rivers, by the blundering of your statesmen. You
smile, my lords; I am sorry for it, the solemnity of the
subject wouldbut I forbearI could have wept,
aloud, but
I am an Indian
.
`We have been called Scythians. Call us sowe
bend the bow of the strong man, and our enemies are
sacrificed in blood, and flame. Great names have been
cited, yet I, Indian as I was, I did not tremble. I dare
to evoke the same. Grotius has been cited, yes,
Grotius
,
he who so gravely deduces our relationship to
the Chinese, from a number of ridiculous fables, which,
theory and all, he has stolen from another.
[5]
[5]
Hornius. Orig. Gent. Am. Lib. 1. cap. II. et III.
He says
that wrecks of Chinese vessels are found upon the
shores of the Pacific, that we worship the sun, that we
write,
like the Chinese
, from the bottom to the top of
the page
`Others affect to find traces of the Jewish ritual
among us. Others the customs of Tartary. Others
that we are
Christians
. And others say we cannot be
descended from the
Tartars
, because we have no
horses
!no
horses! because, say they, the Tartars would
have carried their horses with them, even in shipwreck
and storm. Others say that we are from Norway, and that
much of the Norwegian dialect, and German language,
is to be distinguished among us. And others again
would make us Welchmen!But why reiterate such
nonsense. It is only the childishness of learned men.
It is no matter whence we are sprung, from the sun,
or the earth, the whirlwind; or, like Adam, from the
nostrils of the Deity. Enough for us, that the
everlasting
God is our friend. Your Creator is our Creator.
Of the same elements, the same materials, as you are
made, we are made. We have all the same passions,
the same infirmities, and are accountable to the same
God. Are we not also in his image? Woe to the hand,
then, that defaces or pollutes it? But who has done
this?
You, you
have done it.
You
have wronged us,
mocked at us, trampled on us, trodden us in the dust,
rolled us back, nation upon nation, people upon people,
until we know not where to set our foot, or lay our
heads. Beware! Ye have mightily wronged us.
`You complainof what? Because we have made
war upon your wives and little ones. Men! men! would
ye not do the same? How came you upon us? We were
naked and helplessyou, invulnerablewe met you
with bows and arrows; and you wielded the thunder,
hurled the lightning, at our hearts. Was it not so?
Suppose that some people should descend upon you from
the clouds, and literally charge upon you in a tempest
of fire, shod and sheathed and panoplied, from head
to foot in armour, and rain down blood and death upon
you. Suppose that you should be persuaded to receive
them, feed them, watch them; and that in return
you
should be driven back, back, back, forever back from the
fires, and dust and bones of your ancestry, having left no
hunting grounds, no burial places, no land that was
your fathers', would
you
not turn upon them in your
desperation? would you not? Would you not yearn to
requite upon them, living or dying, the evil that they had
visited upon you. Would you spare
them?
or their
old men, or their women, or their children? Would
not the law of
self preservation
command you to their
death? Oh, let me beseech you, ask yourselves. Would
VOL. II. 25
you not lay them waste with fire and pestilence,
grinding
their bones to dust, and giving their ashes to the
wind and water, their blood to the desert?'
`
Such was our case
! Ye came upon us with fire
and thunder; not, it is true, of the clouds, but of the
earth. You arose from the Ocean. Ye sat yourselves
down upon our altars, with our household gods, ate
with us, slept with us, drank of our cup, and ate of
our bread; cheated, poisoned and murdered us. Ye
drove us backward, league after league, into the black
wilderness, where a perpetual rain falls, and the sun
is shut out. Yea, even there, when the solitude and
silence had become supportable to us, even there, you
pursued us; but we were at bay! we turned, we fell
upon
your
tombs,
your
sepulchres,
your
hearths and
fire places,
your
cradles; we spared neither wolf nor
whelp.Tremble.I have done.Tremble!The
vengeance of the Almighty will not sleep forever.I
have doneMy strength, but not my courage, is
exhausted
.
God forgive you, men of England, if you
slight my voice. My voice!it is not mine. It is the
voice of congregated multitudes, of whole nations,
lifting
up their pinioned arms, and shouting for redress.
It is their voice that you hear. Bear patiently with
it. It is their right. Do you righteously with them,
and so as you do unto them, and theirs, this day, may
their God, and your God, do unto you, and your
posterity
,
forever and ever, in the retribution of his power.'
He sat down, overwhelmed and speechless, amid a
general burst of feeling and consternation. The house
literally trembled and quaked with his presence.
Never
had the walls of the Roman capital shaken to such
tremendous denunciation, so original, so majestick, so
wild and vigorous. His front and bearing, the
impressive
action of his limbs, his illuminated eyes, his
gathered
brow, the changing of his cheek and forehead,
the planted tread, and free, lordly motion of his arm
Oh, they were astonished and dismayed at it.
They who, for half a century, had been familiar with
all the sublimity and power of a British senate, in all
its beautiful and majestick proportions; they, who had
been accustomed to having their passions assailed, for
half a century, by wisdom, eloquence, and address,
without effect, without excitement, without emotion;
they, even they, their eyes were flashing, and their lips
quivering, when Harold sank down, like men that are
contemplating a great battle, between giants, within the
solitude of a continent.
Harold faintedand whole years afterward, he
would turn deadly pale, when he thought of what he
had encountered, on this occasion. So it isour blood
will run cold in thinking of a transaction, which, at the
time, scarcely disturbed us.
The effect was, indeed, most flattering. A thousand
officious hands were thrust forward to his support; a
thousand eyes glanced encouragement and delight upon
him. But one countenanceone, the first that he saw
when he awoke, one that he never forgot, it haunted
him to his last moment, its awful front, so high, so
full of composure and solemnity, so steadfast, so
dignified
,
a face for Michael Angelo to dream of, so
mild, and old, and resolute, and august, oh, I cannot
describe it
that
countenance was nearest to him.
`Young man,' said a voice, bending over him, `when
you have recovered, you will follow this gentleman.'
Harold bowed, he could not speak, there was such
an air of royalty about the retiring presence, that he
could have sworn it to be of the blood of kings.
Harold was mistaken. The princely stranger was
not even of the nobility. But he was more. He was a
man, a statesman, one who watched and revered the
first working of greatness in the young.
Harold followed his conductor. They arrived at a
magnificent old-fashioned pile, so retired and built
round about by trees and walls, that, but for the court
yard, thronged with splendid equipages, Harold would
have believed himself approaching some battered
fortress
of gone-by days, that had withstood the
tempestuous
visitation of battle and earthquake, wind, age,
and thunder.
His guide passed on, looking neither to the right
nor the left, through a long antichamber, crowded with
well dressed people; and Harold followed him,
breathing
with difficulty, and feeling an awe that he would
have blushed to confess, at the presence of so much
parade and ceremony. His guide too, youthful and
kind as he was, appeared to move with more
stateliness
,
and tread with a less vascillating emphasis, as
he passed through the throng of anxious eyes and
throbbing hearts, and approached the abiding place of
the great man. Nay, was not that action of his hand,
that careless nod, somewhat haughty, arrogant,
supercilious
?
Was he one of those who reward with smiles,
because they are too dastardly of spirit to frown? No,
he and his master were alike. They gave the whole,
or nothing.
One more step, only one more, and Harold stood
before the stranger. His presence was unexpected, it
seemed, for the latter appeared to thrust something
into his bosom, with a little trepidation, as he looked
round.
`Young man,' said he, `sit down; Mr. Morville
will call in an hour for his instructions.'
The conductor bowed, reverentially, affectionately,
and departed. The stranger took out his watch, looked
at it, `three quarters, yes,' said he, in a low voice, and
then laying it on the table, repeated in a louder tone,
`I have just three quarters of an hour to devote to you.
Tell me who you are? what? whence? your pursuits,
temper, and views. Treat me as your friend, as if I
had known you from your birth. If I find you
deserving
,
I can, and will be of service to you. You have
astonished me to-day. But that is not sufficient to
satisfy me. It is easier to astonish, than to reason, to
electrify than to convince. Make it appear that you
are, what I think you are, and I am your friend.'
Harold bowed; he was unused to such majestick
kindness and frankness. He told his story, however,
distinctly
,
bravely, with all that natural and burning
energy
,
so eminently his own. The other's eyes darkened
with pleasure. He had never witnessed aught that
resembled
this. It was a colloquial power, of such direct,
downright, intrepid promptitude, that it amazed him.
Harold was naturally modest, very graceful, and full
of energy. His language was sometimes, and
particularly
on this occasion, bold, accurate, and singularly
beautiful.
`It is very remarkable,' said the truly great man, as
in a revery, when Harold had finished, `there is one
thing that you have omitted. I remind you of it. If it
be an unintentional omission, say so, at once. I shall
pursue you no further. No matter what may be your
motive; I shall respect it. But, if you
can
answer me,
and
will
, I shall be gratified. I would have no half
confidence. Enable me to say that I
know you
.'
`I will withhold nothing from you sir,' said Harold.
`Well thenyour family name, birth?' as he said
this, his eagle eye glanced upon Harold, with a
peculiar
and mysterious earnestness of expression.
Harold replied distinctly to both questions, watching
his countenance the while. No emotion was visible,
none! in his great forehead; but his noble chest heaved
slightly, at long intervals, as with some deep and
ancient
recollection.
Tears, gracious heaven, tears.
It was too true. Harold could have fallen upon his
knees before the august creature, but he waved him off.
`Leave me awhile,' he said, `the time has expired.
There is my hand. I am your friend. I knew your
father. (His voice trembled.) Come to me, to-morrow,
at the same hour.'
Harold obeyed, and the next day, precisely at the
moment, stood again, at the door of the chamber. He
was instantly admitted.
`Harold,' said the mysterious man, after a
distressing
silence of some minutes, during which he sat
leaning
upon a table, with his face buried in his hands, and
his dark hair moving of itself, over his wrought and
agitated brow.
`Harold, come nearer to me. I knew your father
Hush, we must not be overheard. We will retire to
that closet.'
`Harold followed him thither, and they were seated.
`We were school fellows,' said he. `He had the
elements
25*
of a disorderly but great nature within him.
There was no boy that bid so fair to be great, as your
father. I trembled in his presence. I was afraid of him;
and no
man
ever made me afraid. He carried
authority
and dominion in his very tread. We had a quarrel.
It was on my account
'
He paused. The working of his forehead spoke
grievously of what he had suffered; there were grief,
sorrow, and passion in its movement, sullen and
distant
,
and indefinite, however, like shadows painted from
recollection.
`It was on
my
account that he left England
forever-'
Here the speaker's voice trembled, and his whole
frame shook; he arose and walked, several times across
the apartment, struggling tremendously with some
unintelligible feeling, and exclaiming at last
`No, no, I
cannot
.'
Harold was amazedsuch perturbation in such a
countenance! Why, it was as if some pyramid had
grown tremulous with the stirring of its buried, blasted
and withered inhabitantsthe spectres of the past.
`I read your astonishment, sir,' said the speaker, `I
do not wonder at it. I have deceived myself, mightily,
mightily
there are embers among the dead ashes,
here,
here
. Nature will arise, and will be heard, though
you bury her with years and snow, yea, though you
pile upon her the affairs of an empire. At this moment,
(he dashed his hand over his eyes, as he spoke, and
frowned, as at his own weakness,) `the warmest,
noblest
,
most romantick feelings of my youth have arisen,
like spirits. They have touched me, and I thrill from
head to foot. I feel as if a score of years were
suddenly
taken off my heart; as if the darkness were suddenly
brushed away from the beautiful tablets of memory,
and all her first record and inscription were
illuminated
.'
He still continued walking about, in great disorder,
but at length stopped, abruptly, before Harold, saying,
as to himself, `boy, boy, how like his father. Yes
Harold, Harold is thy name, I think, (Harold bowed,)
thou
art
like thy father. Woe to thee. It were better
that thou hadst never been born. It were better to herd
with the vilest, weakest, the most abject and insensible,
forever, than be wrung by one such pang as
we
feel, daily, hourly, even in our pride of power. No
sympathy, no affection, no holy consecrated sweet
communion
of the heart, no stillness, no solitude, are ours.
We have nothing in common with our fellow-men,
nothing in love or friendship, nothing but the incessant
cold, and lifeless glitter of ceremony and pomp.
Boy! beware of thy nature.
Trample down the fierce spirit that I see in thine eyes.
Wrestle with it, subjugate it. We are always tyrants
or slaves. Choose thou, this day, which of the twain
thou wilt be. But time passesIt is the last time, too,
that we shall meet. I dare not trust myself with thee.
I would fain do somewhat for the son of my earliest
friend, and, if possible, teach that son how to avoid
the melancholy consequences of his own nature. Sir,
your intrepid, fearless, resolute, adventurous manner
is alarming to me. True, it has that bearing of noble
confidence, which only the generous and great can
feel, what no human being can affect or counterfeit; but
it is dangerous always, and often fatal. Harold, I could
have come down from my seat and embraced thee,
yea, knelt with thee, upon the floor of parliament, had
not this apprehension disheartened me. But stay'
`Your father, as I have said before, was my friend.
I was his. We loved the same woman. But we knew
it not. He was haughty and implacableI would not
go on, but the truth
must
be told,
shall
be. He married
her, married the woman of my heart! (he covered his
face with his hands, and his fingers were convulsed
upon his temples.) It was that,
that
which made me
what I am, a
wretch
, of kingly power and dimensions,
it may be, but a
wretch. That
marriage kindled a
spirit
in me, which has blazed for thirty years, is blazing
yet, will blaze, while there is life enough in these vitals
to feed it.'
`About a year after his marriage, and after the
birth of Oscar, I saw his wife. We had loved. I know
not that I ought to blame George of Salisbury; but
though he did not unfairly win her, yet I lost her
unfairly
.
I saw her, for I was going to the continent,
with the intention of bidding her an eternal adieu. We
discovered that she had been wrought upon, cheated,
and betrayed, not by
him
, I verily believe, but by her
relations. The whole conspiracy came out in our
interview
;
she was agitated to tears, pale as death. We
heard his footstep. I knew it not, but she did, and
fainted. I caught her in my arms, her dishevelled
tresses floatinggreat God! I cannot go onSuffice it
to say that he assaulted me, wounded me, and left
her
for dead upon the floor. He fled; we knew not where,
but we soon discovered that a devil had been his ruin,
the devil jealousy. I had kept my attachment to his
wife before her marriage, a secret; whether wisely or
not, it is now too late to determine; and she, too, had
adopted the same secrecy. Believe me,
our
reasons
were good. Your father was actually married before
I knew the name of his wife, (I had known her abroad,
in Spain, for she was born of a Castilian mother,) and,
when I discovered it, I was stunned, blinded, as by a
clap of thunder. She had been treacherously wrought
upon, and, in an evil hour gave her hand to him, at
the same moment, burying my name and memory in
her heart, never, as she thought, to be again disturbed.
Such is an outline of our reasons. But your father knew
them notall that he knew, was the prompting of some
fiend, who persuaded him of his wife'scurses! ten
thousand curses on him, and his, for the insinuation!
her infidelity. He watched us, attributed our
accidental
meeting, for it was purely accidental on her part, and
almost so on mine, though I had long wished it, to
premeditation
.
Butyou know the rest.'
`Your father fled, to America, it seems now, for,
many years after I have reason to believe that he
reappeared
for a season, with some fell purpose of
revenge
,
and that he was appeased by his desolate wife.
I never saw her afterward. I knew her pure spirit,
her exalted nature too well, to hope for aught in
my
favour, although we had been assured of his death.
She never could, never would have married me, though
she loved me, and would have died for me, after an
event so disastrous and malignant. She gave birth to
another daughter, in her retirementthat sigh! ah,
she was the very picture of her mother, so gentle, so
beneficent, so beautiful, timid and pureOh, my
heart, my heart fails meI could throw myself down
and cry like a child, at the memory of what the mother
was. I feel, Harold, just as I felt, when we last parted,
in Andalusia, of a starlight evening. I never could
abide the starlight since. Harold, I confess that I am
weak, very weak, but I love thee; I feel as if thou wert
my son for thou art
his
, and he was her husband.
Would that thou wast
her
child! Statesmen are but
men; ministers, disguised as they are, encumbered as
they are, with the parade and pageantry of dominion,
are
but
men.'
`Nay,
our
feelings when touched rightly, in mystery
and power, flow but the more fiercely, for the
unnatural
secresy and restraint in which they have been held.
I have now done. You have heard all. What can I do
for you? The army? the navy? a post? are your
circumstances
easy? Are you ambitious? You are, and
there is my hand. The world will have it soI will
make your fortune. And yetfor
there
I spoke like
a man of the world, a politican
now
I speak like a
father
I could almost go down on my knees to thee,
my son, and pray thee to turn thy back upon my offers.
Refuse them, and thou wilt be happy. Accept them,
and thou wilt be great, great as the world goes, but
wretched, wretched!'
Harold replied, modestly and firmly; thanked him,
and declined all assistance, all countenance.
`Your reasons, Harold?'
Harold gave them, in his temperate, assured way;
and the minister embraced him, and wept upon his
neck.
`Boy!' he cried, with enthusiasm, his old eyes
sparkling
through their lashes, like lamps abruptly kindled;
`thou art an honour to thy name and house. Bear that
spirit with thee, to thy grave. Go back to America.
Be
there
, as thou art here, the friend of the Indian
his champion. God prosper thee!embrace meagain!
there! there! farewell!'
Harold turned to depart, when the great man
embraced
him a third time, and buckled upon his thigh
a magnificent sword. `Wear that,' said he, `in memory
of me.'
CHAPTER X.
How changeable is man! Harold had withstood,
resisted
,
derided all temptation, in the presence of a
monarch, for the power of him that he had left, was
that of a monarch. Royalty was upon his forehead,
command in his tread, and greatness in his hands.
While there,
there
, in the very abiding place of
Ambition
,
whom he had so long idolized,
there
, he had
resisted her dominion, and taught her to cower before
him. With this feeling, he had descended, and trod
through all the glittering retinue of the audience
chamber
,
and court, with the stately, free step of a native
Indian; but, as he approached his own home, a deep
sigh escaped him, it is in vain to deny it, and a half
articulate wish that he had taken a little time for
consideration
.
`But perhaps, perhaps, he will repeat his
offer,' said he. O, how changeable is man!
`Come hither, Elvira,' said he, as she met him, with
open arms, and parted lips, at the door`and let me
tell thee all.'
He did tell her all, and her heart palpitated aloud
at the recital. The fame of his eloquence had already
reached her in his absence, and was yet ringing, like
musick, in her ears. She had just left her chamber,
where she had been weeping with joy and
thankfulness
.
`How proudly thou standest before me,' said she,
as he locked her arm with his, and she
felt
then, as if
she could have gone abroad, and heard it
proclaimed
through all the world, by the sound of trumpet,
that he,
he
was her chosen one`Behold him,' she
dia
say, `how calm he looks, and yet, he hath just shaken
a British senate with the thunder of his eloquence!
This pale, pale brow hath just been elevated, amid the
princes and magnates of the land!'
A few days more, and it was determined that they
would marry, as men and women should marry, in
silence, and apart from the world. Harold detested
the shameful fashion of marrying before a mob, but
still more, the indecent practice of exhibiting your
wife to strangers the day after marriage, that day of
all others, which ought to be most exclusively given
up to love and tenderness; when each is most eager
to be near the other, to give and impart consolation,
which, to the loving and beloved, who see omens in
everything, while the heart is too full for company, and
too happy and too distressed for parade or compliment,
is so apt to be taken for an epitome of their new life. O,
it is a shameful, a brutal profanation, to exhibit a pale
and trembling girl, sick, sick at heart, with expectation
and disappointment, and anxiety, while she is ready to
sink into the earth with her newly awakened emotion,
to the cold, saucy, and significant observation of
gossips
,
gossips, with, or without petticoats. Strange! but
woman, the lovliest, meekest, and most helpless, will
brave it out, yea, submit to that, before a multitude of
ruffian strangers, which she would shrink from at home,
among her brothers and friends. How often will you
see a delicate creature exposing her bosom, naked, to a
herd of coxcombs, and fools, and profligates, at a
fashionable
party, who will sit at home, at her own
tea-table
,
among them that she loves, covered to the
shoulders
,
and muffled to the chin!
But why preach against such indecency? Is it not
the
fashion?
and although the tamest spirit
acknowledges
that
fashions
are generally set by fools,
and are generally absurd and ridiculous, and invented
only, like the tricks of masonry, to distinguish the
patricians
,
who, heaven knows, have generally most
patrician
brains withalthatthatbut no matter, it is
idle to talk against their dominion.
The following Thursday was to be the day. It was
now Sundaythe day of peril and trial, consternation
and dismay; for who does not feel all this, who
reflects
on what duties he is about to undertake? to cleave
unto his loved one, forever and ever, to comfort and
sustain her, watch over her, instruct, and bless her.
O, such a vow is enough to make one tremble!
It was determined to have the ceremony performed
privately, and then, that the new couple should
immediately
set off for Dover, and then to France.
It was near evening. Harold was sitting in his
room, the room that Oscar had occupied. It was all in
a glow, with the flooding sunset. He was leaning upon
his hands; a strange, sweet melancholy filled his heart,
up to the very brim. A few bright tears trickled
through his fingers. It was delicious, and Harold
indulged
the feeling, like one that listens to a low,
inward
,
mournful musick, till it operates upon the heart,
and his very breathing is an echo. A light, soft step was
approaching; it hesitated, hurried, paused, as if
doubtful
of the reception. `Elvira,' cried Harold, leaping
from his chair, and catching her delicate hands, and he
would have touched her forehead, perhaps her lips,
as usualbut why paused she? what withheld him?
O, how sensitive are lovers! Her manner was kind,
very kind, and her countenance but slightly altered;
yet Harold, as he looked upon it, shivered all over,
and was unable to speak. A distressing silence
followed
;
her eyelids were thrown down, and he knew not
what to say, or think. Not an hour had passed, since
they parted, and
she
, all light, and love, and
tenderness
.
He was silent, first, from inability to speak; and
he continued so, because he was wounded, his
affection
and dignity were wounded. They sat down.
Harold
breathed not, moved not, he felt as if some
tremendous
evil was about to overwhelm him, but of what
nature, or whence, he had no conception.
`Harold,' said Elvira; `
dear
Harold.' (She
disengaged
her hands gently, as she said this, and spoke
with a faint, quiet, but very deliberate voice,) `
we must
part
.')
`
Part, Elvira
,' cried Harold,' seizing her hands
with a wild crya shriek!another answered him! He
had heard it before. All his sufferings broke in
lightning
,
over his brain! He covered his face. He knelt to
her!he pressed her cold hands to his lipkissed them
over and over again, and wept upon them. `O, Elvira,'
he sobbed out at last, `O, Elvira, O, it cannot be!'
`Hear me,' she replied, faintly, `hear me, arise, let
me proceed. Be prepared for every thing. Your first
love, she whom you have wept as dead, dishonoured
Loenanay, nay, dear Harold, not
so
wildly, pray
be more composed, do not look so wildly upon me,
nay, nay
, let me soothe thee,
she is alive
.'
`Alive!' cried Harold!' she! O, where is she? let me
fly to her. No, no,
no!
wretched girl, no! would that
she were dead! O, forgive me, Elvira; I would comfort
her
for thy sake
but I will not see her; I cannot.'
`Yes, Harold, thou
canst, and shalt
. She is worthy
of thy lovethere!'
Harold fell senseless upon his face, and when he
recovered
,
his head was upon Elvira's knees, and she
was chafing his temples; he opened his dark eyes, but
shut them again instantly, and his brow darkened
with some mournful thought, or some deep, deep,
pain.'
`She is still devotedly thine' (Harold pressed her
hand, and her tears fell like rain upon his face)`She
was your first love, your only love. You have never
loved but one, Harold, as you are capable of loving,
I mean.'
`Elvira! do not, do not blaspheme.'
`O, my dear Harold,' said Elvira, bashfully leaning
over him, while her delicate lids quivered with excess
of tenderness over her lamping blue eyes, `how I
have loved thee, God only knows! Thou hast been a
religion with me, my dream by night, my prayer by
day. Harold hath haunted me, forever. Gradually,
for who can withstand the incessant solicitation,
allurement
,
and importunity of her fancy,
gradually
have I
brought myself to associate all my hopes of happiness
here and hereafter, with
thee
, and
thine
. I dreaded to
VOL. II. 26
do this, yet I did it. My heart had been broken once
before, but now, it was to be reduced to powder, dust,
and ashes. Nay, nay, Harold, I entreat thee not to
interrupt
me. This may be our last meeting. Why dost
thou cling to me so? I am doing only what thou wouldst
dowhat thou knowest, is right.Thou wilt
go to thy dutyIIto mineI.'
`And, now, O, Harold, now, that we are about to
part, for I have
determined
, and nothing on earth can
move menow I am at
liberty
to speak, and my heart,
swollen to bursting with the fountains of its
tenderness
for thee, will no longer bear this darkness and
concealmentbehold! it discharges them now, without
shame or trembling! O, Harold, Harold, how I have
loved thee! better, ten thousand times better than light,
or life, or reputation. Thou hast been to me, all in all,
my friend, lover, husband, father, and even my God!
for all were forgotten when thou wast near me. O,
Harold, thou dear one, may she love thee, as I have
loved thee'poor Elvira's passionate emotion had
gradually
increased, until she sobbed aloud, as she
concluded
.
Harold knelt to her, and threw his arms about her,
in wonder and consternation, dreading it as a dream,
yet dreading to awake, and shivering all over, while
her temples throbbed against his, and her hot tears
fell into his bosom.
`It is too much, too much, by heaven!' he cried, `I
shall go distracted. Woman! woman! am I mad? or
art
thou?
where am I? who art thou? whom do I hold
in my arms?'
`Calm thyself, dear Harold,' said Elvira, raising
her sweet face, amid her dishevelled tresses. Be
happy
thyself, and thou wilt make me happy. Thou wilt
say, when thou art happy, very happy in her, her
arms
,
let us bless Elvira! O, think Harold, what a wretch,
what a vile and execrable wretch, thou wouldst have
had for a companion, for a sharer of thy glory and
heart, if I had usurped wittingly, a heart like thine,
while its lawful and abused tenant was ready, after the
exile of many a year, to re-inhabit it. By heaven! nay,
thou must, and shalt hear me! O, do not, do not press
me to thy heart so franticklyO, do not, there,
release
me, hear now my confession, and remember it.
It will be a comfort to thee, in thy dying hour, and
Harold, O, believe me, even thy great heart will have
need of comfort, in that hour! I have been wicked,
very wicked. I have prayed, yes, prayed for the death
of Loenayes, I deserve it, but do not kill me with
these looksforbear a while, I shall not troublethee,
nor
her
, long. I have prayed that
thy
heart might be
alienated from her. But I repented. I set an inquiry
on foot, and after years of toil and perplexity, I am
able to say, thank heaven! thank heaven! that
she is
innocent
,
and loves thee yet. And well for her, that she
does, for I should hate her else. Harold, I have told
thee that I did love thee; and I now tell thee that I
love thee
now
, to adorationthat I never have loved
any other human being as I love thee, that I had hoped
to live here, and hereafter, within the circle of thy
arms.
There
was to be my paradise, nay, more'
A faint blush passed over her beautiful neck, and
was followed by a deadly paleness, and her eyelids
drooped
`I have dreamt, and I know not why I should shame
to confess it, thatthat I had borne children to thee
that we weremerciful heaven!and
is
it come to
this, and must we part?'
`Oh, Elvira, must we indeed?' said Harold.
`
We must indeed
, so intermingled too, soour very
existence blended, in spirit, heart, and blood, and
intellect
.
There! I have told it all now, all! My poor
heart is easythe tightness is overI can breathe
freely nowYet think not that thou wouldst ever have
known the extent of my love, but for this determination,
which nothing can alter, that we must part, and
forever
.'
`Judge then, Harold, of the sacrifice that I make, in
parting with thee, to my rival too. I do it, to punish
my transgression, my idolatry. And now, Harold, now,
am I not worthy of thee?'
Harold bowed down before her, bowed down, in the
profoundest adoration. It was the homage of all that
was lofty in his nature, so deep, so awful, that his blood
forgot to flow, as he put his forehead to the earth
before
her, with the movement and veneration of one,
who, prostrate in the lonely solitude, hears musick in
the wind. `Heroick woman,' said he, rising and
standing
majestically before her, with his dark eyes flashing
rivulets of light, `I never knew thee till this hour!
But now, I do know thee. Take me, even as I am,
take me, and let us be happybutno, no, if
that disturb thee, I will not even ask that. Let me be
worthy of
thee
. Let us live and die in martyrdom to
our love. I do not attempt to shake thy resolution. I
will not. Wert thou one jot or tittle less magnificent,
I should cry outBehold me, me! Elvira, at thy feet,
take me from the earth, retract and bless me! But
now
oh, I could not. I respect, I revere thee too much, to
intercede for myself. I bow, unresistingly, to thy
determination
.
For myselfthere is my hand. I cannot
abandon the Indian girl, if she be what she
was
. I
cannot
wed another, while she lives, and is innocent, and
helpless. I must wed her, and love her, and protect
her. She shall die in my arms, or I in hers; for this I
promised her, before I saw thee. I shall be a husband,
and perhaps a father. If I shall be, my babes shall
learn to pray for thee, dear, as the priestess of love,
the divinity of honour. My children shall bear thy
name; and now, while my poor heart is aching, with the
rupture of all its ties, and the derangement of all its
elements, and ready to die, to burst, in martyrdom to
love and duty, my love to thee, thou heroick woman,
my duty to the poor Loena, I can only say, that I have
loved
thee
, even as thou hast loved me, with all that
boundless love and devotion which thou hast
manifested
.
Farewell! For thy sake, dear woman, I will be a
good man, for that is always in our power, and
great
,
if it shall please heaven: a husband, and a father, if I
am so blessed, the kindest and truest,
for thy sake;
farewell! Heaven forever bless and protect thee!'
`Oh, Harold, my heart cleaves to thine yet,' said
Elvira, still weeping, and they embraced, again and
again, treacherous as it was, and then separated, in the
delirium of their spirits. It was passed and done, the
sacrifice accomplished, ere they had once looked upon
it steadily, and learnt to contemplate its appalling
magnitude
,
and then, oh then, like all other living creatures,
their pride, their unwillingness to be the first in
repentance
and atonement, continued to hold them with the
hands of a giant, upon the path which they had so
precipitately
chosen.
They separated; a voice was heard at the door, and
the next moment, angels of heaven! what was it?
something stood before him, a creature, who was it?
the deep, dark, passionate languishing of her eyes,
the sweet and beautiful solemnity of her countenance,
oh surelyShe extended her hands, they shook
slightly
,
and Harold, blinded and dizzy with her
overpowering
presence, caught at it, with shut eyes, and
staggered
to her arms.
He was speechless.
It was, indeed, Loena; her queenly carriage, the
melancholy, black lustre of her eye, the transparent
olive, the jetty tresses, gathering round and round her
low forehead, like matted silk, the perfectly Grecian
outline of her face, the undulating movement of her
neck, that inexpressible something, the first raciness
and purity of nature, ohit was enchantment.
`Can it be,' cried the bewildered Harold, gasping
and choking.
`Well, Harold,' said Loena, timidly, as their cheeks
touched and thrilled.
`Her voice, oh, it is she! the same, the same!' he
cried, unable longer to restrain himself, and falling
upon her neck, `just as we parted last, ah, it thrills
through and through me. And art thou, oh, Loena,
dear,
dear
Loena, art thou mine, at last? Oh, what
have I not suffered. But let me ask theenay, not
nowbut I have ten thousand questions for thee.
`
And can it be
,' he repeated, over and over again,
holding her beautiful hands in his, and standing off
26*
from her with an expression of awe and rapture, till
his eyes danced in their sockets, `
ah can it be?
'
For his soul, he could not utter another word, he
sobbed, and laughed, and clapped his hands, and
shouted
,
hysterically, as all the past, like a tempest of
mingled
cloud and light, came driving over his memory
like the cold rain, falling heavily from a thunder cloud,
in a blue skymingling terrour, and beauty, and
chilliness
.
His countenance changed rapidly, his joints
shook, as with the palsy, and Loena was obliged to lead
him
to a seat.
And sheah
then
, her composure had passed. She
had been prepared for this, he had not. She knew all,
and was on her guard for all, that could happen; but
even she was now overcome. She covered her face,
and leant, could it be otherwise? upon the bosom of
her lord. For a moment, a prompt feeling of fidelity
to Elvira, caused Harold to repel her approach, for
he had been, and would have been
hers
, and hers alone,
but for Loena; but the next, they were locked anew,
anew
, after years of agony, and trial, and separation,
in each other's arms.
`Oh, Harold,' said Loena, after several attempts to
articulate her joy, `but no, no, I cannot speak. I am
still, still the Indian girl, my heart is too full; and yet,
it is a pity but thou shouldst know, what I might
never
have told thee, but for our separation, that Harold I
do
love thee, wicked as thou art, I
do
indeed.'
CHAPTER XI.
Thus
passed, hour after hour, between Harold and
Loena, while Elvira was weeping in her room.
`
Can
there be such desolation, such wretchedness
in doing rightly?' said she, as she parted her wet hair,
and suffered her thin hands to fall, lifelessly, into her
lap, `and yet, was I not prepared for all this? Do I
envy her? Oh my poor heart, art thou indeed bursting?
Well burst, burst, the sooner that thou art insensible, the
better. Oh, is it not bitter, very bitter, to be forgotten,
so utterly, and so speedily?'
But Harold, himself, entered, and put a stop to these
meditations. Loena was hanging on his arm, so fondly,
so modestly, yet with such an assured expression of
comfort and repose, that Elvira, though she smiled
faintly at her approach, could not bear to look upon
her, and turned away, in tears.
`There!' said Harold, gently detaching Loena's arm
from his, `there! that is the woman who has given me
to thee!'
Loena knelt, while her dark eyes filled with
tenderness
and lustre, and put her forehead to the hem of
Elvira's
garment.
Elvira raised her sweet, noble face. It was very
touching, and sad, yet altered beyond expression,
within
a few short hours. Her eyes, too, they that were
wont to glitter, like revolving sapphire,
they
were now
of a dim wintry blue; and her fresh lips were languid;
her
`How changed,' sighed Harold, putting his hand,
softly, upon her head; but the smile, and the tearful,
gentle upbraiding of her lifted eyes, as she put up her
hand and pressed
his
, as it lay there, were almost fatal
to his resolution.
Harold proceeded; but Elvira, who saw, or
suspected
something of his purpose, would have prevented
him.
`No, no,' said he, `she shall know all,
all
, even at the
peril of losing her.'
His brow darkened in terrour, as he said this, for he
remembered the words of Loena. Were they
portentous
?
he faltered; but, after a momentary struggle,
continued
thus, with a solemnity that alternately chilled
poor Loena to the very heart, and sent her blood, like
flashes of scorching fire, over her temples
`Know, my beloved,' said he, `my
first
love, thou
who hast come to take possession of thy lawful
inheritance
,
my whole heartthatknow that, thatbut for
this noble creature,
this!
thou wouldst have found it in
the possession of another, yea, even of herself. Another
week had been too late. I was to have been her
husband
.
I see thee turn pale; I remember thy words. I
use no concealment with thee. I see my destiny, and
yet, yet Loena, thou shalt know it all. Thou, perhaps,
wonderest at my constancy and love for theewonder
no longer. Both were offered up to herboth, I could
have crushed and trampled on(for I believed thee
unworthy)and
both
would I have offered up to her,
but she turned back the offering, and nowgracious
heaven, Loena, what ails theespeak to me, dear; O,
speak to me!'
`I cannot speak, I cannot, I am choking. Leave me,
leave, I must be alone. Woman! lady! Elvira, let me
embrace theeno, no, no! my pride is over and gone
O, bless thee, bless thee! O, my poor heart! my
brain, dear Harold! my brain, my heartnay, nay, let
me lean on thee awhilethereI have now subdued
my feelingwe will meet this evening. I must be
left alone till thenI would meditate, and pray.'
She departed; and Elvira accompanied her. But how
passed Harold these hours of absence and trial? O,
ask him not. All about him was black as death. The
earth itself, felt unsteady to his tread, and the sky was
a tremulous vault, seeming about to pass away, as he
looked upon it. The thick sweat, like that of the
charnel
house, oozed out of his flesh. All the colouring of
nature ran together. All her sounds and sights. His
heart grew cold within him, and his pulse was sudden
and fitful, like an artery discharging its thickest and
hottest blood. What a fate was his! to play the hero,
and die for it! to be magnanimous and great, and
wretched! Where was he to find rest?
Where a companion, a friend, who could
understand
,
and glory in his character? Where, that
unwearied
one, whose dear eyes would be always seeking
hiswhose bosom would, forever and ever, be his
abiding
place, aching only when he, its lord, was not
leaning
upon itO, where, where, was he
now
to turn?
But they met again. The manner of the ladies was
essentially changed, and yet it was mysterious and
unsatisfactory
.
They, and wo to them who are without
such infirmities, wore a stately, artificial, and
very
polite
deportment toward each other, in which there was
nothing
in the world for one to complain of, unless, that
it was just exactly the manner that was least worthy of
both, on such an occasion. But they were sick and
uneasy
,
not perhaps with jealousy,
exactly
, because that is
such an oriental sort of passion, that it would hardly do
to charge such northern ladies with it; but no matter,
was it not strange? One had voluntarily resigned him,
and begged to be forgotten, and the other held him in
the very core of her heart, and yet each trembled with
apprehension of the other. And Harold too, discharged
as he was in his allegiance to Elvira, while his eyes
wandered alternately, from one to the other, as in search
of some kind greeting, felt a strange uneasiness in
betraying
his affection for the newly found, and a deeper
disquietude and unwillingness, to be near the newly
lost.
But Loena was an altered woman. The lifted
forehead
,
and the deep, deep languishing of her dark eyes
had passed; her head was bowed now, and the lids and
lashes were surcharged no longer with their shadowy,
tremulous lustre, but with tears. Yet her voice, and the
transparent olive of her complexion, except that a little
more of trembling mournfulness, at times, in one, and
the alternations, from the deepest crimson to a
death-like
paleness, in the other, were more frequent than
formerly
,
were just what they were, when he left her in
America. Every movement was an effort now, and
there were moments when Harold was sure that she
could not open her lips, without a sob.
`Harold,' said she, at last, when they were alone,
(
putting her hand affectionately into his
) I cannot yet
inform thee of my
determination;
and before we renew
that
subject, it is my duty to deal as sincerely as thou
hast, and relate all that has happened to me. You have
not forgotten the young officer?'
A quick carnation flashed over her whole face and
neck, as she said this, and her eyes, although cast
down, shot forth ten thousand expressions, that Harold
felt in his very brain.
Harold nodded in silence; but his heart beat
hurriedly
,
and he averted his face.
`He persecuted me cruelly, bitterly, after you had
departed
,'
continued Loena; but I found a protector. The
count was like a father to me. And his family, O, how
deeply do I feel their kindness! To them, it is owing
that you see me what I am now, a living woman. They
saved my life! yes, Harold, and what is dearer than
life, they saved me, or rather the count himself, old as
he was, at the peril of his life, saved me, fromfrom
dishonour.'
Harold leaped into the middle of the floor, and the
blood started from his nostrils, but he said nothing,
nothing
,
although his breathing could have been heard in
the next house.
`Harold, I tremble for thee; these bursts of passion
will be the death of thee. But this is not all. I owe yet
greater obligations to my mother, the good countess.
She taught me
to forgive
. She taught the Indian girl
to be meek and humbleHarold, let me pray thee to
be so, too. In short, I was educated as their child. We
suffered cruelly at your silence; but, at length, we learnt
the capture of the vessel; and just about the same time,
the count was recalled, in displeasure, by his king,
and, I was left, dependent almost upon the charity of
a noble, destitute, and desolate family. Merciful
heaven!'
`Loena, dear, why that cry? What means it?'
`Can it be possible,' continued Loena; turn thy
head round again, a little further; there, there, no, not
so farwhat a resemblance!'
`Pray, what means this?' said Harold.
`Hast thou a brother, Harold? What an astonishing
resemblance! and how strange too, that it never struck
me before; but thou art so altered since we parted.'
`No, dear, none. I have no brother, no sister.'
But Loena continued, gazing at him; `no brother!'
said she, running on, in French and English to
herself, as if unconscious that she was overheard,
and not heeding him at all`
en verite
so
exceedingly
alike
ma foi!
no brother, none,' and then
abruptly
addressing him`O, que j'en suis fch.'
`Pray, place thyself so againreally, I must have a
sketchJe ne saurais m'en passerthere! why, it is
Oscar himself!'
`Who? what?' cried Harold, awakening all at once,
as from a trance;' `what is is the meaning of all this?
What
Oscar?
Who is he? Didst thou know him? my
brother!'
`Hadst thou a brother, then?' said Loena.
`Alas!poor OscarI had!'
`Poor Oscar!' she exclaimed, clasping her hands,
and uplifting her dark, wonderful eyes, streaming with
lustre, and light, and tears, to heaven`poor Oscar!
O, where is that hero? Kind heaven, where is he? O,
I would follow him the wide world over, barefooted,
and aloneI'
Harold's arm, which, till this moment had encircled
her waist and supported her, here fell lifelessly at his
side!Pourquoi?`Il faut ou qu'il reponde, ou qu'il
dise pourquoi!'
`And didst thou love him?' said Harold, faintly.
`Love him! O, yes, with all my heart and soulyet
stay, Harold, stay, now I bethink myself, not as I have
loved
thee
O, no! butwhere is he? Thy voice now,
thy very eyes remind me of himtears! what has
befallen
him? Nay, nay, do not look so upon me. What
have I done? Unlock thy hands, dear; I pray thee
do;
throw up the windowO, what have I done? Who is
Oscar? and where is he?'
`In his gravethe ocean,' answered Harold,
convulsively
.
`
Where
is he? Shudder, woman; he is
standing
at the judgment seat of the Eternalsuicide!'
`What, dead! dead!' shrieked the Indian girl.
A rattling was here heard from the study, and, the
next moment, the sound of some person falling. Harold
rushed in, and found Elvira utterly senseless, but just
opening her eyes, through her dishevelled and
encompassing
tresses, like one suddenly struck with delirium,
by some unearthly cry.
`Dead! poor Oscar!' she whispered wildly, and by
starts, `dead! where! when? poor Oscar! there! there!
he struggles! O, the ship! the ship! mercy!'
`And is he really dead?' said the Indian girl,
looking
up to Harold, while she held the poor blinded,
desolate
Elvira 's head upon her bosom.
`Yes, and destroyed himself,' answered Harold,
solemnly
.
`No! impossible. I know him too well for that. He
would never forget his first attempt; his miraculous
preservationhis'
`What meaning is there in thy words? I tell thee,
Loena, that I saw him; I, with my own eyes, leap
overboard at midnight, among the white foam of our
ship's track, and vanish, forever and ever!'
`Overboard, a second time?' said Loena, with a
perplexed
and bewildered look, which instantly cleared
up, as she asked him eagerly, `
when
this was?
when
he
leaped overboard?'
Harold told her, to the very moment; the year, and
day. `O, heaven!' cried the Indian girl, with a look of
rapturous acknowledgment`kneel down with me
this moment, Harold! O, thou hast much to be
thankful
foryes, yes, kneel dear, the living God is about
to bless thee! and thou too, woman of the mighty
heart, awake, awake, and kneel with us
the man that
you weep for, is alive!
'
`Who? what!' cried Harold.
`Oscar! Oscar himself is alive, at this moment, I
have no doubt, for he survived his mad plunge. It is
not long since we met. Look to the lady!'
`Art thou mad?' cried Harold, putting his hands,
terrified and trembling, upon Loena's brow.
`Mad! mad!' answered Elvira; `who is mad?
Oscar
,
where art thou? Come to me, loveis the foam
over thee? I will wash it offthe sea-weed binds thee,
dearmy hands shall untangle itIs thy hair frozen
and matted? O, I will thaw it in my bosomcome,
Oscar, come to me, love. Where art thou? O, speak
to me! O, yes, yes, yes, I
am
mad, very, very mad,
and weary, and wretchedO, I would give the world
to diebut no!' she added, rising up and standing
apart, unaided, and alone, with unconquerable, and
irresistible
majesty and self-possession`No!
I am not
mad!
'
`Harold,' said Loena, catching the awful spirit that
illuminated the countenance of Elvira, `the man Oscar
is livingthe assured resemblance of thee, older, by
many years, scarred too, and'
`Scarred!' cried Elvira, relaxing a little in her stature,
and trembling as she leaned forward, with glittering
eyes.
`Yes, Oscar, he who leaped overboard, at midnight,
on seeing the spirit of his beloved, his own Elvi
gracious
heaven! how blind I am of lateart
thou
that
woman? so proud! oh, thou art an enviable creature!
Yes, yes,
thou
art that cruel, majestick woman, that
wrecked the brain of the bravest and best of men
sent his great heart a wanderer, among the bleak and
barren places of the earth. Oh, can it be, art thou truly
his
dear, dear, dead Elvira?
'
`Yes, I am she. He had reason to believe me dead
reason enough, for I fell once, by his own hand.
But go on, go on, I do not believe thee, yet I do love
to hear thee talk of him, go on.'
`I will. Heaven! what miracles are thesedead,
dead, both of ye, and yet, but no matter. He saw thy
spirit, he says, but he never spoke of his brother,
never
!it
is very strange.'
Harold interrupted her here, for a moment, and
explained
that fact; (and the reader will recollect that
they were not known to each other at the time when
they met.)
`It was a very dark night, was it not?'
`It wasjust beforeand afterward'said
Harold
.
`Wellthe spirit passed before him, he says, and
beckoned to him, and he followed it, walking awhile
on the water, as it appeared to him. The vessel
ploughed
away upon her course; but whether it was, that the
sudden shock of the cold water, as he plunged into it,
or that the loss of blood, which followed from a severe
blow on the temples, which he received from some
floating wood that passed him, (probably thrown over
from the vessel, in the alarm that followed,) restored
him to his senses, he knew not, but he could not have
VOL. II. 27
been in the water long, a few minutes at most, when
the spectre vanished, and flashes of fire went over his
face, hot and scorching, as if the surges themselves
were lava. A preternatural terrour of death arose, at
the same moment, and he gasped, and gasped, in
horrour
and distraction, until he found that he was
sustained
by something, which he had grappled at, in his
delirium. The ship was still in sight; but the clouds
fell down, like a curtain, between her and him; and he
floated about, until, immediately after daylight, the
next morning, when he discovered a vessel, lying to,
at no great distance, with several boats out, fishing.
He was discovered, taken on board, and carried into
Dunkirk.'
`He has often described his feelings to me, until the
sweat stood upon my own forehead, as I listened to
him. At one time, he says, that he distinctly felt the
weight of a heavy, great hand, pressing upon his head,
and others plucking at his feet, in the water. He strove
against them both, and shrieked, and God heard his
shriek; and the next time that he looked upon the
ocean in quiet, it was a mirror of steel, stained with a
shadowy crimson, and undulating beneath the most
beautiful sky that mortal ever prayed to. It was all
round and about him; and the white winged ships,
like some swan-like creatures of the bottomless water,
and blue sky, were constantly emerging from the
horizon
,
coming out of the very air, it appeared,
spreading
abroad their beautiful pinions, and sailing about, in
the wind and light. Ship after ship went by him, thus:
and all was so calm, so beautifully calm, with the wavy
gold, and crimson of sunset, flowing about the smooth
water, like coloured shadows, that every substantial
thing stood and moved like a portent, in its solidity and
blackness. But, why dwell on this? only because the
emotions which arose in
his
heart, the noblestbless
me, Harold, how pale you looksurely noI will not
believe itbut thy brother
had
the noblest heart,
except
thine
, there!will that do? that ever beat. These
emotions were the beginning of his reform.
`He came to Paris. I saw himit was a singular
adventure, and, some day or other, I will relate it
but'
`Nay, Loena,
now
if you please, there never can be
a better time,' said Harold, with a little seriousness.
`Very well: It was at the opera. The count was with
me. He had just been wounded in the sword arm, and
was, nevertheless, deliberately affronted by a young
officer, who did not know him, it was evident. The
count's eyes flashed fire, and I saw him place his hand
upon his sword.'
`I am wounded, sir,' said he, `or I would chastise
you upon the spot, for your insolence.'
`The other bit his lip, scornfully, and turned upon
his heel.
`Your name, sir,' said the count, at the same
moment
handing him his card. The latter was enough
the other turned pale, at first, and then red.
`Sir,' said he, haughtily, I mistook you. I beg your
pardonbut(with a significant look, which made me
tremble in every joint,) you are so well known for an
accomplished swordsman, that I cannot make any
satisfactory
apology to you. You will perceive why. I
shall see you to-morrow.
`As he said this, he was turning to depart, but was
arrested by some person, who lifted his head slowly
in the light, saying
`Boy!and then stopping abruptly
`The officer's lips quivered, and it appeared to me,
that he was struck with terrour;and he paused, as if
rooted to the spot.'
`Go this instant, sir, and beg that gentleman's
pardon.
`The officer obeyed, mechanically, faltered out a few
words, but was so blinded and choked with some
sudden
passion; (for the moment he had commenced his
apology, he seemed suddenly to awake and wonder at
himself) that he turned, his cheeks glowing with shame,
and the tears gushing out of his eyes, and struck the
stranger to the earth.'
`That stranger was Oscar. He arose deliberately
my eyes were rivetted upon him, I knew not why then,
but now I believe that it was his resemblance to
another
.'
Harold smiled.
`The other ladies fainted, but I looked on. He arose
deliberately, followed the young man out, and, as we
heard the next day, disarmed him, broke his sword,
and sent him home, for the second time, humbled to
the earth. Nay, a gentleman, who was present, related
the affair to me. He said that the first thing which
struck him, was the coolness of manner, and the settled
darkness of eye, in Oscar, as he came upon guard.
Next, the astonishing quickness, precision, and entire
correspondence of his eye and hand. And finally, the
melancholy tone of his voice, as he stopped a moment,
before the deadly aspect of his young adversary, his
lids glittering with compassion, in the lamp light,
beneath
which they fought, and said to himself, `nay,
nay, I
will
not kill him, it was a blow, to be sure, but
then, he is young, and very brave, and I must not kill,
nono, no, it is a childish affair.'
`At that instant, the sword flew out of his
adversary's
hand, and Oscar's point was against his breast.'
`The sword was broken, and the young officer, too
passionate to speak, departed in shame and terrour
from before him.'
`Had the sword been shattered in his hand by a
thunderbolt
,
it could not have been more unexpected and
sudden
to us, or to him,' said the gentleman, who informed
me. `And I afterward found that Oscar had been set
upon, some evenings before, by several young men, in
a frolick, four of whom he had compelled to leap into
the Seine, and the fifth, whose life he had spared, was
this very officer. At any rate such was the
story
.'
`But when did
you
see him, dear Loena, when, tell
me?' said Elvira, faintly, as if just awaking from a
long trance.
`About six months since; but, stay, he was then
coming home, for the second time, and, I dare say, is
hereabout, at this very moment.'
`What mean you,' said Harold, `by the
second
time?'
`Nothing more than thisthat he is subject, or was,
until within the last two years, to fits of derangement,
in one of which, he says that he has reason to believe
that he visited the home of his childhood, for, when he
recovered, he found a dagger in his possession which
he distinctly recollected having left upon his table
and'
`By heaven,' cried Harold, kissing her red lips, in a
transport, `
that
was the only thing that troubled me
on earth: to have
that
explained, I would have gone
through fire and water; I was sure that my senses could
not deceive me; oh, I
am
rejoiced, indeed I am. Ah,
Elvira
,
look up, lovemy
friend
I meanthis only was
wanted, to complete our happinesswe must all meet
again, we
shall
!oh, do not weep.'
CHAPTER XII.
Three
weeks after this, Harold had good reason to
believe that Oscar really was in England. How his
heart swelled. Loena was weeping with joy upon his
bosom, and Elvira stood by, like a queen, in her
power
and solitariness.
`Do not go,' said the latter, as Harold prepared to
go again, where he had reason to expect intelligence of
Oscar, `do not go, at least, not yetI know not what
I say, but, thy brother and I are strangers, forever
must continue so, unless'
`Well,' said Harold, `
unless
what?'
`Unless' she replied`I tremble to pronounce the
word. My fate is on it. I am not superstitious, but
some calamity, I do feel assured, is about to befal us.
My brain is so racked and swayed by distracting
emotions
that I have not left the firmness, that is necessary
for this trialindeed I know not what I was going to
say.'
27*
She pressed her hand to her heart, as she said this,
and her eyes grew strangely dim, and her parted lips
vibrated with a quick motion, as if her breath were
drawn
through
her heart; nay, for a moment, she
looked
like some lovely thing, in the extremity of her awe
and sorrowing, suddenly chilled to marble, while the
words trembled in broken, inarticulate murmurs, like
inward musick, from her open mouth, and her
motionless
hands were pressed upon her poor heartthe
haunted cavity, tenantless now, and desolatedark
and silent, to all but the spirit of other days, and his
sweet ministering.
`I must be plain,' said she, at last, `if Oscar be
indeed
alive, and if he be
that
Oscar, the same that I
have known, our fate is sealed. I care not then, how
soon I go to my long home,' (the tears rolled down
her cheeks, as she continued,) `nay, even now, my
brother, for oh, thou
art
my brother, the brother of a
broken hearted womanI could lie down upon my
death bed, and weep myself away to my last, last sleep,
with a feeling of unutterable delight; and oh, if it were
meet for me to die, how devoutly would I kneel down
at
thy
feet, my brother, and pray for death, at this
moment.'
Harold caught her thin, weak hands and pressed
them to his lips, while his tears fell upon them, like
a shower of cold rain; and his Indian girl wiped them
off as they fell, with her beautiful thick hair, and
kissed
her again and again, on the forehead, lips, and eyes,
sobbing herself, all the while, like a distracted
creature
.
The door opened.
A stranger walked into the room. It was twilight,
but he was not to be mistaken. The Indian girl
shrieked
,
and ran forward to meet him; and Elvira sank
down, in silence, powerless, and motionless, upon the
floor. But Harold, heedless of aught but the majestick
presence before him, leaped forward, and extended his
arms.
They embraced, and parted, and the stranger,
motioning
the others to depart, was instantly left alone,
supporting the lifeless Elvira upon his knees.
Did his touch thrill so sensibly? why then, lifeless
as she was, did her flesh tremble, when
he
laid
his
hand upon her forehead?
She opened her eyes, gazed upon him, until their
insupportable dimness made his brain reel, and his
heart sicken, and then he murmured her
name
.
She showed no symptom of recognition, but
continued
gazing upon him for some minutes, like one
that studies the chart of a country defaced by continual
storm and irruption, earthquake and inundation
`Surely,' said she, at last, `surely,'putting back his
hair, and looking into his eyes, with an expression of
reviving intelligence, and then over his forehead, where
the most tremendous inroads of passion and suffering
had been; but the stranger faltered not, a little paler he
might be, but it was evident that he was waiting for
some symptom of recognition, before he told her what
he felt, that he was a dying man, and that his heart too,
was in decay.
Her colour came at last, like a flash of fire, over her
whole face, and she faintly repulsed him; but the effort
was too much for her, and her head sank upon his
bosom
,
and the stranger's cheek was thrilling with the
touch of her mouth, as she murmured
his
name, from
the deepest place of her whole heart, and gave herself
up, entirely, and forever, to the tenderness that gushed
after it.
`Oh, Oscar,' she repeated timidly, again and again,
while her half shut eyes glittered through their tears,
like some dark flowers, opening in the dewy starlight
and shadow.
Oscar arose, and Elvira leaned upon his bosom. His
tread was still undaunted; and there was a sternness, a
sort of reality in his outline, somewhat intimidating,
perhaps, to the visionary and passionate, but not so to
Elvira, not to the heroick and sublime.
Here Harold broke in upon them again, his heart
leaping from his fine eyes, and Loena clinging to him.
But Oscar appeared to shrink from him, not
haughtily
,
as he was wont, but doubtfully; and when he spoke
to him, it was in a voice so deep, so melancholy, that
the blood ran cold at the sound of it.
`Who art thou?' said he, `what is the meaning of
this? who art thou, young man? by what right'
`Still so imperious!' said Elvira, `he is thy brother.'
`My brother!how!' (a rapid, slight convulsion
passed over his face,) `where am I?' he said, as he
gazed upon Harold, who stood awestruck and abashed
before him`at first, I embraced thee, I know not
why. Thou art a stranger to meand yet, thou
seemest
art
thou not? some spirit that I have dreamed of
in my delirium? nightly, yea, nightly, for many a year
of sorrow and wretchedness, in the misgiving of my
heart, and desolation of my soulhast thou, or has thy
visage, young man, haunted me. Art thou indeed my
brother? Speak! What means this yearning of my heart?
Speak to me. Whence this mystery? Have I
approached
thee too haughtily?Forgive me, thou knowest
not how much I have had to make me haughty. Oh,
speak to mebutmaybe thou
art
a spirit, and she,
too, and she, wretched Oscar! Why do you not speak
to me? What have I done? Shall I be as one of you? But
give the sign, and lo, I am disembodied like yourselves.
Oh speak to me. I want a brother. I have always
wanted onetears!nay then, ye are living creatures
forgive me, I entreat you. What have I said to you?
Nothing unkind, I hope.' Here he fell upon his knees.
`Father,' he cried, `forgive me, I am very wretched;
thou hast visited my transgressions upon me, in mercy
and'
Elvira stood breathless, with all her faculties spell
bound, before him.
And Harold, too, stood still, still as death; not a
muscle
moved at this adjuration, not a nerve trembled.
`Arise, brother,' said he, at last, in a firm, low, but
distinct voice, full of manhood and self possession;
`arise! Thou art my brother. I am thine. Thou art
proud, it seems. So am I, very proud. I have thrown
myself upon thy bosomthou hast thrust me from thee
no matter, I forgive thee, I have learned to forgive
men.'
`By heaven,' cried Oscar, leaping into his arms,
`there spoke the blood of Salisbury. Thou art my
brother! I am sure of it! I glory in thee. Thy voice,
thy look, thy emphasis, are all of my father. No other
man on earth ever spoke, or looked, or acted like him.
What is thy name?'
`Harold,' answered Loena, quickly, her countenance
flashing with vivid and intense delight.
`Harold,' said Oscar, `why that seems strange. I
once knew, or thought that I knew, a man of that
name, but where it was, or when, I have forgotten.'
Harold interrupted him, and told him where it was,
and how it terminated; and his brother's face clouded,
as he went on, till his eyes shot lightning. `Yes, yes,
I remember it now; oh, I was a madman then; it is
all here,
here
, burning and whirling yet. But no more
of thisI thank thee. I acknowledge thee. I have
now a brother. I am not alone now, not quite alone, in
the wide, bleak world. Let us kneel.'
He knelt; and who could resist the temptation to
kneel with him? He bowed his great forehead, and
there was in that very movement, so slow, and
reverential
,
a something so awfully impressive, so august,
that, without uttering a word, all felt the unction of a
truly religious spirit, a presence of devout sincerity
doing, like some high priest, his appointed and
acceptable
service, in silence and mystery.
Not a word was spoken, not a single word, but the
whole four knelt together, and arose, with an
unspeakably
deep religious feeling, to the expression of which,
no form, no words would have been competent.
`My brother,' said the stern, implacable man, as he
arose, with his eyes clouded, `my brother, I am
happy
.
I am forgiven. I feel it
here
. I am ready to die
now. I care not how soon I go to martyrdom.'
As he said this, he turned, with a majestick step, to
depart, but his course was impeded by Elvira; he
extended
his hands, and his very fingers shivered with a
mixture of passionate delight and horrour. He was
cruelly disturbed,
that
was evident, and he
undoubtedly
took her for a spirit, as he dashed away the tears
from his eyes, and addressed her in a broken whisper,
as if afraid that, at the sound of his voice, she might
vanish.
`Still there!' he said, `still there; oh, Elvira, just as
thou stoodest once upon the waters.'
Elvira reached out her arms to him, and Oscar, poor
fellow, in the reeling of his brain, and the wild rioting
of his heart, approached, with his arms as wide apart
as he could hold them, as if he caught at some sweet,
airy mockery, that he knew would disappear.
But he caught a living woman in his embrace
`Alive! alive!' he said, shuddering, passing his damp
hand, first over
his
brow, and then over
hers
, as if to
assure himself that, whatever they were, spirits or
substantial
things, they were alike. The thought seemed to
give him pleasure, and he smiled. `But what art thou,
dear?' he said, pressing her temples with his fingers,
and gazing on her shut eyes `do not let me wake;
cheat me forever, and I will forgive thee for all, and I
have suffered muchoh, my brain! Thou'rt very like
her, that's certain, but not so young; no, no, not so
very young and beautiful, but more majestick; say,
dear, what art thoupoor dead Elvira.'
Elvira opened her eyes again, at the sound of her
own name; and, in the delirium of her heart, caught
the hand which yet rested upon her temples, to her
lips, and kissed it eagerly. Oscar almost plucked it
away from her`Woman,' he cried, sternly, `what
art thou? wouldst thou tempt so dreary, so desolate
a heart as mine? Nay, nay, do not weep, I meant not
unkindly, dear; and thou art so like my poor girl, that
I am sure she would forgive me for loving theeI
do
love thee, I do indeed, childHa! her very eyes, open
them upon me, again, love. Indeed, indeed thou art
marvellously like the only human creature, whom I
never spoke or looked unkindly to. Didst know her?
She rifled my proud heart, scorched my brain,
scorched
it to cinders, plundered me of all my treasures,
reason
,
goodness, religion, and left mewhat I ama
maniac, a murderer!
Oh God, have mercy
on me! But yet, unkind Elviyes
that
was her name,
I can bear to speak it, I'm not afraid, no, I will speak
it
Elvira!
there, was it not bravely done?yes, her
name is still dear to me, very dear. Why lookest thou
away from me? Didst thou know her? I'll swear thou
didst, for thou hast caught the very motion of her
lips, the languor of her look, thethe innocent
tranquillity
of her whole countenance. And ohI cannot
spurn thee from me, thou tempter, I
cannot
, as I
would and have, every woman that hath breathed upon
my cheek, since Elvira touched it
yet, yet, do not
weepfarewell; I cannot love thee, farewell.'
He stopped a while, exhausted, and then
recommenced
,
in a tone of more thrilling tenderness, and
melancholy.
`No, there was only one, one, on the whole earth,
of all the countless myriads that heaven hath thrown
in my way, only
one
that I could love, and be beloved
byand she,
she
hath forsaken me. Thou lovest me,
blue-eyed woman; I see it, I were no mortal not to see
it, but beware, thou wouldst abandon me toothy
swimming lidsthunder and lightning!' (He shrieked
aloud, covered his face with his hands, and suffered
Elvira to fall at his feet.) `Merciful God! where am
I? what new dream is this? where am I? in the
dominions
of heaven or earth? what art
thou?
' he added,
firmly
grasping Harold, who, incapable of resistance, from
the suddenness and unexpectedness of the attack, shook
in all his joints, as if he were in the paws of a lion,
`speak! I will be obeyed. Who hath planned all this?
You would drive me mad? wreck me anew, ye cruel
creatures, soul and body, forever and everplunge me
again, up to the eyelids, in hot blood, hot! hot!'
Here Loena interfered and, with a manner, that
showed her to have been familiar with these moods,
laid her soft hand upon Oscar's brow, until he gradually
relaxed his iron hold of Harold.
`Be calm, my preserver,' she said, `oh be calm, be
thyself again. Remember thy vow. Unbend thy
forehead
.
Call up thy noble faculties. That womannay,
look upon me more quietlynow for the trial of thy
manhoodart thou prepared?'
`
I am
,' was the reply.
`That woman then,' said she, `
is Elvira
.'
A silence of some minutes followed, which was
broken by Oscar himself, who observed, in a calm,
dispassionate tone, as if bewildered: `I cannot
understand
.
There is a period of my life, that is a blank to
me. It is alldarkness and delirium; what happened
then, except at intervals, I know not. But I have a
terrible, indistinct recollection, that Elvira is no more
that' (he shuddered, and his very teeth rattled,)
thatI murdered her! Did I! Tell me the truth. I
can
bear
it, believe me. It has been a life, this of mine,
all of shadowy dreaming, fire and smoke; and, in my
memory, all substantial and beautiful things hold an
uncertain place. Give me time to think; this lady
no, no, I will not speak of my beloved in such words.
I will believe thee, I will
there
.'
As he said this, he approached the insensible Elvira,
and pressed his lip to her forehead.
`There! I acknowledge thee, dearest; by that kiss,
I wed thee, love, living or dead.'
She moved.
`Haliving!awake then, awake, lovegive me
our ancient pledge. Then shall I
know
thee, indeed.'
Elvira had just life enough left, to lock her hands
together, and place them in his.
`By heaven, it is true!' he cried, the tears gushing
out of his very heart, for the first time, almost, in his
whole life. `Thou art indeed, my Elvira! mine own! I
believe thee now. No mortal can make me doubt
thee!'
Now then was Oscar happy beyond the reach of
vicissitude
or calamity. He was still belovedstill! and
forgiven too! The woman of his worship was in his
arms. She whom he had so long loved; so secretly too;
had loved him
as
long, and
as
secretly. True, they might
die. They might be torn asunder again. Again, she might
banish his heart, like the doveshutting up the only ark
upon the face of all the waters, to which it could return
but no human being, no, nothing in heaven or earth
could alter the
past
the assurance of her love was like
a fresh fountain, springing out of a barren and rocky
desert to him in his journeying. He had tasted, and
lain himself down by it, willing to die, ere his thirst
returned. O, he
was
happy! Had she not locked her
beautiful hands together, and renewed the pledge of
mystery and love?
Let us leave them. It were vain to dwell upon such
scenes. The full heart, filled to repletion, to bursting,
with unutterable thought, must be left to repose and
languor. Go ye to your dreaming then, ye that have
loved; go, and dream anew of your dearest onethe
touch of lips that thrillthe glance of eyes that weep
for rapturethe sound of a voice that murmurs, like
the musick of a broken harp swept by the wet windgo,
and dream of tears, and whispers, and intertwining
arms, and half-closed eyelids, and the innocent
surrendering
of your whole heart and being to that
beloved one!Go, and believe, as you sit together
about the family hearth; as you worship together at
the well-known altar, where every thing breathes, and
sounds, and
touches
of the friend that you have lost
so hallowed by ten thousand sweet and solemn
recollections
;
so mournful, so tender, that you learn to
believe
that the dear
spirit
is forever about you, forever
near you; watching with you; listening to your voice
gazing into your eyesworshipping with youand
then at night, too, when you are helpless and alone, to
believe that all that you have loved and lost, are
tenanting
your apartment, and praying over yougoGo to
your dreaming, ye that have wandered, and be
forgiven
again! Go, and be restored again, to all that you
have lost. But beware how you awake! O, it is no
light matter to awake from
such
dreams
such!
with
the tempter at your elbow, and the means of
destruction
at hand. O, God! is it not?to awake with the
cold tear upon your cheek, the tear that was warm
VOL. II. 28
but a moment before, and flowed from your
overcharged
eyes, in the fullness of your joyful dreaming!
to awake, and outstretch your desolate arms
toward
the untenanted pillow at your sideto turn
to it, with your heart heaving, and away from it again,
as if struck with sudden deathto awake, ere the
palpitating
of your breast hath ceasedwith all your
arteries
tingling, and your temples sore and aching, with
the trance into which your dream had plunged you;
and find it all cold and dark about youO, there is
no
death
so terrible!
Woman! look at me. Hast
thou
never dreamt of
starlight, and musick, with all the innocent revelry of
the heart? Dreamt that some dear one was weeping
upon thy lipsand awokealone, all, all alone, within
the four walls of a dark, solitary chamber, with
perhaps
no other living thing awake, in the whole world!
Angel of dreaming, why art thou our visitor? Is it
in mercy? or comest thou, like the tempter, to make
men mad and blaspheme, in the suddenness and excess
of their disappointment? Why are they disturbed at
midnight, with parting lips and closing eyes all about
them? and then shaken, by fleshless hands, till they
awake and find, that what they have dreamt of, are
the lips and the eyes of the sepulcre!
And now let us return again to our friends.
Behold
them once more in tranquillitysuch is the reward
of well-doing; such the operation of God's spirit upon
the stubborn and vehement. Oscar's proud nature
is bowed to the earthhe is now the very apostle of
sorrow and humiliation. His high faculties, forgetting
their imperial sway, are no longer blazing about, like
the lighted thunderbolts of heaven, upon all that
oppose
him. No, but they are burning now with a quiet,
mild lustre, like balls of pearl, with a coal in the
centre
.
The fiery and impatient spirit of Harold too, is
curbed and subdued. He is now another, and a nobler
creature. The two brothers are christians now, as well
as men; brave, cool, and wise: and even the untamed,
untameable Loena, hath learnt to bear herself meekly,
amid the encompassing brightness of HER destiny.
CHAPTER XIII.
`Farewell!farewell!'
Par piti, laissez moi mourir!
`Brother,' said Oscar to Harold, as they sat together
one evening, after a day of uncommon activity`I
have a great mind to pay a visit, myself, to America.
Why, how your eyes sparkle! and to tread the very
spot, of which I have heard you talk so much. What
say you? and you? and you?'
`With all my heart! and mine, and mine,' answered
Harold, and Elvira, and Loena, all in a breath
together
`nothing
would be pleasanter,' said Harold, than
to retread the haunts of mymy'
`Of your
love
I knowout with it, brother.'
`No; of my childhood, I was going to say.'
`O, that's altogether the same thing, you know,' said
Elvira, smiling, and faltering too, at the same time.
`Make no stranger of me,' said Oscar, his dark eyes
flashing fire as he spake, `I know it all, all!' (his
countenance
grew dark as he proceeded, and his voice
deeper) `and brother, brother!
I forgive you!
So'
(his face brightened)`no more on that subject. Shall
we go?'
`Yes,' answered Harold, stammering, `I will go. I have
many reasons. I so love that country, that, that, I do
believe
my bones would not lie quietly any where else.
Loena loves that country too, and I hope, I hope that
Elvira has not forgotten it. My father died there
(he shuddered, and his voice was lost, for a moment, in
the suffocating emotion that followed. `O, my
brother
,
what painful recollections, what fearful and
bloody deeds come over my memory again! Upon my
word, I should quake now at the sound of our own war
whoop.'
`I know not,' he added, standing up, with the
Indian
princess at his side, their eyes glittering like dark
jewelryI know not if my heart will ever heave again,
as it hath heaved, in the mountain air, when the shot
rang, peal after peal, among the rocksbut shame!
shame! everlasting shame on the wretch, born of the
blood of Indians, wedded to the blood of Indians, who
would not feel their war cry, when rightly awakened,
thrilling along every fibre, vein, and artery! yea, let us
go. The mighty men of America, our progenitors, are
beckoning to us, and rebuking us. Our minds are
dwindling
here. We are hereO, what are we? useless and
abject. Let us begone. There is our inheritance.
There
our virtues will have scope. Let us go, and be the
friend of the red man. Let us go, and swear a covenant
with the Indian God!'
Oscar first smiled at his enthusiasm, and then hugged
him to his heart. After which, it was soon determined
upon to embark for the new world, not to `live, love,
and die alone,' but to do their duty as
men
, and
accountable
men.
A few weeks more, and they were upon their
passage
,
the happiest human creatures in this world
feeling
a reverential seriousness, approaching to melancholy
at times, but never any thing like depression or sorrow.
The ship ran her course merrily, and after a long, but
very pleasant voyage, they arrived in Americathat
magnificent combination of all the elements: showing
the earth, air, sea, and sky, in all their most
wonderful
exhibitionthe
My history draws near the close. I have no heart to
continue it. It were better perhaps to leave it here, and
let the imagination of the kind hearted consummate
the happiness thatbut no. It must be told. It
shall
be
told. I look over my papers, and struggle to postpone
the catastrophe. But no, it will not be. The dying and
beautiful tints of the olden time will not pass away,
and they shall be perpetuated, though they be so, with
weeping eyes, and a thick breath. Sometimes, there is
a strange, vivid brightening of the past, under the
vindictive
blazing of my temper, as if some rude spirit
had passed by the ashes of my heart, and unkindly
stirred them, till the uncovered embers flashed up again,
like the red light of ruin and desolation, which I have
kindled so often in my boyhood. And then I see the
whole air full of sword blades whirling and shining,
and the whole sky is like the hue of some metal,
burnished
in an intense fire; and sometimes, while I am
meditating, with shut eyes, upon the forgotten and
absent
population that have preceded me, to the congress
of the deada little of the heart's own exhalationan
old man's tears
will
escape, and revive them all, like
forms pictured upon ancient wallsand lo! the men
harness themselves for battle! the horsemen of Israel,
and the chariots thereof! the colouring waxes fresh;
the waters flow, and the skies roll, and the green
trembling
garniture of the wood looks showering with
dewyes, yes, my history draws near the close. A
little longer, and the garrulous old man will be
gathered
to his fathers, and forgotten.
Will this survive?
No!
it were prodigal, indeed, to waste a hope on such a
thought!
Why am I so touched with melancholy? Why is my
heart heavy, as if it had been listening till it ached, to
its own musick? for the sick heart, like the mother, o'er
her sick babe, will make a sweet mournful musick, for
itself
,
at times. Can it be that I am parting forever, with
the last friend of my solitude? This broken and long,
long narrative? What wonder that I sorrow at the
parting
?
It has been my only companion, for many a weary
night, and when it hath left me, unless I may lay me
down, and die immediately, unintruded on, undisturbed
I shall be very miserable. If I were young, with
these feelings, I should have no wish to live, but as I
amO, may it please heaven not to leave me so
utterly
alone, as I shall be, when
this
is gone from me!
over
this
, I have wept; and what men weep over at
my age, is apt to be very dear to them. Nay, my last
tears; I am sure that they are my
last
, have been shed
over it. I have knelt by it, and laid my two hands
upon it, and prayed upon it, as Jacob did, upon the
28*
head of his first born; and what old men pray over,
cannot readily be forgotten by them; no, nor readily
parted with.
Yea, more, I have grown young again, at times, as
I retrod the earliest scenes of my boyhood, cliff and
cavern, hill and sky, wave and wood, in drifting rain,
and wind, and snow; and my heart, my poor old heart
for shameI will nottears!they are blinding
I'll to my task.
`Harold,' said Oscar, after describing a strange, and
terrifick dream that he had, the night before, to which
Harold had listened, with an attention that was very
alarming, `Harold I think that I could sketch the place.'
`Do,' said Harold, reaching him a piece of paper;
and after working a few moments, he reached it back
to Harold, who, the moment that his eye glanced upon it,
uttered an exclamation of astonishment`That
tree!
yes, I remember just such a tree as that, somewhere;
but, for my life, I cannot tell where I have seen it. It
is associated, too, with something terribly indistinct in
my fancy, something that turns my heart cold, when I
look upon it. But the rock, I know nothing of the rock;
but why so melancholy, brother?'
`I know not,' said Oscar, `but I feel a strange
oppression
at my chest. This dream has affected my
spirits. Somethingtherethere it went againbut
it is in vain for me to attempt catching it. Somewhat
dark and threatening seems to be connected with it,
and to me, appears continually flitting about me. Harold,
do not smile, I pray thee. I am not terrified; but I tell
thee, in all seriousness, that I expect some
calamity
to
be near us. Nay, so distinctly, is that dream impressed
upon my faculties, that, if I but shut my eyes, for a
single moment, I can see the same dead body, gashed
and bloody, lying in the cold moonlight; and hear the
thunder break over my head again, like a discharge of
musquetry, just as it did last night, when I awoke,
bathed in my own sweat. Nay, when I awoke, I could
have sworn that I saw the same body in my chamber,
the blue water running at my feet, that tree making its
wintry musick over me, and that great eagle sitting
calmly on that rock, with his black shining eyes, and
talons clotted with flesh and blood.'
`No more, I entreat thee, brother,' said Loena, who
had entered unperceived, and stood over against Oscar,
as he related this, with a solemnity that made her
quake, `beware of these fancies.'
About a week after this conversation, Harold and
Loena, and Oscar and Elvira, were strolling in the
moonlight, at some distance from the house, and
Elvira
was pointing out the places of most interest to her.
`What a beautiful scene,' said Oscar, in a low voice,
pausing to show his awful sense of the midnight
loveliness
about him,' (for it was near midnight, but a
summer sky, and so mild, that it seemed profane to
shut it out,) `nay, why so fast? I like this seat; let us
sit here awhile.'
But she hurried on; and Oscar observed that
Harold's
voice became suddenly mute, as
he
passed it.
`Elvira,' said Oscar, pausing, and laying his hand
upon her shoulder, `what is the meaning of this? what
has happened here? I know not what, but something, I
am sure, has, for the changing colour of thy beautiful
eyes, thy tremblingnay, I distress thee, dearest.
Well, well, let us pass on, and I will never ask thee
more, why thou didst so hurry athwart that shining
and beautiful spot. I am sure that thou hast reasons,
melancholy
they may be, and
tender
, but good reasons, I
am sure they are, for it.'
This was said, but not meant, in a tone of tender
reproachfulness
.
Elvira pressed his hand, and carried it to her lips.
`I could not abide that spot, Oscar, for there I was
faithless to theewhat!drop thy arm, for
that
. Have
I not told thee allit was there, that I knelt to thy
brother, barefooted.'
`Thou didst!oh, Elvira,' said Oscar, drawing her
nearer to him for a moment, with suspended breath,
`thou didst!oh, how hard it is to forgive thee; but
I do forgive thee, I
do
indeed. And so, thou didst
love Harold.'
`I did, from a stripling, a child. Why did I love him?
I know not, or rather, I
knew
not then. But it was the
unconquered, unconquerable fidelity of my heart to
thee!
In Harold, it renewed its allegiance to thine
image
thine!defaced,
and banished, and broken. In
loving Harold, I loved
thee
and there, on that
shadowed
turf, by that rock, so high above all the earth,
I most suffered, and therefore did I tremble, when I
approached it.'
Oscar turned and saw that Harold too, lingered, and
that the dark eyes of Loena, radiant with tears, and
spirituality, were lifted to the moonher forehead
glittered, and her parted lips, her smooth neck, and
her swelling bosom, heaving with the exercise, and the
night air of her own country, were all before him.
At this moment Elvira turned, and begged Harold
to lead homeward, `for the night was far advanced,
and she was weary.'
Harold obeyed, but in the intensity of his
occupation
,
he walked forward, through a tangled and
unfrequented
path, without looking up, till he heard an
exclamation
of horrour from Oscar. He turned, and
saw him standing, like a distracted man, and gazing
upon a tree, shattered and peeled of its bark.
One glance was sufficient, and Harold turned to fly
from a spot, so terrible to
his
memory, when a loud
groan from his brother arrested himhe was leaning
upon the bosom of Elvira.
`Away! away!' cried Harold, with a shout, as loud
and distinct, as if there were the beleaguering of
entwined
adders about his heart, all striking their fangs
into it, at the same moment.
`Away! away! away!' answered the rocks above, in
an unearthly shrieklike a line of challenging
sentinels
.
But he could not stir, hand nor foot. There was the
very rockthere!even
there
, had he lifted his hand
against his own father
there
had his angry blood
bubbled
upon the woodand
there
had he left him!
stripped
,
torn and prostrate upon the shattered rock, like
some one, that had been shivered in a tempest, or
destroyed
by the thunder, plucked down upon his own
head.
`Let us begone,' said Elvira, `this must be the
place that I mentionedwe may be the next victims,
here, to this mysterious power, whatever it be that
ha!what was that?'
`The eagle, the vulture!' answered Oscar, wildly,
looking up to where she pointed, `I dare say that she
is there, with her clotted beak.'
`It was
there
, that our father fell,' repeated Harold;
and Loena, who knew all the circumstances, shook
through all the pulses of her frame, at the mention of
his name.
Their countenances were sad, sad beyond the
expression
of humanity. It was the look of mortal
apprehension
and dismay; and Harold, as he gazed upon
the blasted tree, felt his knees knock together. `Yes,
yes!' said he, `there it is, just as I left it. But why did
I not remember it, in the drawing? Brother,' he
continued
,
recovering more command of himself, `brother!
whatever were the sins of Logan, he was our father,
and we must forget them. Let us go to his death bed,
to that rockI will lead thee to where he fell. Follow
meour beloved companions will stand
here
follow
me, brother; and, haply, we may renew
there
, with
some hope of acceptance, our heartiest
acknowledgment
to HIM that hath turned our hearts, changed our
destinies, and made the children of him, whose trade
was blood, more peaceful and lowly of heart.' Here the
moon shone out dimly on the left, and the water
rippled
coldly to the bank.
`How like
that
night,' said Harold to himself, as
they approached the tree.
It
was
like that night; and he who had been there
in both, would have forgotten, as Harold did, for a
moment, all that had intervened, all! of toil, and agony,
and humiliation, and suffering, as a dream. There was
the same water, too, the same wintry bluehe paused
to dwell upon itthere, too, the undulating outline of
the opposite shore, so darkly and dimly seen, on that
night of horrour, and there, too, the very shadow,
out of which, the wounded horse emerged, snorting
and plunging, when he swam to the shoreand there,
too, the tangled branches, weighed down, and heavy
with their load of matted wild flowers, perishing in
their autumnal beautynay, was not
that
the sound of
the young horse plunging through the wood!by
heaven
the branches
do
rattle, and crack, and recoil, under
the impetuous charge of something!
A shriek!
`Merciful God!' cried Oscar, `
that
was the vulture!
the same cry! the same! I heard it in my dream.'
They stood together, and Elvira and Loena were
with them, all trembling and gasping for the result
Harold and Loena were preparedit was the voice of
some wild beast, they thoughtbut
his
countenance
was full of terrour nevertheless, for they were unarmed.
The path was narrow here, and Harold stood upon the
rock alone, for a moment, looking about.
`For God's sake. Harold, do not' Elvira was
prevented
from finishing her sentence, by the sound of a
shot. The ball whistled past her, and struck the tree
but as the bark flew, Harold put his hand to his side,
and staggered. The ball had gone through and through
him.
He reeled, raised his arm, uttered a faint cry of
horrour
,
and pointed, with a convulsive hand, that
dropped
,
the next moment, lifeless at his side, to the top of
the cliff. There stood a gigantick figure, that clapped
its hands deliriously, and shouted, in the voice that
they had just mistaken for a panther's, with
unutterable
joy, as Harold fell upon the rock, the very rock,
beneath the
tree
.
`Seven! eight! nine!' shouted the giant. `One more,
only one more,'and he levelled his rifle againbut
in vain, in vain, for Oscar, with the wrath and power
of the waked lioness, smote his way through the wood,
unarmed as he was, up the precipice, where the
spectre
stood, laughing, to receive him, grappled with him,
and hurled him headlong down to the earth.
But Oscar went with him. No mortal force could
have released them. And there they lay, rolling on
the earth, bloody and gasping, while Loena, who had
stripped off her garments, was kneeling and staunching
the wound of Harold, with her hair, shedding no tear,
uttering no word, heeding nought of the terrible work
that was going on at her sideand poor Elvira, she
was senseless and motionless.
Harold had just life enough to open his eyes upon
Loena, with one look of dying tenderness and worship,
when, by a glance of his eye, he beheld Oscar panting,
with one knee upon the chest of his horrible enemy
he gazed a momentrose, with a preternatural force,
and shrieked out, as with his last breath,
forbear!
and
fell forward upon his face.
Oscar arose, giddy and sick. Where was he? he
knew not. And who was the savage? with whom had
he battled? was it man or beast? It was overgrown
with hair, and covered with skinshis eyes, too, were
ghastly and red, emitting livid flames, as he lay upon
his back, exhausted, but unrelenting, like a dethroned
devil. He attempted to arise, but Oscar wrenched his
rifle from his hands, and threatened him with the butt
end of it.
`Nine! ten!' said the monster, `one more, only one
more, and what matters it who that one is?Ha! what
do you all hereone, two, three!poh, pohcan't ye
let a man die in peace.'
At this moment Oscar turned his face toward him,
in the full light of the moon, as he rested upon his
elbow.
`What! what! speak, speak!' cried the savage; his
brow convulsed and working, and the sweat trickling
down it. He then attempted to arisehis countenance
changedit took something of humanity, for a moment,
together with an expression of unutterable horrour and
affright; but was unable, and rolled over to Oscar's
feet, with his face to the dust, and his eyes fixed, and
staring, wide open.
Oscar felt, for a single moment, touched with an
unaccountable
feeling of compassion. He raised the other,
but only to be skaken off, like some unclean thing, as
if the stranger's flesh crawled, at his touch.
Nay, the stranger arose; arose, in his supernatural
strength; and Oscar stood, powerless and quaking,
before
him, like a babe, a sick babe.
Oscar attempted to advance`But, no, no!' cried
the terrible old man, in a voice of thunder`no! off!
off! leave me! seven, eight, nine! nine sonsjudgment!
judgment!' and turned to departbut Oscar plucked
him back, and then, with strange, awful eyes, ran to him,
placed both his hands upon his shoulders; breathed quick
and gaspingly into his face, and measured him from top
to toehis broad shoulders, his tread, all, became
successive
matters of astonishment, while the other stood
motionless, and dark, and unresisting, under his hands.
`Can it be?' cried Oscar, at last, in a voice scarcely
louder than a whisper, while his face changed
instantly
to the deathlike hue of a drowned man.
`
George of Salisbury
!'
`Almighty God!' cried the savage man, `whence
art thou? who of ye all! ye, ye bloody, mangled,
murdered
wretcheswho of ye all hath dared to summon
me?who of ye? speak!who of ye all hath right and
power to commune with
George of Salisbury
?'
`Tis he, by Heaven! my father! my father! my poor,
broken-hearted, delirious father!' cried Oscar`O, my
father, look upon me, look upon me! I am Oscar,
Oscar
,
thy first born!'
`What! what! what!' said the savage`Shadow!
what art thou? Tempter, away! I know theethy
haggard
lips, I know it! Here am I,
here
, in my own
dominion
,
and wouldst thou lie to
me?
ha! ha! ha! no,
no, poor innocenteight, nine, tenall here; well, ye
are welcomeyour jubilee, perhapsa festivalha!
ha! ha! cold ar'nt ye? what business had ye with that
rock?
That
was my throne. Another! sowhat? are
ye all come to the place of sacrifice?well, ye are
right welcome. No Indians among you? that is strange,
but they were afraid to come here;
that
stone is
stained
with too red a dew for them. But who is thata
groan!'
Here Loena stretched herself out upon poor, dead
Harold; put her lips to his, once more, and never
breathed again.
`Who is she? and he? speak to me?'
He lifted her up, and she fell lifeless at his feet;
and then he turned over the body, and began to gaze
upon the face of Harold, gradually sinking down,
nearer
and nearer to it, until, with a convulsion, and a cry,
like some wild beast, strangling in his own blood, he
gave up the ghost.
And so Harold died; died on the very spot, where
so many years before, he had wrestled in blood, with
his own father. Yea, he died, and was buried beneath
the very stone, upon which he had once offered up the
sacrifice of two immortal souls, hot and smoking in
blood, to the unstained midnight sky; before the very
throne, and in the very presence-chamber of Jehovah.
And the Indian girlshe was buried by his side
heart to heart; and her people, for all that knew her
ancestry
were her people, came and wept upon her grave,
and their beautiful superstition taught them to see her,
often and often, with a star in her hand, moving amid
the clouds, arm in arm, with another, whose face was
always turned to hers.
The father too, the adopted Logan; the fell George
of Salisburyeven he was buried among the bones,
that, year after year, in his madness, he had heaped up
under the soil, where he had once bled; under the very
tree, which he had haunted with a spirit so deadly,
that no passenger ever rested upon it as he passed by,
without resting there forevera place, which had at
last become a terrour to the very red men, and was
overgrown
and tangled so, that the whites were fain to
choose another route. Nine different persons had he
slain there, and one of them was his own child; on
whom, in the vivid, brief intervals of his reason, he had
called, until the name of Harold was familiar to all the
solitary places of the wilderness, and the tradition went
abroad among the nations, that the destroying spirit
who inhabited the place, was named Harold.
No one ever knew how he had been preserved, or
by whom; but he haunted the place and made it a
desert
;
for ever and anon, some passenger, who chose the
VOL. II. 29
river path, was heard of no more; and when sought
for, would be found dead upon that rock, unrifled,
but pierced through and through, with bullets,
under
the shadow of the blasted tree, and near the
sweet, bubbling fountain, that had tempted him aside,
for a moment. But by whom was this done? Nobody
could tell. The place had become a solitude; and the
Indian demons were believed to make it their congress.
No living man dared to track it, at last. A new path
was worn, and this, winding by the river, was utterly
overgrown, by the luxuriant and dark beauty of the
wilderness. Yea, such was the terrour of the place,
that the very skeleton of the last, that had fallen
beneath
the accursed tree, lay there yet, undisturbed,
just as it fell, with the flesh dropping off from it, piece by
piece; and had not Harold been sentenced and doomed
at an unexpected moment, the bony tenement, wherein
a spirit like his own had once dwelt, would have
rattled
at the next tread of his foot! There it lay! ever
there! just as it fell, unless, perhaps, in sport, it had
been rolled from the rock into the mud, by the
madman
who inhabited the cliff.
Ten thousand terrifick stories were related of the
demon. He had been seen, where no mortal could keep
his foothold, when the sky was all of a bright blaze;
the thunder raging and rattling about his feet; his
panther
skin breaking and flouncing in the wind, like a
heavy, tattered, black bannernay, at midnight, in the
stillest and holiest, the traveller would often hear the
sudden ringing of a rifle in the heaven above him,
and then the crackling of branches, as he turned and
fled from the
Evil spirit of the cliff
.
But would that I had never begun this storyit is
too melancholy, too sadthere were yet one pair of
happy human beings whom I wouldbut no, I cannot
the truth must be told, even of them. Elvira had
not told allnot
all
though she might have told it,
innocentlyand it happened one day, when Oscar was
leaning upon her shoulder, and holding her locked
hands to his heartthatno matterher noble nature
could endure it no longer, and she revealed the secret
of her shame. Oscar heard her throughheard all her
justification, but said not a word in replyshed not a
tearput his lips to her foreheadit was the kiss of
forgiveness and reconciliation; such as one would give
a sister, that had been profanedthey moved; and
Elvira
thought that their motion was that of them that
say, `
farefarewellfarewell for ever!
' He never
spoke again. His heart had been long in decay, and
his brain too; and this was only a rude wind, that swept
them both, like dust and ashes before it. He merely
pressed her locked hands to his heart, lifted his dying
eyes to hers, once moreandno, no, I cannot
forbear
,
lived and died a madman!
and slept in the same
chamber of death, with his beloved. Such was their
bridal chamberthe place of broken hearts, and
shattered
intellects!
CONCLUSION.
I have now done. I am dying.
I am an American
.
England! land of the noble and valiant, farewell! Thou
hast wronged thy brave children of the west.
Englishmen! Let me utter some plain truths before
I depart. There are multitudes among you, who rank
my countrymen with the men of Botany Bay, the
refuse
of your most degenerate and profligate children
multitudes, that have never heard of our revolution,
and know nothing of our history, but regard us yet, as
rebels
.
Men of England! Be generous to us. Glory in us,
as we do in our ancestrywe were your youngest
born. Believe not in your scoundrel politicians, the
vile and abominable creatures of your corruption,
out-numbering
your good and great, as reptiles outnumber
men. They have kept you ignorant of a people, that
have changed the destinies of the world, shaken the
foundations of your own empire, and filled the earth
with republicanism.
I am an American
. I remember when first I set my
foot upon your shores.
Then
was the name a
reproach
.
Our Eagle too, was only a butt, for derision
and ribaldry. How is it now? I have lived to see that
name ringing from kingdom to kingdomto see that
BIRD breaking onward, through cloud and storm, even
to the four corners of the sky.
I am an American
. But I know, and venerate a
true Englishman. His heart
was
godlike, full of
heroick
thought, and high purposemagnanimous by
constitution
,
generous by birthright, brave by habit. But
yeO,
ye
are degenerate. It is now a part of your
loyalty
to revile America. Nay, your very ministry are
stooping from their high estate, to blaspheme the
destinies
of my country. Hearken to your lying witnesses,
with hearts of gall, and fronts of brass! Nay, some of
your reviewers, men who affect to handle and govern
secretly
the
machinery of stateare they not drunk and
delirious with arrogance and hatred toward us?and
there are your travellers too, a vagabond horde,
wandering
,
like hunted convicts, over the face of our fair
and beautiful inheritance, proscribed and interdicted
by their very manners, from all intercourse with
whatever
is dignified, pure, or excellent; herding, when they
get to America, with the outcasts of all the earth, the
offscourings of all that is base and licentious, the
rejected
and disgorged of dungeons and galleys, bloated
and diseased with spleen and envy, and re-absorbing
in their contact with such detestable natures, all the
bile and bitterness that their heart, sore with
repletion
,
and festering with disappointment and
corruption
,
have dischargedand, they,
they
are the men, to
whom you trust for all that you know of a great and
gallant nation! O, shame on you! Why, when you are
sending whole classes of the learned and magnanimous,
to all the corners of the earth, why not send some
one
to America?who shall dare to dwell among us, till
he knows us, and then dare to tell you the truth? Not
that we want to be flattered, no! it may be well meant,
but flattery is not the aliment for a nation, and least of
all, to a nation of republicans.
But this will not always be. I will venture to
predict
that you will yet do us
justice
; that you will
acknowledge
us, as we are, the strongest, (though
boastful
and arrogant) progeny of yourselves, in your
Herculean
vigour, when your nation was a colossus,
reaching
to Heaven, setting her foot upon the east and the
west, and shadowing the ocean with her garment.
Forty years agoyou must bear with meI am on
the threshold of eternity, and what I say to you, is
said in the presence of the Almighty, nay, in the
spirit of prophecy. Forty years ago, you employed
generals
and statesmen to destroy us, and they that were
proud of heart, were handcuffed and pinioned to the
service. But of late, you are served by volunteers,
ballad-mongers, and blockheads. Then you caused
power
and character to advance against us
now
, the lewd
and puerile are detached for our discomfiture. You
assail us with the sparkling nonsense of some poet, the
lumbering detail of some farmer, or push forward the
burning, acrimonious, and vindictive demon of Gifford;
his cold, thick blood crawling, like a blind worm,
through his palsied arteries, clotted and ropy with the
venom concocted at the fountainhaving all the
shrewdness
and foresight, and anatomical insensibility, but none
of the holy probity of a Scotchmanhated, not for his
strength, but for his dispositionthe contempt of the
magnanimous, and terrour of the feeblehis heart
dissolving
in the mortal poison of its own nature, with
the sense of his solitude and desolation, encompassing
him like death, and knowing that a vapour of repulsion
is forever escaping from him in the fearful process of
decomposition.
Forty years have passed away. Great God! what a
revolution! My beloved country standing up, with her
forehead in the sky, her bright hair streaming from
ocean to oceanhelmeted and cuirassedstarred and
glittering with `intolerable light!'and lo! her tyrant
in the dust! where is
his
manhood now?where the
presence, before which Europe trembled and was afraid?
he, before whose bidding, the Great Spirit of the
ocean walked over it, from sea to sea, in earthquake and
thunder?and where the strong children of his youth?
the vast machinery of empire?gone! gone! forever
gone, in the retribution of the Eternal!
You trod upon our shores, onceI have not
forgotten
it, and poured out your vials of wrath upon a poor,
manacled, and bleeding people, till the very earth
reddened
to its centre, and armed men leaped through
the smoke and flame of sacrifice, and rescued your
victim
,
even at the altar. Forty years agobut no, I
must have donethe dream is passingthe last of its
musick is now in my earsa little longer, and I awake!
awake! to what?O, my wife! my babes!
Father of heaven! let not the curse of the
widow and the fatherlessthe broken in heart, and the
wasted in spirit! O, let it not be cast up to this people,
in their day of retribution! I forgive themI
do
I
did not thnik that I
could
, but I
do
forgive themmy
wife! I am coming, my poor, dear babes, I am coming!
Englishmen! I have cursed youI am sorry for it
I was sorry for it, even when I did it, but it was
prophecy
,
and I was constrained to utter itI
now
forgive
you, and O, it may be, for my curses have been
heardthatin the tempest and wreck of your
greatness
,
ye shall hear my voice! when the great God shall
rain fire upon you,
I will be there!
When the
earthquake
shall upheave your proud cities,
there
will I also
be; and
there!
when your great navy shall strew the
waters, of all the earth, with its burning and blasted
fragments, O, it may be that ye shall then hear my
spirit weeping alone, amid the general exultation of the
world, at your almighty downfal!
Farewell!
A DESCENDANT OF LOGAN.
THE END.